Kat Boe, Prince Mario-Max Schaumburg-Lippe, and Dr. Mark Warfel

Michael Braverman and Judy Malone
Andrew Le-Pera and Maggie Norris
Ashley Raynes, Matthew Raynes, and Patty Raynes
Glenn O'Brien, Laure Heriard Dubreuil, Aaron Young, and Gina Nanni
Jasper Ott, Cynthia Ott, James Coleman, and Julia Koch
Pamela Susskind, Dennis Susskind and Cynthia Susskind
Kat Boe, Prince Mario-Max Schaumburg-Lippe, Billy McFarland, and Arielle Kogut
Julie Welles takes a jump
Alex Martorana and Jackie DeLuca
Courtney Davis and Olive Allen
J.T. White and Robin Arteaga
Alan Rish, Billy McFarland, Brian Niemietz, and Francesca Vuillemin
Kevin Thompson and son Carter Thompson
The birthday cake
The Lanes
Matthew Leeb, Dan Gallagher, Garek James, and Jack Goddu
Suzanne Amini and artist Suzanne La Fleur
Robin Byrd and Stacy Engman
Enoc Perez, Bill Powers, and David Mugrabi
Marc Leder and Wenjie Song
Leah Lane
Regina Feuer, Brian Feuer, and Kerianne Flynn
Matthew Sheldon, Stacy Engman, and Adam Weiss
The birthday boy
Jon Heinemann and Michelle-Marie Heinemann
Jill Rappaport
Kat Thompson and Annika Connor
Margie Beck
Catherine Miller and Bruce Lipnick
Photographs by  Patrick McMullan (Rydell, McMullan birthday); Rob Rich (Rydell, Hampton Classic).
Gretchen and Colbi Jordan
Laura Romano, Melissa Principe, Judy Malone, and Sue Caldon
Connor Golden, Kerry Joyce, Joseph Beers, and Brian Guterding
Isabel and Craig Kallman
Richard and Karen LeFrak
Angel Idealism and Michael Musto
Erin Sax and Jennifer Faga
Dr. Gerry Curatola and daughter Gia Curatola
Steve and Christine Schwarzman
The scene at Rydell High School Sock Hop benefitting the Prostate Cancer Foundation at East Hampton Studio in Wainscott.
Georgina Bloomberg and Jill Rappaport
Allison Schneider and Claire Schneider
Natalia Hudziak, Thomas Cleber, Sophie Cooper, Billy McFarland, and Alexa Johns
Michael Shnayerson and Gayfryd Steinberg
Brian Feuer, James Flynn, and Seth Wunder
Chrissie Erpf and Larry Gagosian
Hubert Sodogandji and Sandro Zwehg
Anna Kulinova
Jennifer and Glenn Myles
Natalia Hudziak, Ari Smith, Hugh Ashcraft, Sophie Cooper, Chris O'Sullivan, and Alexa Johns
Paige Campbell and Porter Campbell
Mary Stevenson
Maria De Jesus Castellon
Tom Murro and Chris Nirschel
Thomas Kleber, Hubert Sodogandji, Sandro Zwehg, and Henrik Roemhild
Sean Erickson, Scott Fisher, Antoni Fiumara, and Steven Threet
Emma Thomas, Reid Thomas, and Jenny Thomas
Glenn O'Brien, Bob Rubin, and Aaron Young
Chris Robbins and Ken Wolffe
Murray Hidary, Antonio Villaraigosa, and Jack Hidary
Pamela Polk, Nicole Hevron, and Michael Hevron
Julia Joseph and Carlo Romero
Chiu-Ti Jansen, Patrick McMullan, and Chau-Giang Nguyen
Lucas Rector and mom Kelly Klein
Wyatt and Michael Wudyka
Jill Martin
Andrew Septimus and Elisa Septimus
Guest and Chef David Burke
Colin Cowie
Ilias Tsangaris, Scarlett Stack, and Simon Kopec
Jim Velez, Bridgett Marks, and Charles Ferrara
David Paterson and Mike Milken
Dawne Marie Grannum and Andrew Fitzsimons
Amanda Riegel, Richard Riegel, and Allison Toffolon
Jeannine Gourin and Howard Lorber
Mike Gaynor
Peter Cook
Michel Pratte, Tanya Taylor, Gregory Nato, Virginia Shaw, and Patrick Bradbury
William Weldon, Ali Clopton, and Tucker Spillane
Dio Ganhdih, Elizabeth Alexandra, Jamie McCarthy, Natallia Talmachova, and Angel Idealism
Charles Ferrara and Jill Rappaport
Daryl Hall and John Oates
Glori and Meir Cohen
David Koch
Tanya Taylor, Diane Brown, and Michel Pratte
Lawrence Bender
Fashion Designer Maggie Norris
Hedy Klineman and Sandra Long
Lenny Lane
Sofia D'Angelo
Patrick McMullan and Liam McMullan
Jessica Vishnick, Justin Vishnick, Matthew Vishnick and Ethan Vishnick
Larry Wohl and Leesa Rowland
Connor Reidy, Brittany Dawson, Jesper Lannung, and Patrick McMullan
Indiggo Twins
Diane Brown and Regina Feuer
Marie Foschi and Arthur Stein
Audra Van Hees
Dennis Susskind takes Governor Andrew Cuomo on a tour of the Hampton Classic Horseshow

Harvey Weinstein and Pharrell Williams.
Ron Delsener, Lenny Kravitz, and Ellen Delsener.
Ron Perelman, Anna Chapman, and Pharrell Williams.
Desiree Gruber and Kyle MacLachlan.
Bill and Hillary 's home in Sagaponack for the summer (owned by Republican donor Michael Saperstein).
Georgina Chapman.
Calvin Klein, Donna Karan, and Gabby Karan De Felice.
Ellen DeGeneres and Jonelle Procope.
Lisa Robinson, Anjelica Huston, and Fran Lebowitz.
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com
Patty Newburger, Leigh Bishop Taub, and Katie Holmes.
Ron Perelman and Jamie Foxx.
Barbara Walters and the birthday boy Ben Bradlee with friends Mort Janklow, Linda Janklow, Candice Bergen, and Marshall Rose.
The Roots.
Sagg Main Beach.
Lenny Kravitz and Jon Bon Jovi.
Marcus Samuelsson and Ron Perelman.
Ellen Delsener, Patty Smyth, and John McEnroe.
Desiree Gruber and Kyle MacLachlan.
Howard Stern and Bob Kraft.
Kyke MacLachlan, Ellen DeGeneres, Gina Gershon, and Bobby Dekeyser.
Bob Colacello, John Hess, Susan Hess, Emily Threlkeld, and Harold Ford, Jr.
Lisa Robinson, NYC Police Commissioner Ray Kelly, and Veronica Kelly.
Georgina Chapman.
Lisa Robinson, NYC Police Commissioner Ray Kelly, and Veronica Kelly.
Russell Simmons, Mary J. Blige, and Kendu Isaacs.
Howard Stern and Bob Kraft.
Jayni Chase, Andrew Chapman, and Emily Chase.
The Roots, Ron Perelman, Lenny Kravitz, and Pharrell Williams.
Pharrell Williams, Lenny Kravitz, Ellen DeGeneres, Jamie Foxx, and The Roots.
Darlene Love.
Lenny Kravitz and Jamie Foxx.
Olivier Sarkozy, Mary Kate Olsen, Vito Schnabel, and Max Baumrin.
Dick Parsons, Kathryn Chenault, and Ken Chenault.
Harvey Weinstein and Pharrell Williams.
Ron Perelman and Jamie Foxx.
Harold Ford, Jr., Emily Threlkeld, and Matt Lauer.
Ron Perelman, Anna Chapman, and Pharrell Williams.
Ellen DeGeneres and Jonelle Procope.
Brian Kilmeade, Billy Joel, Eric Cantor, Diane Cantor, and Christine Taylor.
Mary J. Blige and Pharrell Williams.
Lorraine Bracco, Bill O'Reilly, Stephanie Bon Jovi, and Jon Bon Jovi.
Ellen DeGeneres and Pharrell Williams.
Clockwise from top left: Ron Perelman; Alan and Susan Patricof; Joel Klein; Mort Zuckerman; Barbara Lee-Diamonstein-Spielvogel; Ann Tenenbaum.
Deputy Mayor Patti Harris, Christine Taylor, Patty Newburger, and Lauren Mariani.
Ciara.
Lauran Walk, Charlie Walk, Karin Sherman, and Donny Deutsch.

Juan Carlos-Capelli, Vice President, Longines, Shanette Barth-Cohen, Dennis Suskind, and Marty Bauman
Lauren Cuoco and Andy Mastbaum at the Fifth and Market Street meeting site
Brian Falcon, Melissa Sawyer, Celeste Santiago and Justin Kuratnick, Faith Michie, and Jennifer Nunez
Governor Cuomo with a New York peach
Chele Chiavacci and Richard Farley
Sandy and Joe Thompson, Pete and Crystal Feigenbaum, Steve and Johna DeAngelo, Mary Cloney, and Katie Kunkle awaited instructions to go to the Diner en Blanc location
Donna Vekiz
Dennis Suskind (President of the Hampton Classic) with Governor Cuomo
P.J. and Stacey Millan arrived for the trip by subway
And the ribbon goes to ...
The scene in the VIP tent
Cassandra Seidenfeld and Gregory D'Elia
Ana Ivanovic
Hunter Rings
Ariana Grande
Basil Zirinis and Sandra McConnell
Marcus Samuelsson
Preparing the tables for lunch
Leadline in the Grand Prix Ring
Sara Keller (who came as Marie Antoniette) and Garrett Olthuis
Jayne Silberman with her book In The Herd
Signage in stable row
"Lawson", Andy Brown, Ryan Fletcher, Joel Peat, Adam Pitts
Nana Merriwether
"Fifth Harmony", Camila Cabello, Dinah-Jane Hansen, Ally Brooke, Normani Hamilton, Lauren Jauregui
Range Rovers at the ready
Susan Allen and Cathy Duemler
Jillian Gilbert and Brad Gilbert
Monika Sienkowska and Cristina Dobrescu
Riders up
First Lady Michelle Obama
The Call of the Wild
David Wagner
Victoria Azarenka
Cathy Duemler and Merrill Duemler
Tara Mulrooney, Cole Rumbough, Nicole Noonan, and Brette Allen
Zachary Saltzman, Lauren Yocum, Amanda Saltzman, and Joshua Yocum
Jeff Sutphen
Jeffrey Loewy and Nancyjane Loewyy
John Mitchell and Brendan McDonald
The littlest VIP
James Blake
Gabrielle Aruta and Tim Malloy
Maciej Ciezki and Kasia Hopek
Around the rings
VIP tent guests at the lunch buffet
"Cazzette", Sebastian Furrer, Alexander Bjorklund
Cliff and Raya Knight
Jerry Bernhartd, Becky Potts, Kelly White, and Mike McGorry
Natalie Nastase, John Angeloni, Gus Pelagatti, and Amanda Parlett
Saddles for sale
Wolffer Estate Vineyards offering their latest selections
Ready for the course
Braids in the leadline division
Janko Tipseravic
Event chair Natanya Dibona (center) was carried to the parapet overlooking the Schuylkill River by her friends Bill Deal, Chris McBride, Chip Hartford, and Dave Wishlet!
Serena Williams
George Lynch, Jennifer Hughes, Mara Jaffe, and Jonathan Stavin
Daniel Holzman and Michael Chernow
"The Wanted"
Jelena Jankovic
Jean Shafiroff, Edward Callaghan, and Sharon Kerr
Agnieszka Radwanska
Sheryl Dovenberg and Christina Neknez
Photographs by  Patrick McMullan (Taste of Tennis, Kid's Day); Lisa Tamburini (Hampton Classic); Susan Scovill (Dîner en Blanc).
Annabelle Belikava
Brendan Walsh and Brian LaPann of Mole Street organized the acoustics for the event
Scottie and Amos
Olivia Culpo
Terrence Gatsby proposed marriage to Natalia Gamarra during Diner en Blanc
Truppo family members Hilary, Olivia, Matthew, Jay, and Grace gathered to travel to the ''secret'' location
Floyd Cardoz
D.O.B. team leader Pierre Rives (center) guided this group to the Diner en Blanc site at JFK Boulevard
Coco Jones
Dennis Suskind, President, Shanette Barth Cohen, Executive Director, and Marty Bauman, Press Officer of the Hampton Classic
Jean Shafiroff and Jill Rappaport
One of the many boutique displays
Dinner partners Theresa Mangini and Lisa Dichiara Platt entered the table contest!
Missy Franklin
Lee Fryd
Kory Aversa paused for a photo with event organizer Natanya Dibona
Boots, boots, boots
Quddus
Andrea Pevkovic
Linda Renk, Jean Shafiroff, and Kim Renk
Zac Young and David Burke
Into the ring
Celeste Santiago and Justin Kuratnick.
Austin Mahone
Some last minute advice from mom at the 38th Annual Hampton Classic.
Marcus Samuelsson, Venus Williams, and Serena Williams
Laura and Ken Wilkes
Nancy Kerrigan
Venus Williams
John Mooney, Jonathan Waxman, Marc Murphy
Hilary and Shawn Truppo and Diner en Blanc committee member, Megan Haney
Leadline (2-4 yr. olds)
Katlean de Monchy, Emily Post, and David Post
Jimmy Bradley
Rich Haelig, Catie Wilson, Bobby Russamano, Debbie Bonacci, Anat, and Chris Sweeney
Yass Grayeli and Dr. Shawn Sadri
Guest, Laura Tashayan, Linda Renk, Kim Renk, Caitlin O'Rourke, Sammie Fisher, and Christina Neknez
Harold Dieterle

Myra Biblowit and Edie Falco BCRF towel
Brendan Fallis up close
Virginia and Warren Schwerin.
Danger: Press Check-In for the 65th Annual Artists vs. Writers Softball Game.
Marshall Watson, Naz, and Paul Sparks.
Brendan Fallis
Mort (pitching) and Matt umping.
Martha Rogers and Dick Cavett with Riley.
Jane Notar, Richie Notar, and Beth Ostrosky Stern.
Lauer, Karan, Reece, and Hamilton
James Marcus, Ellen Marcus, Judith Hope, Sara Davison, and Tom Twomey.
Kinga and Nina Lampert
Carolyn Murphy
Laird Hamilton in the water
The Writers team.
Bob Gordon, Lindsay Gordon, Marcy Gordon, and Brian McCarthy .
Myra Biblowit
Beth Ostrosky Stern, Dick Cavett, and Bernadette Peters.
Edie Falco
Martha Stewart signature
Darcy Miller Nussbaum, Martha Stewart, and Myra Biblowit
Juris Kupris and Beata Sadurski
Matt Lauer
Harrison Ball, Peter Olsen, and Aidan Mooney.
Bernadette Peters with a couple of beauties.
Basi Zirinis, Sandra McConnell, and Brad Pitt.
William Stephens, Christina McConnell, and Brendan Johnston.
Barbara Slifka and Bernadette Peters.
Mark and Candy Udell.
Richard and Lisa Perry
Models in LEVIEV diamonds and Lisa Perry dressed with LISA PERRY
Maria Baum, Lisa Perry, Gabrielle Reece, Thom Filicia, and Lisa Klein
Writers Mike Lupica and Ken Auletta (Captain of the Writers team).
Whitney Fairchild, Mark Betts, Diana Chudnoff, and Marvin Chudnoff.
Laura Herring and Carter Boardman.
Beata Sadurski
Leslie Stevens, Alex Papachristidis, Lisa McCarthy, and Scott Nelson.
Whitney Fairchild, Mark Betts, Diana Chudnoff, and Marvin Chudnoff.
James Callaghan, Wendy Wegner, Stephania Conrad, Beverly Kazickas, and Michael Kazickas.
Maria Baum and Richard Perry
Mary Libby and Lionel Larner.
David and Lisa Klein
Mark and Candy Udell.
The Artists team.
Betsey Low, Marvin Chudnoff, Diana Chudnoff, and Emily Charette.
Gabrielle Reece cheering on her husband
Hamilton Reece and daughter, the Baum family, and Richard and Lisa Perry at The Breast Cancer Research Foundation's second annual “Hamptons Paddle & Party for Pink."
Gabrielle Reece
Michael Hinz, William Winnie, and Kevin Gray.
Photographs by  Michael Blanchard (Paddle & Party for Pink); Patrick McMullan (ARF); Lisa Tamburini (Artists vs. Writers).
Laird Hamilton at the finish
Jamie Berger and Stephen Gaines.
Tomek Sadurski, Beata Sadurski, Juris Kupris and Clarissa Kupris
Carl Bernstein at the plate.
Alana McCarthy and Lisa McCarthy .
Brendan Fallis and Hannah Bronfman
Laura Herring and Carter Boardman.
President Clinton and Ray Kelly.
Virginia and Warren Schwerin.
Jamie Berger and Stephen Gaines.
Christopher Mason.
Martha Rogers and Dick Cavett with Riley.
Sara Davison, Dick Cavett, Bernadette Peters, and Beth Ostrosky Stern.
Laird Hamilton, Gabrielle Reece, and Richard and Lisa Perry
Tess Reichlen and Brian Hartman.
Jay McInerney catching.
Artist Tomek Sadurski with his '80s vintage surfboard
Gabrielle Reece, Laird Hamilton, and Maria and Larry Baum
Gabrielle Reece and Laird Hamilton
Juris Kupris and Laird Hamilton
Barbara Slifka and Bernadette Peters.
Jane Notar, Richie Notar, and Beth Ostrosky Stern.
Edie Falco and Myra Biblowit
Juris Kupris
James Callaghan, Stephania Conrad, Bernadette Peters, and Wendy Wegner.
William Lauder, Lisa Pevaroff-Cohn, and Gary Cohn
Hilary Rhoda
Alejandra Saralegui, Leslie Stevens, and Kendell Cronstrom.
Aerin Lauder
Donna Karan, Thom Filicia, and Martha Stewart
Renata Caparella, Cognac Wellerlane, Vladi Ibadov, and Michael Wellbrock.
Lori Singer rounds the bases.

Dayton Carr and Nancy Blackwell
Brooke Blake, Will Leatherman , and Olivia Donatelli
Donna Flinn, Pari Harrison, and Marie McCarty
Claire Knopf, Sheila LaBrecque, and Andrea and Mark Aikins
Alice Ross, Nickolos Manice, and Harling Ross
The "Writers" at The East Hampton Artists Writers Annual Softball Game.
Janine, Mary and James Atamian, and Rachel and Steve Garcia
Joy Marks
Vera and Todd Richman
Josh Janson and Amanda Grosvenor
The Artists
Gayle and Al Berg
Bill Clinton signing autographs
President Clinton and Commissioner Kelly
Peter and Joanna de Neufville
Penn Branin, Tom Unterberg, and Sheila Labrecque
George and Mary Lou Strong, and Cynthia Wilby
Photographs by Lisa Tamburini (65th Anniversary Game); Susan Scovill (Preservation Society of Newport County).
Walter Isaacson
Hugh and Daisy Chisholm
Karl and Teryn Weintz, Jody and Erik Saarmaa, Lisa and Ron Oliver, and Elysia and William Pearce
Amy and Scott Smith, and Samantha Ball
George Moss, Pamela O'Connor, and Earl McMillen
Dale Mercer, Tinsley Mortimer, and Dabney Mortimer
The President leaves the field
Rachel and Frank Zuckerbrot
Brian and Pamela Owens
Sandra Whitehouse, Susan Stautberg, and Peter and Eaddo Kiernan
Alexis Frankian and Jake Hossfeld
Jay and Annie Gilbert, co chairs of Summerfest, and Joyce and Philip Sharfstein, chairs of UJA Federation’s New Leadership Campaign
Evelyn Tompkins, Ann Unterberg, and Mark Gilbertson
Gloria Fieldcamp, Sarah Ashmore Bradley, and Evelyn Tompkins
Mona and David Sterling
Olivia Donatelli, Will Hubbard, Claudia Taselaar, Will Leatherman, and Brooke Blake
Matt Lauer helping out some friends
Linda and Andrew Safran with their daughter
The Living Statues of Rhode Island welcomed guests to the black-tie event
Robert and Patricia Bain with Steve and Katelyn Silver
Chuck and Shea Jones, Courtney Trent, Sarah Bradley, Andrea Aikins, Daren Hutchinson, and Mark Gilbertson
Former NY Yankee, Jim Leyritz
Strategizing before the game
Charlie and Hope Jones with Dorree and Charlie Marx
Mrs. Kevork Hovnanian and Sossie Najarian
Patti Bigrig and Peter Dickison
Lawrence and Marilyn Trainor
Caution: Press Check-In
Lisa and Quinn McKean with Stevie McCarter
Alice Ross with Duncan and Barbara Chapman
Ellen, Andrew, Ken, and Josh Grossman
Alison Devenny and Edward Berwind Stautberg
Katherine Deconti and Elijah Duckworth Schachter
The President arrives and everybody wants a picture
Living Statues dressed as Venetian Courtiers
Jay Mcinerney catching
Carl Bernstein at the bat
Director of Development Laurie Bratone and Director Dr. Evelyn Murphy
James Lipton in the announcers booth...
Mike Lupica conferring with Leif Hope
Susan and Jonathan Held, and family
Emily and Richard Leonard
Samantha Ball, Scott Smith, Jennifer Hudson, and Amy Smith
Janet Shaheen, Janet Wood, Honoree Christopher Wood, and A. Kennedy
Grace Cashman, Sarrah Bradley, and Laurie Bratone
Cecilia and Jonathan Greenhut
Rochelle Hoffman, Stacey Kaufman, and Stacy Hoffman
Sharone and Richard Gilbert
Courtney and Allan Trent
Ty and Susan Olson with Jeanne Shanley
Paul Szapary, Diana Sylvaria, Mikki Micarelli, Mike and Barbara Caldwell, and John Sawicki
Todd Richman, Scott Smith, and Scott Jaffee
Ray Kelly and Matt Lauer during the National Anthem
Mort Zuckerman pitching and Matt Lauer umping
Patti and Anthony Whittemore, Van, Campbell, and Laura Whisnand
Laurie and Barry Ballen
President Clinton makes an appearance
Valerie and Tom Gimbel
Ray Kelly, Juliet Papa, and Mike Lupica
Kate Nesbitt, Ian Nesbitt, and Leslie Grosvenor
Mort Zuckerman, Lori Singer, and Carl Bernstein
Writers Mike Lupics and Ken Auletta (Captain of the writers team)
Artist Ed Hollander, with writers Ken Auletta and sports broadcaster, Ann Ligouri
Association president Claire Knopf with her husband Woody, with Stevie and Todd Thompson
1010 WINS broadcaster Juliet Papa with WPPB broadcaster Bonnie Grice
Suzanne and Jeff Gould
Matt Lauer with Dan Rattiner
Patrick Wood Prince, Gillian and Alger Boyer, Meredith Wood Prince, and Leslie and Andrew Heaney
Molly Whitehouse and Charlotte Hamilton
Olivia and John Beckwith-Smith with Elizabeth and Richard Miller
Young Helpers
President Claire Knopf with her son James Knopf
Actor, Bob Balaban came to support the artists
Mrs. Robert Grace and Robin Warren
Ross and Diane Millhiser
Jeffrey Wrightson with friends
Geri and Brett Lawrence
Writers huddle
Artist, Eric Ernst at bat
Leigh Moiola and Charles Dale

Bill Burden and Mary Poole
Joyce DiDonato and Lawrence Brownlee
Gay Schaye and Ernie Anastos
The Pink Flamingos
Michelle Kritzer
Anne Marie and Doug Bratton
Florence Apana, Jodi Cody, and Renee Marcus
Anne and Jim DeMay
Maureen Orth and Jean Doyen de Montaillou
Michael Kovner and Daisy Soros
Paul Appleby and Jacqueline Schmidt
Tara Troy, Lauren Beither, Pat Kenny, Margaret Grioli, and Agnes Zakrzewska
Jean Doyen de Montaillou, Meridith Townsend Marshall, and Michael Kovner
Teddy Tanksley, Alan Tanksley, and Bailey House CEO Gina Quattrochi
Lee Ann Dunn and Michael Keehner
Nicole Limbocker and Polly Espy
Chad Graham and Brenda Rae
Barbara and Chuck Moore with Korin and Kevin Fishman
Kevin and Natalia Burdette
John Catsimatidis, Ernie Anastos, Rita Cosby, Margo Catsimatidis, and Tomaczek Bednarek
Photographs by Cutty McGill (Nantucket & Renaissance Ball); Annie Watt (St. Francis Food Pantries).
Macy's table
Irwin Sugarman and Cindy Aloi
Audna England and Bill Tanzi with Catherine Michaelson and Helena Park
Harry Bicket
Suzy Welch and Coco Kopelman
John Eason
Cathy Campbell and Sheila Johnson
Pearl Tom
Forrest Moses and Larry Brown
Mt Carmel Holy Rosary the Honors Violin Ensemble
Peter Nash, Peggy and Bill Tramposch, Elizabeth and Geoff Verney, and Westy Saltonstall
Arie L. and Coco Kopelman
Jean Doyen de Montaillou and Michael Kovner
Christian Knaust and Carmen Marc Valvo
Karen Rich, Veronica Kelly, and Margo Catsimatidis
Marilyn Whitney and Jean Doyen de Montaillou
Elizabeth and Geoff Verney, Honorary Chairs
Sue and Phil Marineau
Bailey House board member Deb Gordon, Kathy Farrell, and Board Chair Thomas Farrell
Nan and Chuck Geschke
Peter and Joanna and Blake and John Townsend
Alan Tanksley, Terry Sadoff, and Elizabeth Sadoff
Valerie Plame Wilson and Joe Wilson
Bailey House Board Chair Thomas Farrell, Event Chair Chris Rizzo, and Richard Udice
Charles MacKay and Robert Meya
Janet and Rick Sherlund
Ann Ciardullo and Richard Udice
Lee Harris
Joy Ingham and Michael Kovner
Event Chair Chris Rizzo addresses the crowd - board chair Thomas farrell in background
Mary and Marvin Davidson
Donna Kendall
David, Mary Beth, and Daniel Kenny with Whitney Webster
Mt Carmel Holy Rosary School Honors Violin Esemble
Jane Otis and Louise Smith
Bonny Sacerdote
Shelly Bloch
Ron and Susie Dubin
Martin Palmer, MaryAnn Gilmartin, and Valerie Palmer
Rita Cosby
Suzy and Jack Welch
David Devan, Daniel Meyer, David Dubbeldam, Fred Haas, and Jonathan Blalock
Alex Papchristidis and Brian J. McCarthy with friends
Arianne Berger, Marla Sanford, Michael Lorber, and Holly Finigan
Jack Gross and Pat Kenny
Kathleen Guzman
Joseph Sano, Suzanne Carlson, and Ernie Anastos
Carolyn MacKenzie, Jean Doyen de Montaillou, and Jane Poole
Joseph Sano, Margaret Grioli, Pat Kenny, and Ernie Anastos
Priscilla Heublein and Michael Gieleta
Anna Cypher and Rene Barbera
Laurie Hutner and Ernie Anastos
Michael Petonic and Veronica Watson
Rita Cosby and Tomaczek Bednarek
Guest of Honor Rosalie Mignano-Aste
Felicia and Governor George Rivera
Joan Blumenfeld, Joanne Foulke, and Jana Goldin
Chris Potterpin and Sabrina Martin
Eileen Berman and Jay Bauer
Gay Schaye, Laurie Hutner, and Suzanne Carlson
Jane and Tom Otis (Standing) speak to Marie and Ray Kamineck (seated left) and Teddy Tanksley (seated right)
Michael Lorber and Jean Doyen de Montaillou
Susan and Alfred Chandler
CEO Gina Quattrochi with Board Chair Thomas Farrell in the background announces the raffle
Kathleen Ritch
Anya Matanovic
Joseph Sano, Margo Catsimatidis, Ernie Anastos, and Rita Cosby
Over 750 guests attended the Eleventh Annual "Women of Valor" Awards Tea at the Waldorf Astoria
Miranda and David Lind
Ann Quick
Mark Aste, Rosalie Mignano Aste, Concetta Aste, and Nichole Mignano
Heidi Stober and Simon Pauly
David Daniels and Scott Walters
Stephen Lister, Nedra Matteucci, and Joseph Finnegan
Pamela Thomas, Max Berry, and Franci Crane
Paula Butler
Douglas Thomas
Sean Noonan and George Eleazer
Michelle Marwood
John Catsimatidis, Msgr. Lawrence Connaughton, and Joseph Sano
Jason Rand and Alexandra Loew
Beth and Steven Moise
Guests gather at the Eleventh Annual "Women of Valor" Awards Tea at the Waldorf Astoria.
Fred Haas, Joyce DiDonato, and Lawrence Brownlee
Ashlyn and Dan Perry
Jody Gilmore and Walt Kirchner
Leo Hussain and Roland Wood
Lois Palguta and Ernie Anastos
Jean and Gene Stark

Carol Gertz.
Vito Schnabel with mom Jacqueline.
Josh Ginsberg, Richard Ruggiero, John Heminway, Nicole Mollo, Meredith Ogilvie Thompson, and James Deutsch.
Valentin and Yaz Hernandez.
The Swensons and the Judelsons.
Alina Cho.
Carol Gertz.
Marla Maples and Tiffany Trump.
Amanda Ross and Dini von Mueffling.
Candy Udell and Krista Krieger.
Leonel Piraino and Nina Griscom.
Candy Udell and Krista Krieger.
Guests gather at Guild Hall in East Hampton for John Heminway 's screening of “Battle for the Elephants.”
Deborah Srb and Iris Zonlight.
Nicole Trunfio.
Kelly Bensimon and Sea Louise Bensimon.
Marla Maples and Tiffany Trump.
Lauren Ezersky, Deborah Hughes, Declan Slonim, and Jeff Slonim.
John Heminway, Davina Dobie, Donna Karan, and David Koch.
Kelly Bensimon and Sea Louise Bensimon.
Robert Tucker and Mitch Alfus.
Kelli Delaney Kot and Dr. Mark Kot.
Photographs by Annie Watt (Battle for the Elephants); David X Prutting/BFAnyc.com (Love Heals).
Alana Zonan, Marissa Cohen, Monica Shatz, and Isadora Haddad.
Caroline Roumenguere with Cassiopeia and Dylan Douglas, and Casiphia.
The Craigs, Butlers, and Andersons.
Jon Bon Jovi and Dorothea Bon Jovi at the UA East Hampton Cinema for a screening of "The Butler."
Arden Wohl.
Michele Gradin and Liz Kelly.
Dendy Engelman, Alina Cho, Bibhu Mohapatra, and Gigi Stone.
Leonel Piraino and Nina Griscom.
Eric Villency and Caroline Fare.
Katherine and Krista Krieger.
Michele Gradin and Liz Kelly.
Katherine and Krista Krieger.
Thomas and Amy Guttman, Donna Karan, and Angela Boyer Stump.
Guests at the Wolffer estate.
Jonathan McCann and Anthony Coron.
Valentin and Yaz Hernandez.
Kelli Delaney Kot and Dr. Mark Kot.
Robert Tucker and Mitch Alfus.
Amanda Ross and Dini von Mueffling.
Eric Villency and Caroline Fare.
Elise Boeger and Claudia Parks.

Alexis and Chris Robbins
Author Dava Sobel with Barbara Goldsmith
Itzhak and Toby Perlman, Alan and Arlene Alda, and Billy Joel
Robert Caro, Lyndon Johnson, Path to Power
Guests walk to dinner
Jeff Stewart, Will Robbins, Donna Robbins, and Chris Robbins
Cathryn Keller and Dame Jillian Sackler
Will, Lucy, and Chris Robbins
David Gray and Christine Miller Martin
Lynn Sherr, Swim, why we love the Water
Barbara Goldsmith, and Robert and Ina Caro
Steven Hoskins, Sidney Stark, and Max Hoskins
Robin and Nick Racanelli
Christopher and Vicki Kellogg
George Rogers, Pari Bradley, and Quinn Bradley
Gala Event Designer Ned Kelly (Piermont) and Caramoor's Director of Special Events, Christine Bosco
Honoree Zita Rosenthal with Gala Co-Chairs Judy Evnin (Greenwich) and Susan Freund (Pound Ridge)
Founding Chair and Author Barbara Goldsmith and Clive Davis
Barbara Jude Frerichs, What My Dog Has Taught Me About Men
Ann Nitze, Ben Bradlee, and Dame Jillian Sackler
Guests out by Grey Gardens Pool
Caramoor's new CEO Jeff Haydon and Katie Haydon
John Cullum and Paul Rosenblum (Mr.Culllum played the role of Mr. Maraczek in She Loves Me)
The Red Ball theme inspired attendees to add a splash of red to their summer attire
Billy Joel and Alexis Roderick
Ronald and Jo Carole Lauder
Doreen and Gilbert Bassin
David and Sandra Joys with Donald Kendall (all of Greenwich)
The Perltones
Marcus Samuelsson, Yes, Chef, with Nile Rodgers, Le Freak
Dr. Ruth
Katie Ziglar and Pari Bradlee
Yaz and Valentine Hernandez
Honoree Zita Rosenthal with Stephen Lowey and Congresswoman Nita Lowey
Daniel Nelson and Honoree, Zita Rosenthal (bothof Manhattan) with Caramoor's Chairman, Jim Attwood (Bedford)
Barbara Hoffman and Katherine Holabird, authors and their books
Sylvia Smolensky and Steven Silberstang (Pound Ridge)
Faye de Muyshondt, Socialsklz
Ivan Wilzig
Michael and Eleanora Kennedy
Melissa Ko, Natalie, Kyle, and Douglas Han
Author, Author...
Gala Chairs Alec Baldwin and Dame Jillian Sackler
Helen Matos
Mary Beth Keane, Fever
Frank Savage, The Savage Way
Catherine Azmoodeh and Ambassador Robert Hormats
Sara Stabile and Merideth Ostrom
Photographs by Lisa Tamburini (Author's Night); AnnieWatt.com & David Dupuy (Perlman); Gregory Partanio (Grey Gardens).
Sarah Billinghurst and Howard Solomon
Chris Martin chatting with author Mickey Paraskevas
Sandra and Bill Cordiano (Pound Ridge)
Anne and George Litchblau (New Canaan)
Guests in the concert tent
Fariba Jahanbani, Roxanne Jahanbani, Alec Baldwin, and Pari Bradlee
Carl and Kari Tiedemann
Alec and Hilaria Baldwin
Clive Davis signing The Soundtrack of My Life
Dinner in the tent
After Dark Party with the cast of She Loves Me
Samantha Sherman, Lea Brumage, celebrity "Eventiste" Marcy Blum, Gabrielle Jaworskyj, and Amanda Myers-Walls (all of Manhattan)
Elizabeth Kircik and Annie Totah
Effie and Bob Fribourg (Katonah) and Susie and John Freund (Pound Ridge)
Ann Nitze and Noreen Buckfire
Kelly Killoren Bensimon
Chorus led by Maestro Patrick Romano
Grace Johnson, Noreen Buckfire, Anne Van Rensselaer, and Judy Trunsky
Gabby Giffords and Mark Kelly
Kitty Kelley, Capturing Camelot
Jennifer Nicole Lee and her books
Priscilla Rattatzi, Jennifer Eisham, and Jenny Landey
Lawrence Schiller, Marilyn and Me
Lidia Bastianich
Thomas Skilken and Susan Lloyd
Managing Director, Paul Rosenblum with Alexandra Silber (played the lead role of Amalia in She Loves Me)
The flowers at Grey Gardens
Harry Benson, Franklin and Emmy Haney, Gigi Benson, Susan Lloyd, and Thomas Skilken
Paul Rosenblum with Joe Masteroff and Sheldon Harnick, the original creator's of She Loves Me
Heike Grebenstein and John Seelye
Roe Ethridge, Nancy Hagan Ethridge, and Mike Falkenstein
Stanley, Gala, Adrianne, and Jerry Cohen
Guests arrive by boat at The Perlman Music Program's Annual Summer Benefit "Taste of Shelter Island."
Joan Tobin, Cornelia Bregman, and Ava Roosevelt
Mike Rubin, David Kamp, Jery Mallow, and Jim Doughetry
Nelson DeMille with his latest, The Panther
Katherine DeConti and Elijah Duckworth Schachter
Joel and Lois Coleman, and Helen and Murray Charash
Wendy Brill, Ira Leeds, and Ellen Saidenberg
Founder Toby Perlman speaks
Bill Edwards, Amei Wallach, Ann de Armas, and Raúl de Armas
Jeff and Mei Sze Greene
Eric Fischl, Bad Boy
Jeffrey Lyons, Stories My Father Told Me
Sharon King Hoge
Martha Stewart with Katie and Jeff Haydon (all from Bedford)
Amy Peckham (Bedford)
Armfuls of books ...
Ann Nitze and Ivan Wilzig
Katie Beers, Buried Memories
Debra Diamond and Dame Jillian Sackler
Hilaria and Alec Baldwin
Gwyneth Paltrow
Christina and Aaron Kilberg
Susan Isaacs, Goldberg Variations
Alexandra Longanecker and Jodie Beckwith
Frank Zaba and Charles Schuster
Kittey Kelley and a fan ...
Maestro Itzhak Perlman leads the PMP String Orchestra
Ran and Christine Blank
Dinner Tent; event décor by Ned Kelly and Company
Fernanda  Gilligan
Ellen Weisburd and Nancy Singer
Ron Juvonen, Kirk Henckels, Densey Juvonen, Boyd Martin on Pancho Villa, Tony Cutugno, Fernanda Kellogg, and Emily Hottensen at Fitch's Corner Horse Trials.
Kirk Henckels and Fernanda Kellogg
The McLaughlins with Jack Lynch
Colleen and DeForest Howland
Claudia Spinelli and James Salomon
Allen Blagden
Asia Dyrkacz and Rolf Heitmeyer
Luly Duke
Felie Thorne
J. McLaughlin swag bags
Jim Erwin, Diana Niles King, and Eric Hill
Jim Zirin and Marlene Hess
Peter Olsen, Jack Lenor Larsen, Emily Ondracek-Peterson, Eril Peterson, Galina Zhdanova, Ralph Pucci, Dianne B, and Adrien Daurov
Gloria Callen
Perrin Martin and David Theiringer
Fiona Moore and Declan Slonim
Josette Content
Ramy Sharp with UJA-Federation of New York Hamptons Trunk Show vendors
Chrissie Gaffney and Jennifer Oken
Yoan Capote
Champagne Paul Goerg at the Sunday Spectator Luncheon
Matko Tomicic, Angela Firestone, and Eric Firestone
Sandra Becker and Victoria Exnicios
Hilary Block, Nancy Stahl, and Susan Cocke
Parasols from Joyaux Marisol
Elizabeth Binder and Nilani Trent
Larry and Joshua Warsh
Collector Car Parade
John and Karen Klopp
Fernanda Kellogg
Richard Fortes, Katerina Benzoba, and Michael Halsband
Irina Erickson
Charlie Merison, Lexi Merison, and Regan Haas
Sam Allen, Meredith Travers, and Chris Spitzmiller
Emily Ondracek-Peterson and Jack Lenor Larsen
Katherine Dunlop
Leah Fischman and Anna Pizarro
Norm Brousseau
Kirk Henckels with Chris, Sarah, and Katherine Mann
Photographs by Mary Hilliard (Fitches Corner); Heidi Green Photography (UJA)
Susan Krysiewicz and Aubrienne Krysiewicz-Bell
Fitch's Market had 50 shops to choose from
Libet Johnson and Cece Cord
UJA-Federation of New York's Hamptons Trunk Show shoppers ...
Deborah Montgomery
UJA-Federation of New York's Hamptons Trunk Show chairs Jamie Mitchell, Harriet Croman, Ramy Sharp, Sara Pilot, Jennifer Gardner Trulson, Jill Bikoff, and Debbie Wilpon
Melissa Armstrong and Melissa Mapes
Parker Thorne
Darren Henault
Patty Hambrecht, Karen LaGatta, Molly Schaefer, Jack Lynch, and Buster Brown
Howard Farber and Lillian Heidenberg
Lorna Graev and Count Dixi von Maltzahn
Alexandra Kasmin
Peter Kross, Maryann Hegel, and Bill Hamilton
Jennifer Gilbert and Dina Manzo
Galina Zhdanova, Dianne B, and Adrian Daurov
Alexandra and Elizabeth Barnes-Schwartz
Ramy Sharp
Kirk presenting his gift to Fernanda
Marion deVogel and Nina Reeves

Paul Fine, Roger Meltzer, and Jason Glass
Lauren Bush Lauren and Sharon Bush
Bonnie Morrison
Donald Smith, Mai Hallingby Harrison, and Peter diPaola
Tashiana Wasington and Eric West
Eleanor Howe, Peter Howe, Siena Rumbough, Cole Rumbough, Leah Rumbough, and Kiera Rumbough
Basil Zirinis, Sandra McConnell, Tatiana and Campion Platt
Laura Frerer Schmidt and Michele Promaulayko
Sophie Sumner
Fred Devito and Kim Kiernan
Robin Meltzer and Alexandra Lebenthal
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com
Sophia Coullas and Serena Bancroft
Mauro Bergonzoli and Franziska Countess Fugger von Babenhausen
Stephanie LaCava
Joe Alexander and R. Couri Hay
Brendan Shanahan, Lynn Carey, and Harry Johns
Debbie and Rob Cox
Ilene Bornstein and Allie Weinstein
Genevieve Jones and Estelle
Marina Kanes and Dianne Vavra
Christine Lahti
Adam Weiss, Nana Meriwether, and Mattew Sheldon
Sharon Bush, Louise Kornfeld, Liliana Cavendish, Anne Hearst McInerney, Ashley Raynes, Patty Raynes, and Nina Griscom at the Alzheimer's Association's official Rita Hayworth Gala Hamptons Kick-Off Reception in Watermill, NY.
Princess Yasmin Aga Khan wearing a Sintessi Ring
Amanda Seyfriend, Jack Seyfried, and Ann Seyfried
Debbie Lesser and Dorianne Samuels
Lonnie Wollin, Jennifer Wollin, Louise and Stephen Kornfeld
Andy Bellin and Peter Sarsgaard
Adam Brody
Nicole Miller and Kim Taipale
Princess Yasmin Aga Khan, Anne Hearst McInerney, and Jay McInerney
Mara Siegler and James Richard
Chris Noth and Tara Wilson
Tyson Ballou
Sharon Stone and Gloria Steinem
Gregg Bello and Valerie Gillotis
Louise Kornfeld, Audrey Gruss, and Margo MacNabb Nederlander
Hecahanova Cheryl and Jamie Millione
Kasia and Doug McCormick
Nanette Lepore
Nicole Sexton, Lauren Bush Lauren, and David Lauren
Alison Mazzola
Nana Meriwether and Andrew Fitzsimons
Laura Frerer Schmidt
Lucia Hwong Gordon
Nikki Simon, David Feuerstein, and Daryl Simon
Jada Yuan and Jacob Bernstein
Jessica Smith and Haleigh Breest
Gerald and Jerrilyn Kaplan
Margo Catsimatidis and Andrea Catsimatidis Cox
Jeana Chung, Ilene Park, and Susan Kim
Cornelia Sharpe Bregman and Anne Hearst McInerney
Blaise LaBriola and Rob Cox
Nicole Sexton and Liliana Cavendish
Gary Fisketjon and Jim Signorelli
Hannah Davis
Carson Kressley
Nicole Sexton, Rick Freidberg, and Francine LeFrak
Brian Gattas
Natalie Joos and Lara Backmender
Suzanne Hemming and Tom Murphy
Owen Laub, Robert Wilson, and Julian Mommert
Lis Waterman and Lionel Geneste
Jodi Sarsfield, Luke Sarsfield, and Chele Chiavacci
Patty Raynes and Ashley Raynes
Pessa Howard and Claire Stephens
Dominique Huette and Lauren Lombardi
Zosia Mamet, Shane Kidd, and Jen Allcott
Jay Snyder, Jay McInerney, and Robert Zimmerman
Debbie Bancroft
Jimmy and Margo MacNabb Nederlandert
Anne Hearst McInerney, Harry and Laura Slatkin
Jonathan Farkas, Somers Farkas, Andrea Catsimatidis Cox, and Christopher Nixon Cox
Michel Piranesi and Princess Yasmin Aga Khan
Zac Posen and Zachary Quinto
Margo Catsimatidis and Louise Kornfeld
Andrew Saffir and Debbie Bancroft
Andrew Bartsch and Emily Wendel
Lauren Bush Lauren, Sharon Bush, Ashley Bush, Michele Promaulayko, and Laura Frerer Schmidt

Nancye Simpson and Oscar Mandes
Margo MacNabb Nederlander and Jimmy Nederlander
Bob Chaloner, Jean Shafiroff, and Chuck Scarborough
Dr. Howard Sobel and Gayle Sobel
Henry Buhl and Daniela Zahradnikova Kathy Reilly, Dr. Mark Kot, and Kelli Delaney Kot
Francis Shelton Bruger and William Bruger
Andrea Greeven Douzet and Alex Douzet
Bill Sclight and Cheri Kaufmann
Anna Maria Holme, James William Holme, and Jean Remmel Little
Bob Chaloner, Jean Shafiroff, and Chuck Scarborough
Elizabeth Canavan, Claire Canavan, Beth Canavan, and Marie Canavan Robert Zimmerman
Doug McCorkmick, Kasia McComick, Jennine Gourin, and Howard Lorber
Dancing became more expressive as the night moved on at the Southampton Hospital's 55th Annual Gala.
Steve Bernstein, Donna Karen, and Bob Chaloner
Jim and Christine Gray
New York State Senator Ken LaValle and Southampton Mayor Mark Epley
Susan and Joseph Kelly
Basil Zirinis and Sandra McConnell
Audrey Gruss and Ken Wolfe
Robert Zimmerman
Daniel Moralas and Denise DeLuca
New York State Senator Ken LaValle and Southampton Mayor Mark Epley
Cindy Willis, Steve Bernstein, and Melanie Wambold
Alex Donner entertained ...
Jean Shafiroff, Martin Shafiroff, and Elizabeth Shafiroff
Serena and Gillian Miniter Victoria Wyman, Robert Wilson, and Cornelia Bregman
Jean Shafiroff, Bob Chaloner, and Audrey Gruss
Serena and Gillian Miniter
Mary Unsworth and Lisa Arnold
Cushla Kelly
Lis Waterman, Hillary Geary Ross, and Darcy Gould
Nancye Simpson and Oscar Mandes Cushla Kelly
Susan and Joseph Kelly
Alan and Stacy Wilkinson
Lis Waterman, Hillary Geary Ross, and Darcy Gould
Bob Hormats and Catherine Azmoodeh
Dr. Howard Sobel and Gayle Sobel Marianne Epley and Mayor Mark Epley
Hayden Hosford
Gary Andreassen, Katherine Andreassen, and Kevin Berlin
Joe Fuchs, Sheila O'Malley Fuchs, and Mildred Brinn
Victoria Wyman, Robert Wilson, and Cornelia Bregman
Steve Bernstein, Donna Karen, and Bob Chaloner
John Catsimatidis, Margo Catsimatidis, Leesa Roland, and Larry Wohl
Basil Zirinis and Sandra McConnell Somers Farkas, Doug McCormick, and Kasia McCormick
Felecia Taylor and Debbie Bancroft
Boo Grace, Cole Rumbough, and Leah Rumbough Mary Unsworth and Lisa Arnold
Stephanie Hessler, Shirin Christoffersen, and Erin O'Callaghan
Liliana Cavendish and Kelly Reilly
Lauren Day Roberts and Cynthia Ott
Ann Ligouri and Scott Vallary Kitty Kelley, Nancy Stone, and Kelly Ford
Kathy Reilly, Dr. Mark Kot, and Kelli Delaney Kot
Katlean DeMonchy, Dawn Marie Grannum, and Dr. Penny Grant
Stephanie Hessler, Shirin Christoffersen, and Erin O'Callaghan Daniel Moralas and Denise DeLuca
Martin and Audrey Gruss
Jean Shafiroff, Martin Shafiroff, and Elizabeth Shafiroff
Henry Buhl and Daniela Zahradnikova
Bob Hormats and Catherine Azmoodeh
Katlean DeMonchy, Sharon Kerr, and Lauren Day Roberts
Elaine Saladino, Jim Saladino, Maryanne Horwath, Michael Shaheen, Mary Quatroche, and Morley Quatroche
Alexis Zoullas, Kiane von Mueffling, Priscilla Zoullas, and Charlie von Mueffling Laura Lofaro Freeman and Yaz Hernandez
Gary Andreassen, Katherine Andreassen, and Kevin Berlin Cassandra Seidenfeld, Kasia McCormick, Morgan Schara, and Michelle Marie Heinemann
Elizabeth Canavan, Claire Canavan, Beth Canavan, and Marie Canavan
Campion and Tatiana Platt Audrey Gruss and Ken Wolfe
Katlean DeMonchy, Sharon Kerr, and Lauren Day Roberts
Gary Lawrance and Zita Davisson
Elaine Saladino, Gwen Bokine, Debra Halpert, and Barbara Bank
Alan and Stacy Wilkinson
Ann Ligouri and Scott Vallary
Maren Tilley, Sara Angela Peterson, and Anette Hatlevik
Kathy and Rick Hilton
Liliana Cavendish and Kelly Reilly
Margo MacNabb Nederlander and Jimmy Nederlander
Jim and Christine Gray
Elizabeth and Mark Meier Joe Fuchs, Sheila O'Malley Fuchs, and Mildred Brinn
Elizabeth and Mark Meier
Doug McCorkmick, Kasia McComick, Jennine Gourin, and Howard Lorber
Elizabeth and Mark Meyer
Steve and Stephanie Hessler Mark-Anthony Edwards and B Michael
Elizabeth and Mark Meyer
Ray Fitzmartin, Whitney Schott, Christine Schott, and George Ledes
Hayden Hosford
Francis Shelton Bruger and William Bruger Bill Sclight and Cheri Kaufmann
Mark-Anthony Edwards and B Michael
Alan Wilkinson, Stacy Wilkinson, Christine Gray, Kristen Kossmann, and Jim Gray
Felecia Taylor and Debbie Bancroft Andrea Greeven Douzet and Alex Douzet
Somers Farkas, Doug McCormick, and Kasia McCormick
Katlean DeMonchy, Dawn Marie Grannum, and Dr. Penny Grant
Kathy and Rick Hilton
Anna Maria Holme, James William Holme, and Jean Remmel Little
Campion and Tatiana Platt
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com.
Jamee Gregory and Arlene Tucker
Gary Lawrance and Zita Davisson
Justin Haan, Emily Haan, Bob Chaloner, and Oscar Mandes
Kitty Kelley, Nancy Stone, and Kelly Ford
Justin Haan, Emily Haan, Bob Chaloner, and Oscar Mandes Jamee Gregory and Arlene Tucker
Lauren Day Roberts and Cynthia Ott Maren Tilley, Sara Angela Peterson, and Anette Hatlevik
Marianne Epley and Mayor Mark Epley
Ray Fitzmartin, Whitney Schott, Christine Schott, and George Ledes
Laura Lofaro Freeman and Yaz Hernandez
Cassandra Seidenfeld, Kasia McCormick, Morgan Schara, and Michelle Marie Heinemann
Cindy Willis, Steve Bernstein, and Melanie Wambold
Martin and Audrey Gruss
Dinner under the tent.
Alexis Zoullas, Kiane von Mueffling, Priscilla Zoullas, and Charlie von Mueffling
Somers Farkas, Margo MacNabb Nederlander, Laura Lofaro Freeman, Andrea Greeven Douzet, Felicia Taylor
Steve and Stephanie Hessler
Boo Grace, Cole Rumbough, and Leah Rumbough

Ron Jautz and Sharon Jautz
Sandra Kozlowski, Michelle Duncan, and YPC Exec Committee members Dawn Reinhotz and Nicole Sebastian
Lily and the Parlor Tricks provided the music
Sandy Gilbert and Aslihan Sabanci
Susan Lazarus and Dan Rizzie
Sheldon Hirshon, Max Bressman, and Scott Rutsky
Baroness Sheri de Borchgrave
Gus Majid and Nahill Younis
Filmmaker and Director Barry Sonnenfeld enjoyed sampling the goodies
Casey Fremont Crowe, Rex Fremont Crowe, and Brandon Crowe
Charlie Hall and Ian Volner
Chef Bryan Futerman, Foodys Restaurant
Eric Firestone, Cindy Sherman, Kenny Scharf, and Wendy Jacobson
Dancing to DJ Jason Fioto
Guillaume Gentet, Katharina Plath, and David Carpenter
Chef Josh Capon from Lure Fishbar
Analisse Taft and Katharina Plath
Rob Cardone, Harry McCabe, Ken Barrett, and John Coppeto
Chardonnay Pickard and Banu Yilmaz
Valerie Del-Sol and Eliza Siegler
Wendy Jacobson and Cindy Sherman
Dick Traum, Lauren LoGiudice, Ryan Asselta, Scott Gellerstein, Maysoon Zayid, Edward Matthews, and John Lombardo
Vincent Fremont, Alexander Heinrici, and Bob Colacello
Michael Simonson and Vinnie DiCalogero
Beet Risotto with goat cheese presented by Topping Rose House
Patrick Yu and Lauren LoGiudice
Lenard and Fern Tessler
Jei Jan Wu
Tom Colicchio and Lori Silverbush
John Petzold and Michelle Duncan
Lauren Sweder and Dayna Holli
Lexi Kaplan, Amy Kaplan, and Allie Kaplan
Aslihan Sabanci and Eugenia Santiesteban-Soto
Edith Diconson
Devon Ott with Komen Greater NYC CEO Linda Tantawi
Delectable desserts
Steve Joester and Helene Necroto
YPC Executive Committee John Petzold, Pablo Ogarrio, Chair Sandra Kozlowski, Steve Simmons, Dawn Reinholtz, and Robert Waldele
Katharina Plath, Prune, Aslihan Sabanci, Olivier Nourry, and Lauren Sweder
Chef Jason Weiner from Almond Restaurant Bridgehampton with his Corn Vichyssoise with Basil Marinated Tomatoes
Photographs by Patrick McMullan (Scharf); Lisa
Tamburini (Great Chefs); Lois Silver (UCP).
Tony and Betty Ann Catanzaro, John Migotsky, and Debra Halpert
YPC Exec Committee member and event hostess Dawn Reinholtz, Komen Greater NYC CEO Linda Tantawi, and YPC Chair Sandra Kozlowski
YPC member Evan Kaufman and friend
Shelly Fremont, Joe Allen, and Annette Tapert Allen
Rhonda Cole and Gail Ahye
Andrew Heid and Caleb James
Ryan Asselta, John Lombardo, and Alan Kalter
YPC Executive Committee member Robert Waldele and guests
Amy Lau and Aslihan Sabanci
Christina Lee and Angela Lee
Aamir Khandwala and Atif Toor
Alec and Hilaria Baldwin
Emily Schneider and Paula Zanger
Aslihan Sabanci
Emmett Park, Clara Park, Jonathan Park, and Noah Park
Butch and Marjorie Robbins and Pat Mann
Madison Blank
Jack McGowan, Ken Rosenberg, Ken Carmel, and Rich Loughlin
Aslihan Sabanci, Jay Cheshes, and Baroness Sheri de Borchgrave
Samantha Yanks with Avery Rudin and Sadie Yanks
Smoked Duck Loin with tomato confit and pickled watermelon from Stone Creek Inn
Ronald Raspa and Maryann Genovese
Spencer Goldstein, Jason Carlough, and Bill Schories
Paul Corley and Jon Epstein
Komen Greater NYC's Young Professionals Committee's Pink Rocks the Rock
Chris Laul, Linda Laul, and Ryan Laul
Oysters on the half
Eugenia Santiesteban-Soto, Katharina Plath, and Lyndsey Natale
Peach Daiquiris
Amy Meric, Burak Gurturk, and Aslihan Sabanci
Basil Panna Cotta with heirloom tomatoes and crisp pannacotta
Tom Kehoe, Judie Taylor, Sarah Higgins, and Tim Callahan
Pat Roddy and Bob Giunco
Chef Joseph Realmuto and Pastry Chef Jessica Craig, Nick & Toni's Restaurant
Guillaume Gentet and Suny Kaltenhausser
Pierre Le Veaux and Ken Auerbach
Mary Bryant and Dick Traum
Chefs Eric Ripert and Tom Colicchio
Steve Haweeli and Brian Halweil
Austin Salisbury, Dalton Salisbury, and Pam Salisbury
Eugenia Santiesteban-Soto and Lyndsey Natale
George Kakaty and Denise Silverberg
Maripol, Michael Schatt, Pat Iuto
Kenny Scharf
Chef Ty Kotz, Topping Rose House
Katharina Plath, George Kakaty, Aslihan Sabanci, Corinne Oats, and Chardonnay Pickard
Matthew Satz, Diego Schmitt, and Scott Ewalt
Toni Ross
Sharon Friedland and Pamela Morgan
Henry Lyon and Bethany Brady
Bill Kenney, Dahlian Porter, Alan Bonistall, and Jeff Castaldo
Komen Greater NYC's Young Professionals Committee's Pink Rocks the Rock.
Restauranteur Drew Nieporent
Zach Sokol and Julie Baumgartner
Nick Gregory and Patrick Demarchelier

Henry Buhl and Daniela Zahrabnikova.
Fabiola Beracasa and Harry Brant.
Ellen Krass, Stewart Lane, Bonnie Comley, and Alyssa Renzi.
Wilbur Ross and Hilary Ross.
Jack Larsen.
Aaron Young and Laure Heriard Dubreul.
Christophe de Menil and Lucinda Childs.
Gerard Garvey.
Ramona and Mario Singer.
Gaga taking a taste. Abramovic, Wilson, and Gaga.
Hal Buchner and Andrea Thiel.
Silke Tsitiridis and Selicitas Kohl.
Joy Marks.
Debbie Bancroft.
Bettina Anderson and Molly Ruprecht.
Sharon Bush and Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia.
Tree nymphs were everpresent.
Brooke Geahan, Kim Taipale, and Nicole Miller.
Ramona and Mario Singer.
Lady Gaga and Marina Abramovic.
Lady Gaga and Marina Abramovic.
Robert Wilson with Gaga.
Simon de Pury.
Charity Wright and Brian Ramaekers.
Travis Boyer and Johannas Vogt.
Hal Buchner and Andrea Thiel.
Charity Wright and Brian Ramaekers.
Travis Boyer and Johannas Vogt.
Gabriella Cadena and Karla Barbosa.
Sessa von Richtohofen and Richard Johnson.
The entrance to Watermill Center's "Devil's Heaven."
Jacques Azoulet and Countess Luann de Lesseps.
Gerard Garvey.
Henry Buhl and Daniela Zahrabnikova.
Alan Cumming.
Photographs by Rob Rich and Nicholas Hunt/PatrickMcMullan.com.
Bob Wilson.
Sharon Bush and Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia.
Sessa von Richtohofen and Richard Johnson.
Ellen Krass, Stewart Lane, Bonnie Comley, and Alyssa Renzi.
Fabiola Beracasa and Harry Brant.
Ahn Duong and Alison Loehnis.
Jack Larsen.
Abramovic, Wilson, and Gaga.
Leah Lane and Robert Wilson.
Campion and Tatiana Platt.
Christophe de Menil and Lucinda Childs.
Nanette Lepore and Bob Savage.
Winona Ryder.
Simon de Pury.
Amanda Hearst, Anne Hearst, Jay McInerny, and Lilliana Cavendish.
Bettina Anderson and Molly Ruprecht.
Wilbur Ross and Hilary Ross.
Gabriella Cadena and Karla Barbosa.
Aaron Young and Laure Heriard Dubreul.
Brooke Geahan, Kim Taipale, and Nicole Miller.
Gaga taking a taste.
Robert Wilson with Gaga.
Johannes Vott, Ben Rodriguez Cubenas, Leslie Powell, and Stanley Stairs.
Nanette Lepore and Bob Savage.
Leah Lane and Robert Wilson.
Ahn Duong and Alison Loehnis.
Silke Tsitiridis and Selicitas Kohl.
Campion and Tatiana Platt.
Alan Cumming.
Joy Marks.
Debbie Bancroft.
Winona Ryder.
Shari Sackler and Kristoff Bandeweghe.
Bob Colacello, Carol Mack, and Jamee and Peter Gregory.
Jacques Azoulet and Countess Luann de Lesseps.

Chef Caroline Perego with her assistant chefs from Citarella and Fulton restaurants
Brian Brady, Barbara Page, and Mario Buatta
Cornmeal Cake with Strawberries from Craft Restaurant
Suzanne and Peter Cook
Nick Korniloff and Pamela Cohen with the Tansey family
Fabiola Beracasa, Stacy Engman, and Ekaterina Boki
Emma de Kooning Villeneuve, Isabel de Kooning Villeneuve, and Lucy de Kooning Villeneuve
Albert Sardelli, Jana Phipps, and Steven Stolman
Judy and Rod Gilbert
Mango mouse by Chef Caroline Perego
Dan Gasby, Susan Ungaro, Andrew Zimmer, B. Smith, and Ted Allen taking selfie pictures
Katherine and Gary Andreassen
Chef Stefan Karlsson from Fond Restaurant with his Swedish creations
Earl Crittenden, Judy Hadlock, Jack Hadlock, and Alan Sheppard
Iron Chef Morimoto signature Ale
Chef Andrew Weiner of Almond Restaurant
Chef Billy Oliva from Delmonico's
Matko Tomicic, Ron Kaplan, and Lee Schulnic
Stephen and Sandy Perlbinder
Dan Weiss, Skye Kirby Westcott, and John Weiss
Ann Maine and Brian Brady
Michel Witmer
Matthew Yee, Vicente Wolf, David Storper, Tina Storper, Dawn Bodenchak, and Frank Bodenchak
Melissa Meyer, and Nicole, Maria, Ralph, Anne, and Michael Pucci
Alice Weil Judelson, Kelly Bensimon, Eric Firestone, and Angie Firestone
Diane and Mark Guariglia
Iron Chef Masaharu Morimoto
Photographs by Annie Watt (Art Southampton); Owen Hoffman/Patrick McMullan (Longhouse); Patrick McMullan (Hampton Designer Showhouse); Lisa Tamburini (Chefs & Champagne).
Thom Filicia
Chef Todd Mitgang, Crave Fishbar, NYC
Nathan Joseph, Orlan, Rafael Cuir, and Stanley Cohen
Pastry Chef, Coleen Grapes with assistants from the Harrison Restaurant
Tasting and champagne sipping
Ron Burkhardt
Michael Shaheen and Maryann Horwath
Chef Ron Paprocki, Gotham Bar and Grill
Dietrich Klinge sculpture on the grounds of f Art Southampton
Robert Chaloner, Kim Baker, and Tony Manning
Chef Maricel Presilla, Zafra Restaurant, Hoboken, NJ
Sussan Deyhim
Joe Pintauro
Jean Shafiroff and Ike Ude
The 2013 Designers
Pastry Chef Abby Swain, Craft Restaurant
Tony Manning and Jenny Bradley
Simone Hossack, Tina Maria Birch, and Yuta Powell
Henry Buhl, Pamela Cohen, and Nick Korniloff
Under the tent ...
Chef Timothy Fischer, Restaurant Latour at Crystal Springs Resort, NJ
Hayley Sarno and Patrick Mele
Bob and Beth Brenner
Chef Alex Stupak serving sweet corn with lobster and epazote mayonnaise
Chef Todd Jacobs, Fresh Restaurant, Bridgehampton, NY
Nancy Stone and Patty Kaus
Jenna and Melissa Principi of Wolffer Vineyards
Brett McMicking, Ann Van Ness, and Michael Hall
Geoffrey Schneider and Patricia Schneide
Elisa Monte, Elena Prohaska, and Sherry Dobbin
Guy and Dorothy Wiggins
Chefs at work
Pamela Cohen, Nick Korniloff, Henri Barguirdjian, Steve Bernstein, Bob Chaloner, Mayor Mark Epley, Brenda Simons, and Richard Yasztremski at last night's preview reception of Art Southampton.
The littlest foodie
Cricket Burns
Richard and Ana Meier
Sue Madonia and Henry Koehler
Ann Thomas
Chef Patrick Feury, Nectar Restaurant, Berwyn, PA
Jennifer Mabley and Austin Handler
Kevin Berlin and his aliens
Andrew Zimmer and Susan Ungaro
Celerie Kemble and Mario Buatta
JBF Award winner
Luke Li and Jasmine Chen
Jack Lenor Larsen and Robert Wilson
Lys Marigold, Skye Marigold, and Faith Popcorn
Amy and George Kane
Pastry Chef Zac Young, David Burke Restaurant
Sherrill Canet, Brian del Toro, Keith Baltimore, Kim Hendrickson-Radovich, Rosemarie diSalvo, and Annemarie diSalvo
Ralph Gibson and Mary Jane Marcasiano
Chef Cariline Perego
Chef Georges Mendes, Aldea Restaurant presents his grilled quail with coriander and black olives
Dan Gasby and B. Smith
Models with Graff Jewelry and Perrier Jouet
Alice Aycock, Dorothy Lichtenstein, and Dianne B

Chef Caroline Perego with her assistant chefs from Citarella and Fulton restaurants
Brian Brady, Barbara Page, and Mario Buatta
Cornmeal Cake with Strawberries from Craft Restaurant
Suzanne and Peter Cook
Nick Korniloff and Pamela Cohen with the Tansey family
Fabiola Beracasa, Stacy Engman, and Ekaterina Boki
Emma de Kooning Villeneuve, Isabel de Kooning Villeneuve, and Lucy de Kooning Villeneuve
Albert Sardelli, Jana Phipps, and Steven Stolman
Judy and Rod Gilbert
Mango mouse by Chef Caroline Perego
Dan Gasby, Susan Ungaro, Andrew Zimmer, B. Smith, and Ted Allen taking selfie pictures
Katherine and Gary Andreassen
Chef Stefan Karlsson from Fond Restaurant with his Swedish creations
Earl Crittenden, Judy Hadlock, Jack Hadlock, and Alan Sheppard
Iron Chef Morimoto signature Ale
Chef Andrew Weiner of Almond Restaurant
Chef Billy Oliva from Delmonico's
Matko Tomicic, Ron Kaplan, and Lee Schulnic
Stephen and Sandy Perlbinder
Dan Weiss, Skye Kirby Westcott, and John Weiss
Ann Maine and Brian Brady
Michel Witmer
Matthew Yee, Vicente Wolf, David Storper, Tina Storper, Dawn Bodenchak, and Frank Bodenchak
Melissa Meyer, and Nicole, Maria, Ralph, Anne, and Michael Pucci
Alice Weil Judelson, Kelly Bensimon, Eric Firestone, and Angie Firestone
Diane and Mark Guariglia
Iron Chef Masaharu Morimoto
Photographs by Annie Watt (Art Southampton); Owen Hoffman/Patrick McMullan (Longhouse); Patrick McMullan (Hampton Designer Showhouse); Lisa Tamburini (Chefs & Champagne).
Thom Filicia
Chef Todd Mitgang, Crave Fishbar, NYC
Nathan Joseph, Orlan, Rafael Cuir, and Stanley Cohen
Pastry Chef, Coleen Grapes with assistants from the Harrison Restaurant
Tasting and champagne sipping
Ron Burkhardt
Michael Shaheen and Maryann Horwath
Chef Ron Paprocki, Gotham Bar and Grill
Dietrich Klinge sculpture on the grounds of f Art Southampton
Robert Chaloner, Kim Baker, and Tony Manning
Chef Maricel Presilla, Zafra Restaurant, Hoboken, NJ
Sussan Deyhim
Joe Pintauro
Jean Shafiroff and Ike Ude
The 2013 Designers
Pastry Chef Abby Swain, Craft Restaurant
Tony Manning and Jenny Bradley
Simone Hossack, Tina Maria Birch, and Yuta Powell
Henry Buhl, Pamela Cohen, and Nick Korniloff
Under the tent ...
Chef Timothy Fischer, Restaurant Latour at Crystal Springs Resort, NJ
Hayley Sarno and Patrick Mele
Bob and Beth Brenner
Chef Alex Stupak serving sweet corn with lobster and epazote mayonnaise
Chef Todd Jacobs, Fresh Restaurant, Bridgehampton, NY
Nancy Stone and Patty Kaus
Jenna and Melissa Principi of Wolffer Vineyards
Brett McMicking, Ann Van Ness, and Michael Hall
Geoffrey Schneider and Patricia Schneide
Elisa Monte, Elena Prohaska, and Sherry Dobbin
Guy and Dorothy Wiggins
Chefs at work
Pamela Cohen, Nick Korniloff, Henri Barguirdjian, Steve Bernstein, Bob Chaloner, Mayor Mark Epley, Brenda Simons, and Richard Yasztremski at last night's preview reception of Art Southampton.
The littlest foodie
Cricket Burns
Richard and Ana Meier
Sue Madonia and Henry Koehler
Ann Thomas
Chef Patrick Feury, Nectar Restaurant, Berwyn, PA
Jennifer Mabley and Austin Handler
Kevin Berlin and his aliens
Andrew Zimmer and Susan Ungaro
Celerie Kemble and Mario Buatta
JBF Award winner
Luke Li and Jasmine Chen
Jack Lenor Larsen and Robert Wilson
Lys Marigold, Skye Marigold, and Faith Popcorn
Amy and George Kane
Pastry Chef Zac Young, David Burke Restaurant
Sherrill Canet, Brian del Toro, Keith Baltimore, Kim Hendrickson-Radovich, Rosemarie diSalvo, and Annemarie diSalvo
Ralph Gibson and Mary Jane Marcasiano
Chef Cariline Perego
Chef Georges Mendes, Aldea Restaurant presents his grilled quail with coriander and black olives
Dan Gasby and B. Smith
Models with Graff Jewelry and Perrier Jouet
Alice Aycock, Dorothy Lichtenstein, and Dianne B

Bob and Margo Alexander with Oliver
Alex Goldberger and Carolyna De Laurentiis
Scott Noggle, PhD, Donald O. Freytes, PhD, Valentina Fossati, PhD, Dieter Egli, PhD, and Scott Dipnick, PhD
Margo Alexander, Susan Solomon, Sue Steinberg, and Ellen Krass
Lily Hoagland
Elizabeth Nash, Tom Nash, Valentina Fossati, PhD, and Piero Incisa
Elan Ferguson and Malaika Laga
Ed Cohen and Mark Cohen
Edward Pantzer, Barbara Heyman, and Michael and Ninah Lynne
Maxine McCrey and Chaka Tonge
Hazel Barr and Sean Eshaghy
Sonia Louise Davis and Kim Drew
Jennifer Lane, Darby Hills, and Toni Canada
Gem Palace's Jewels
Stephen Chang, PhD and Tom Twomei
Julia Grimes, Valentina Fossati, PhD, and Katama Eastman
Melissa Babcock and Kristina McGrath
Elliot Weiss and Lauren Thayer
Dana Liss and Caitlin Cherry
Valentina Fossati PhD, Susan Solomon, and Margo Alexander
Katie Ziglar and Jane Richards
Danielle Grant, Cara Klein, Tricia Pantzer, Lisa Barr, Cindy Mark, and Jennifer Harris
Henry Cruz, Kenrick Shere, and Timothy Stockton
Rashad Bailey and Samantha Osborne
Marcia Dunn and Jon Sobel
Thelma Goden and David Adjaye
Jana Pasquel de Shapiro and Jonathan Marder
Peter Sung and Derek Adams
Jennifer Packer and Elizabeth Gwinn
Alan Washkowitz, Barbara Washkowitz, Jill Furman, and Roy Furman
Jason and Tricia Pantzer with Marcie and Jordan Pantzer
Jennifer Brown
Jane Penn and Hans Parker
Christine Lin, Piero Incisa, and Shirley Cook
Liz Stiffel and Kathy Piccone
Victoria Gordon and Scott Lipnick, PhD
Ruben Kennedy and Dane Campbell
Tiffany Dubin and Evelyn Tompkins
Coffee reception at Ralph Lauren before Author Breakfast with guest Pamela Fiori
Siddharth Kasliwal, Jana Pasquel de Shapiro, and Samarth Kasliwal
Jonathan Morgan and Alexandra Engler
Clifford Temple
Susan Solomon, Dorothy Frankel, Kathy Bristor, and Margo Alexander
Ryan Lee, Timothy Stockton, and Cheryl R. Riley
Jason Pantzer, Jeffrey Fine, Jonathan Henes, Jeffrey Klein, and Matthew Mark
Becca London and Sophia Popovits
Rafi Crockett
Erin Campbell, Ike Kitman, Robin Cembalest, and Virginia Sanchez
Elizabeth Price and Carlette McMullan
Jeanette Waters and Shannon Ali
The scene at The Studio Museum in Harlem's summer opening reception.
William and Wandy Hoh
Danny Abel, Abbe Schriber, and Vivian Crockett
Kathleen Hearst, Ann Nitze, and Marife Hernandez
Christy Kemison and Abbe Schriber
Marcia Buchanan, Pamela Fiori, and Judith Scholl Lee
Missy Falkenberg and Bill Priest
Norris Robinson
Laurie Tisch
Cara Klein and Deborah Colacino
Gail Geronemus, Lauren Noggle, and Scott Noggle PhD
Agnes Gund and Thelma Golden
Joan Moore, Gabriela Cleveland, and Cindy Yingling
Charles Rosen, Monique Long, and Duke Dang
Rashad Bailey and Donia Allen
Jason and Tricia Pantzer, Jeffrey Siegel, Joan and Edward Cohen
Tom Twomei and John Eastman
Tricia Pantzer, Wendy Chaikin, and Pamela Henes
Laurie Tisch and Karen Klopp
Robert Pruitt and Naima Keith
Tiffany Dubin, Jana Pasquel de Shapiro, Ruth Runberg, and Jonathan Marder
The Pantzer living room.
Sue Ding and Evi Briggs
Tina Louise
Mamie Walton, Stanley Paul and Nancy Kelley
Kathy Rayner and Ann Nitze
Ann Nitze, Samarth Kasliwal, and Noreen Buckfire
Bunky Cushing and Pamel Fiori
Pamela and Edward Pantzer
Jeff Wallerstein, Paul Goldberger, Svetlana Wachtell, Herbert Wachtell, and Dieter Egli, PhD
Ellen Krass and Ed Bleier
Melissa and Ben Goldberger
Cullen Washington
Photographs by PatrickMcMullan.com; Nina Drapacz (AFIPO); Matt Messner & Dan Rest (Early Birds)
Felicia Crabtree and Susan Wright
Gerald L. Leavell and Ivan Ford
Marcy Gookin and Gia McDermott
Will Jablonski and Heather Ingram
Marife Hernandez and Ann Nitze
Majora Carter, Val Style, and Timothy Stockton
JP Anderson and Megan McKinney Whitfield

Lisa Perry
Carol and Frank Olt
Oliver Estreich and Alex Cecil
Francine Tint and Evan Morgenstein
Rebecca and Charles Finelli and Suzanne Dillenbeck
Pavel Malapko, Javier Gomez, Alexandra Smith, and Ricardo Gomez
Kevin Drake, Chloe Gifkins, and Andy Drake
Joe Alexander and Jean Mackenzie
Dan and Dan Weiner
Karen Duffy, Susan Joy, Conor Feagan, and Myra Magaletta
Jean-Marie Haessle, Rich Parante, Ken Kim, Lorilee Bruce, and Angus Bruce
Valerie and Brad Aston
Alex and Howard Sutherland
Mickey and Paola Schuloff
Kim Taipale and Nicole Miller
Randy Kemper and Tony Ingrau
Frederique Pacgnella, Gregoire Volgelslang, Eve Xanchopuolos, Vanessa Vanderguest, Megan Quinlan, Portia Holt, and Kevin Berlin
David Wassong and Cynthia Clift
Zeshan Ahmad, Yulia Barbashova, Lisa Onysko, and Joseph Grazi
Entering Governor's Island
Marina Blazhko and Julia Mukhina
Joan Issacson, Joseph Grazi, and Betsy Green
Frank Olt, Tess Mullarkey, Susan Slater, and Joyce Bullen Gar
John Collins and Rita Roselle
Susan Peterson
Stephen and Cindy Ketchum
Dr. Sherrell Aston and wife, Muffie, Liz and Dr. James Watson
Amanda Fuhrman and Glenn Fuhrman
The magnificent view of Long Island Sound
Franklin Perrell and Kirk Larsen
Ron Wendt
Dana Marcolina and Ellen Toland
Mildred Brinn and Joe Hughes
Melissa Berkelhammer and Cole Rumbough
YoungHee Kim
Eduardo and Esther Gaffron
The dancing begins
Marta and Martin White
Bruce Richards and Avis Richards
The dinner setting in the new Herzog & de Meuron-designed building at The Parrish Art Museum's annual Midsummer Party.
Joseph Grazi, Gary Krimershmoys, Denise Krimershmoys, and Craig Page
Alexandra Stanton and Domna Stanton
Andrew Tori, Schoolhouse Projects from Brooklyn
Pool House, designed by John Collins
Olivier van Themsche
Bruce Knecht and Henry Clark
David Maupin and Stefano Tonchi
Gillian Miniter and Eric Javits
The scene from Governor's Island
Hank and Lucie Bard
Cybele Kadagian and Kevin Ochel
Marcia Sobel and Jon Sobel
Liz Novick, Hamilton Aguiar, and Robin Carrella
Fred Dorfman, Nelsa Gidney, Jordan Ringel, and Susan Dorfman
Victoria Crosby, Liz Watson, and friend
Trevor Jackson, Eric Romano, Bert van Zetten, and Marcel Hausman
John and Theresa Skvarla
Victoria Crosby and Diana Collins
Stephanie Brant and Keira Cohen
Consuelo Cipriano and Marco Adler
Jean Shafiroff
Rose Dios, John Dios, and Sarah Lopez
Aaron Sigmond and Kathy Murphy
Harriet Gerard Clark, executive director of Raynham Hall; John Collins, President of the Board of Trustees, Raynham Hall Museum
Alessa and Richard Johnson
Marianna Kirikian, Emily Franchina, and Rebecca Finelli
Kacya Noskova and Kevin Berlin
Jan Pratt
George Davison, Judy Rivkin, Harriet Gerard Clark, and Emily Gerard
Liz and Larry Brown, Fran and Richard Walker
Jean Shafiroff and Rusty
Susan Marlow, Rachel Urban, and Kate Gray
Richard Phillips
James M. Nederlander and Charlene Nederlander
Alice Aycock
The Astons: Muffie, Sherrell, Allison, Sherrell children: Bracie, Ashleigh
Bill Jonas
Elizabeth Haveles and Peter Haveles
Fête Paradiso
Erin Williams and George Gissing
Heather Haux and Dr. Shaun Sadri
Alexandra Wynne
Mauro Porcini and Beth Rudin DeWoody
Denyse Duval Pugsley
Courtney Collins and Jeanette Bjorklund
Mara Sherwood
Todd and Lauren Merrill
Peter Tunney and friends
Russell and Mary Selover
Anna Maria and Roxanna Bach
Cricket and Richard Burns with their daughters
Josephine Mecksepper and Cynthia Rowley
Aleksandra Milicevic and Dr. Kenneth Mark
Alexandra Wynne and Shannon Cusack
Agnes Gund and Dorothy Lichtenstein
Cora and Clarence Michalis
Grayson Stokeley and Scott Rose
Margot Gordon, Leonard Gordon, and Helena Glinn
Sara Fitzmaurice, Christy MacLear, Fiona Rudin, and Eric Rudin
Esther Paster and Jill Rappaport
Jennifer and Michel Piranesi
Harley (baby), Matt, Brooke, and Wendie Aston
Mel Kendrick and Bryan Hunt
Terrie Sultan
R. Couri Hay with Pandora and Yvie Biddle
Patricia Sands, Joan Shepard, and Edward Mohlenhoff
Photographs by Patrick McMullan (Parrish, ArtHamptons); Owen Hoffman (Parrish); Jill Johnson (Raynham Hall Museum); Billy Farrell Agency (Parisian Ball).
Tracy Dellomo and Clifford Packingham
Jill Stuart
Christopher Pape, Adele Kristiansson, and Jonathan McCann
Jeffrey Bilhuber and Maria Santoro
Suzi and Dustin Chase
Marian Minkin and Theresa Skvera
Sides McCall and Isabella Caporuscio
Dan Castro, John Thomas, and Nathan Orsman
Hillary Davis and Meredith Zeitlin
Ross Bleckner and Debbie Bancroft
Beatrice Veschettis
Christal Cruz, Bonnie Toye, and Teneille Reicher
Dolly Bross Geary and Jack Geary
Roxanne Robinson, Conor Feagan, Karen Duffy, Susan Joy, and Myra Magaletta
Jess Martinez
Stacey Bronfman and Matthew Bronfman
Bracie, Sherrell, and Ashleigh Aston
Hawley and Janice Vander Poel
Dagmar Karppi and Nicole Menchise
Robert and Lynn Hanke

Allegra Rumbough, Cole Rumbough, and Leah Rumbough
Event Co-Chair Earl McMillen, Laura Turner Seydel, and Eli Dana
Philip Bilden and William Vareika
Susan Gossage, Danny P, and Kamela Forbes
Lisa Shaller Goldberg, Arlene Shaller, David Shaller, Jake Goldberg, and Scott Goldberg
Linda Assini and Keith Douglas
Danielle and Ned Ginty, and Jorge Menendez
Katia Stotsky
Dina Merrill and Ted Hartley
Toinette Gay and Tito Saubidet
Guests mingled amidst the event’s display of silent auction items
Photographs by Patrick McMullan (ArtHamptons; SH Hospital); Richard Lewin (Dina Merrill); Scott Indermaur (Newport).
Nan Potter, Patricia Davis, Leah Rumbough, and Antonia DiPaolo
Melissa Berkelhammer, Cole Rumbough, and Anne Washburn
Sharon Bush
IYRS alumna Gigi DiRenzo and Chris Deighan
Stephanie Lineva, Allegra Rumbough, and Whitney Schott
Chris and Jacki Lane, and Dan Faria
Restoration Hall, the student workshop, was transformed into a setting for the silent auction
IYRS Chairman Joe Dockery and Kristal Dockery
Peter Tunney and friends at the sixth annual ArtHamptons on the Sculpture Fields of Nova's Ark.
Bonnie Lowe and Ann Crabtree
Nina Gillman, Lucy Cookson, and Regan Rose
Alice Connick Ryan and Patricia Robert
C. Hugh Hildesley of Sotheby’s—who has conducted some of the auction house’s most prestigious sales, including those of the Estate of Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis and the Collection of the Duke and Duchess of Windsor—conducted the live auction
Michelle Murphy
Steve Bernstein and Melanie Wambold
Aniik Libby and Mary Libby (Aniik's proud Mom)(Christie's)
Lana Smith, Katia Stotsky, and Polina Proshkina
Allegra and Leah Rumbough
Lori Schultz and Karyn Mannix
Ray Fitzmartin and Gregory D'Elia
Alan and Laurie Johnstone
Jean Shafiroff and Sandra McConnell
Geoffrey Bradfield and Lady Liliana Cavendish
IYRS Trustee Chuck Townsend and Jill Townsend (center couple) enjoy the school’s Annual Summer Gala with family and friends
Gallery Owner Peter Marcelle, Bonnie Lowe, and Ted Hartley
Dr. Jane Aronson
Cindy Stagoff
Whitney Schott, Allegra Rumbough, and Stephanie Lineva
Nancy Myers Alverez
IYRS alumnus Carter Richardson, IYRS Trustee Clay Deutsch, and Nancy Deutsch
Artist/Teacher Miriam "Molly" Dougenis and Dina Merrill
IYRS Instructor Kevin McKiernan and Curator of IYRS/The Museum of Yachting Jay Picotte
David Elwell and Tom Whidden
Elisabetta Assi and Robert Moore II
Nick and Carol Gillhan
Crissy Barker and Nigel Barker
Patti and Dominique Camilli
Peter Marcelle Gallery Director Catherine McCormick
Gala guests packed into Restoration Hall on the IYRS campus during the Annual Summer Gala, to enjoy cocktails amidst examples of students' boat- restoration work
Aniik Libby and Miriam "Molly" Dougenis
Whitney and Christine Schott
Unik Ernest, Bridget Kelly, and Stephen Baldwin
Michelle Herger and Jessica Mackin
Jean Shafiroff, Nan Potter, Antonia DiPaolo, Leah Rumbough, Allegra Rumbough, Whitney Schott, Christine Schott, and Stephanie Lineva
Ben Farnborough, Kimberly Gonzales of Boat International Media, and Kristopher Desoto
Barbara van Beuren, Stephen Glascock, and Joe Hoopes
Pam Dana and Bud Hudson
Mike and Terry Lanza
Silke Kluever, Julian Carballal, Lucas Carballal, and Ralph Carballal

Robert Hochberg, Jackie Hochberg, and Alexander Hochberg
Jean and Martin Shafiroff
The Teams at the 16th Annual Mashomack International Polo Challenge & Luncheon: Castello di Vicarello, Wide World of Ferrari, The Carlyle Hotel, Gracious Home, and Dream Hotel with co-chairs Karen Klopp and Teresa Colley.
Chandler Dunning, Bob Jain, and Jason Bunge
Carola Jain and Lucia Hwong Gordon
David and Danielle Ganek
Sheila Fuchs, Barbara Smith, and Christl Meszkat
Stephanie Hessler, Peggy Hill, and Diana DiMenna
Valentina Assaf, Charlotte Assaf, and Vittorio Assaf
Jon Potter, Eric Jones, Sara Dimonekas, James Dimonekas, and Korinne Munson
Robert Morea, Deanna Morea, and William Sofield
Jane Pelley, Scott Pelley, Barry Moze, and Lisa Moze
Sarah Morris and Josephine Meckseper
Alicia Adams, Deban Flexner, Karen Klopp, Libby Mavrolean, Nina Griscom, and Bonnie Pfieffer
Rina Stone, Linus Stone, and Hazel Stone
Cyrus, Majorie Gubelman, David Ganek, Nate Berkus, and Jeremiah Brent
Kim White and Greg D'Elia
Stephanie Hessler, Steve Hessler, Declan Hessler, MacLean Hessler, and Dashiell Hessler
Cristina Cuomo and TR Pescod
Wide World of Ferrari Team: John Klopp, Julio Ezcurra, Mike Mastrangelo (owner and sponsor), Karen Klopp (co-chair), Kathryn Cox, Guy Merison, and Philip MacTaggart
Nick Korniloff, Pamela Cohen, Michaela Keszler, and Stephan Keszler
Photographs by  Peter Michaelis and Cutty McGill (Mashomack); Sandra Hamburg, courtesy of the Glass House; Patrick McMullan (SH Fresh Air Home).
Henry Urbach and Enrique Norten
Kate Gascoyne and Johanna Caine
Cathy Price, Sarah Senbahar, Leila Heller, and Danielle Ganek
Richard Farley and Chele Chiavacci
Cameron Mesirow and Tauba Auerbach
Kim White and David Ganek
Laura Lehmann
Castello di Vicarrelo Team (Woody Keesee, Adam Klopp, Carlo Baccheschi, Tatin Zubiare, and Nick Beinstock) with the Carlyle Hotel Team (Henry Zaveleta, Bryan Colley, Don Langlois, and Craig Callen)
Tauba Auerbach and Cameron Mesirow
Jay Sugarman, Miles Sugarman, and Arno Sugarman
Mayor Mark Epley, Michaela Keszler, and Marianne Epley
The CHAMPS! Gracious Home Team: Oakleigh Thorn, Francisco Lanusse, Ian MacTaggart, Joel Kier (owner), Bruce Colley, and Michelle McFaul (Nespresso)
Henry Urbach, Director of the Glass House addresses guests
Guests picnicing on the lawn at Glass House
The crowd roots for their favorites
Helen Williams, Diana DiMenna, and Claire DiMenna
Cliff Knight and Raya Knight
Carlos Mansur, Henry Zaveleta, and Caroline and Guy Merison
Andrea Greeven Douzet, Alexandre Douzet, Gigi Douzet, and Gabby Douzet
A model with Cindy Stebbins, Leslie Stevens, Jeanne Lawrence, and Pam Taylor Yates
Ted Lee, E.V. Day, and Irene Shum Allen
Cornelia Bregman and Kristen Krusen
Michael and Casey Karsch
Scott Drevnig and Jill Greenberg
Marko Dasigenis, Stover Jenkins, Hilary Lewis, and Alan Ritchie
Joel Post, Alix Toub, Philip Tube, and Julian Toub
Estevan Rael-Gálvez, Dana Evans, and Christy MacLear
Celebrating Brazilian style
Julian Camacho, Pamela Rollins Camacho, and Isabel Camacho
Doug Feagin, Tucker Johnston, and Frederick Masri
Pam Taylor Yates and Leslie Stephens warming up a Ferrari
Eugene Colley with NY State Troopers, who benefited from the day
Brazilian Team Mascot
Marco Cilia, Vanita Sabnani, Oriana Vargas, Parag Gupta, laura Lehmann, and Jon Fascitelli
Murray Moss and Franklin Getchell
Mildred Brinn and Kay Gilman
Dovile Drizyte, Lise Evans, and Laura Nicklas
Teams Ferrari and Dream battle it out
Vittorio Assaf, Lucia Hwong Gordon, Tom Naro, and Charlotte Assaf
Kris Togias, Marisa Drew, Chad Hudnut, and Stefan Beckman
Ali and Marina Wambold, Jeanne Lawrence, and Donald and Barbara Tober
John Klopp, Tom Flexner, Don Langlois, and Tom Flexner Jr. with friends
Katie Tozer and boys
Wide World of Ferrari cheerleader
Bottom: Peter Kuhlman, Susan and Joe Meyer (Pres of USPA), and Heather Croner  Top: Diana Gilmor, Michelle McFaul, David and Lindsay Baldwin, and friends
Todd Eberle and John Bennett
Julia Chiang and KAWS
Kim White, Mayor Mark Epley, Marianne Epley, and Melanie Wambold
Ferrari row – Wide World Ferrari entrance to field side luncheon and International Polo Challenge
David Yanks, Sadie Yanks, and Samantha Yanks
Teal Lochlan
Team Captains: Carlos Mansur, Dream Hotel; John Klopp, Wide World Ferrari; and Bruce Colley, Gracious Home
David White and Anthony Gammardella
Eric and Sandra Ripert
Diandra Douglas and Teresa Colley review silent auction
Chef Brian Lewis of Elm restaurant
Team Parade led by Ferrari and NY State Police Color Guard

Glenn Close
Joyce DiDonato and Andrew Cooper, Executive Chef of the Four Seasons, judge the tailgate picnic contest
Carl Musacchia and Rose Musacchia
Pamela Cohen, Nick Korniloff, Sara Herbert Galloway, and Barry Klarberg
Carl Spielvogel, Barbaralee Diamonstein Spielvogel, Matilda Raffa Cuomo, and fromer Governor Mario Cuomo
Ame Fine Collins
Susan Graham as Grand Duchess in The Grand Duchess of Gerolstein
Kevin Richards, Isabel Richards, and Hilga Richards
Barbara Taylor, Grace Richardson, Gail Landis, Iris Blanc, Wendeen Eolis, Denise Seegal, Barbara Friedman, Carol Nelson, Alair Townsend, and Susan Faulk
Nancy Licata and Scott Tucker
Elaine Hendrix
Pat Mitchell and Glenn Close
Troy Buckner, Pamela Cohen, and Hale Buckner
Alex McCord
Dancers from The Grand Duchess of Gerolstein at the Opening Night Cast Party for the Santa Fe Opera.
Patrons participate in a backstage tour of The Crosby Theatre
Patrons enjoy a pre-performance dinner at a private home as part of a three-day extravaganza to benefit The Santa Fe Opera.
Josh Guberman, Ryan Ross, Stephanie Hirsch, Tigran Tsitoghdzyan, Morgan Shara, and David Shara
Melissa Berkelhammer and Maggie Norris
Beverly Beaudoin, Deborah Baez, Pat Mitchell, and Irene Cohen
Dr. Joyce Brown, Maury Hanigan, Barbara Marcus, Anuradha Jayanti, Nancy Pedot, Mary Farrell, Annette Green, and Marcella Maxwell
Miles Robbins
Clif DeRaita and friend
The cast of The Grand Duchess of Gerolstein at the Opening Night Cast Party: Charles MacKay, Susan Graham, Anya Matanovič, Kevin Burdette, Paul Appleby, Emmanuel Villaume, Carey Ramos, and Catrina Bentley
Josh Guberman, Dr. Mathew Kaufman, Morgan Shara, and Ron Burkhardt
Nick Korniloff and Tatyana Okshteyan
Edward Cohen and William Morris
Jane Chesnutt, 2012 Awardee Barbara Tiye Giraud, Beverly Beaudoin, 2012 Awardee Sandra Stone, and Carolyn Carter
Nadia Kasakova and Tigran Tsitoghdzyan
Pamela Cohen, Madison Collum, and Carol Ross
(Back) Carolyn Carter, Lou Hammond, Rikki Kleiman, Patty Francy, Debra Bahr, and Jane Chesnutt (Front) Randy Guggenheimer II, Steven Guggenheimer, and Randy Guggenheimer III
Emily Fons as Cherubino and Lisette Oropesa as Susanna in The Marriage of Figaro
Cassandra Seidenfeld, Guest, Josh Guberman, Deborah Halpert, Scott Tucker, and Helene Creel
Ryan Ross, Samantha Yanks, Stephanie Hirsch, Keith Bloomfield, and Mark Mullett
China Tian, Cole Rumbough, Julianne Michelle, Joycelyn Engle, and Miriam Weisbecker
Brittani Bader and Katie Baiglova
Tailgate picnickers on opening night
Jade Toft, Cierra Walker, Allegra Rumbough, Knox McKay, and Cole Rumbough
Orlando Dugi and Ken Williams at The Grand Duchess of Gerolstein Opening Night Dinner
Lawrence Brownlee and Susan Morris
Eve Ensler, Pat Mitchell, and Maria Cuomo Cole in coversation
Julianne Michelle, W llie garson. I'll also agreeto ave not an apage bance lex iditsn engle.jpg
Doris Meister, Glenn Close, Eve Ensler, Pat Mitchell, Maria Cuomo Cole, Matilda Raffa Cuomo, and Beverly Beaudoin
Sean Stone
Nina McLemore, Vita Cassese, Rosita Sarnoff, Joni Nelson, Kay Unger, Gail Fosler, Barbara Giraud, Anita Volz Wein, and Cathleen Black
Lou Martini Jr.
Former Governor Mario Cuomo, Matilda Raffa Cuomo, Maria Cuomo Cole, Pat Mitchell, and Glenn Close
Photographs by Robert Christine (Elly Awards); A. Isadora for Rob Rich (Gallery Valentine).
Jane Chesnutt, Pat Mitchell, Barbaralee Diamonstein Spielvogel, former Governor Mario Cuomo, Lucy Jarvis, Carl Spielvogel, and Carolyn Carter
Beth Beloff, Peter Frank, Patricia Doyle, David Sontag, and Marc Geller
Nadia Kasakova, Marija Skara, and Morgan Shara
Doris Meister, former Governor Mario Cuomo, Ami Kaplan, Beverly Beaudoin, and Rikki Klieman
Urvi Tejani and Cassandra Seidenfeld
Kevin Burdette, Susanna Phillips, Susan Graham, and Clay Brakeley in the gardens of the Nedra Matteucci Galleries
Tom Pomeroy, Barbara Moore, Cindy Aloi, and Chuck Moore
Lauren Lawrence
Nick Nick Korniloff, Pamela Cohen, Morgan Shara, Stephanie Hirsch, Tigran Tsitoghdzyan, and Josh Guberman
The cast of The Marriage of Figaro at the Opening Night Cast Party: Susanna Phillips, John Nelson, Charles MacKay, Zachary Nelson, Daniel Okulitch, Emily Fons, Keith Jameson, Bruce Donnell, and Dale Travis
Santa Fe Opera House
Rikki Klieman and Awardee Riham Eihab
Martin Scnay and Helene Brenkman
Samantha Yanks and Stephanie Hirsch
Katia Friend, Glenn Close, Doris Meister, and Pat Mitchell
Josh Guberman, Nick Nick Korniloff, Pamela Cohen, Morgan Shara, Ryan Ross, and Dara Ross
Grand Ballroom, The Plaza Hotel
Susan Misner
Rita Cosby
Pamela Cohen, Nick Korniloff, Carolyne Levinbook, and David Levinbook

Amanda Smeal, Stefan Nowicki, Chris Daniels, and Elizabeth Siegel
Elijah Duckworth-Schachter and Katherine DeConti
Photographs by Paul Aizaga (Longhouse); Howard Wechsler (PAL)
Nophar Haimovitz, Raymundo Botelo, and Elad Barouch
Keith Connor
Timothy Szlyk and Robert Disanto of Thorin and Co.
Robert A. McNamara and Pamela J. Newman
Brian T. Moynihan, Raymond W. Kelly, John A. Catsimatidis, and Richard Silverman
Hope Herrlin
Claire Sawyers, Paul Deitz, Tovah Martin, and Matko Tomicic
Alexandra Porter and Max Sinsteden
Tony Piazza, Dianne B, and Pamela Choy
Christopher Wight and Stefanos Kasselakis
Barbara Berger and Harrice Miller
Nico Yektai
Julianna Young, Collins Ward, and Ludovica Ferme
Frederico Azevedo
Dennis Schrader
Adam Baron, Suvi Asch, and Jack deLashmet
Meredith Bernstein and Lawrence Vrba
Sarah Jane Gibbons and Fatima Sanandaji
Jack Larsen
Carolyn Kim and Christopher Allwin
John B. Osborn and Andrew M. Cuomo
Paula Deitz, Tovah Martin, and Jack deLashmet
Barbara Regna and Kamile Kupcinskaite
Amanda Muchnick and Jennifer Volmer
Constance and Jeffrey Brown
Joan McGuire and Charles A. Stillman
Lewis Kruger, Barbara Shuster, and Bryna Pomp
Margo Catsimatidis, Raymond W. Kelly, Veronica Kelly, and John A. Catsimatidis
The scene at LongHouse Reserve's annual horticultural event, PLANTERS: On + Off the Ground VI.
Laura and Lewis Kruger
Isabel  Erhardt
Andrew M. Cuomo, Raymond W. Kelly, and Robert J. McGuire
Whitney Lee and Tom Anderman
Sandra Kozlowski and Krystian von Speidel
Harvy Bernstein
Alexandra Leighton
Dennis Stattman and Barbara Tober with a friend
Carol  Schapiro and Charlotte  Loyazaga
Iris Apfel
Robert Goodfellow, Barbara Regna, and Mark Gilbertson
Robert and Barbara Taylor Bradford
Claire Carpenter and NormaTaylor
Bonnie Korn and her sister
Robert P. Morgenthau and John B. Osborn
Sam Dangremond, Micaela English, and Stefanos Kasselakis
Nate Berkus, Jeremiah Brent, and friends

Lojevsky, Julian Farrow, and Tatyana Akhmedova
HHH designers
Einat Katav and Stephanie Odegard
Mrs Qi and Esther Leong with Nazy Vassegh and guests
Katharina Plath and Amy Lau
Jose Arandia
Marshal Watson
Philip Hewat Jaboor and Tim Knox
Steering Committee member Carla Franklin, Museum's Curator of Astrophysics Michael Shara, and friend
Daniella Grosneid, Jeffrey Munger, and Ellenor Alcorn
Jeannette Gugelmann and Ted Fowler
Robert and Kathleen Whitby
James Michael Howard
Chelsea Pensioners at Masterpiece London
Marion and Philip Piro
Marianne Howatson, Andrea and Maurice Dubois, and Iris Dankner
William Thursby and Sloane Marcus
Jennifer Matthews and Amir Kazerani
Steering Committee member Emanuel Michael and Sandrina Bencomo
David Friedman and Rianne Karmin
Princess Eugenie
Uma Thurman
Jennie Ingram and Kate Pavlovich
Lucy and Nat Day
Mike Lackman and Ruth Ann Blankenheim
Michelle D'Souza and friend
Fawn Galli
Gabriella Babun (a Greenwich winner of Shakespeare Competition) and Anne Elser
Barbara and Jay Reibel
Nicola Winwood, Ellie Cullman, and Thomas Woodham Smith
Diane and Jeffrey Jennings, and Rosita Trinca
James Huniford
Ava Roosevelt, Paula & Robert Butler, Ambassador Brenda Johnson, and Malcolm Pray
Steering Committee member Joseph Shatz and friend
Simon Baker and Nazy Vassegh
Aaron Schurgin, Laura Beck, and Thom Filicia
Chip White
Malcolm Pray and Judy Richter
Jennifer Duneier
Nazy Vassegh, Elizabeth Esteve, and Mark Francis
Marianne Howatson, Kendell Cronstrom, and Iris Dankner
Donna Livingston and Robert Hooke
Malcolm Pray, and Joyce and Ted Fowler
Paula Butler and Bess Ames
Debbie Hamilton, and John and Marianne Wyman
Lyn and Scott Higgins
Hui Bai (center) and friends
Ellie Cullman and Thomas Woodham Smith with Kravis colleagues
Micky and Marsha Lyons
Allie Wise and Katherine Brown
Harry Apter and Rose Tarlow
Tamara Magel
Christopher Hyland and Constintino Castellano
Princess Beatrice
Elba and Inson Dubois Wood
Iris Dankner, Aerin Lauder, and Myra Biblowit
Anne Elser and Michael Kovner
Guillaume Gentet and Chelsey McLaren
Ally Coulter
Photographs by Rory Lindsay (Masterpiece London); Cutty McGill (Garden Party); R. Mickens (AMNH);
Scott Snyder and Kenneth Neame
Steering Committee members David and Sheila Barrett
Natalie Pray, Jim, Jennifer, and Alexis Campbell
Martin and Fiona Uden (British Diplomat and Speaker), and William Miller (National Chairman Emeritus of ESU)
Daniel Lombardi and Juan Chaves
Alison Vanderbilt and Alan Weeden
Steering Committee member Carla Franklin (center) and friends
Co-Chairs Lori and Zach Pomerantz
Libby Langdon
Aerin Lauder and Kendell Cronstrom
Ellie Cullman and Philip Hewat Jaboor
Nazy Vassegh, CEO of Masterpiece London, and Anna Wintour
Andrew and Imelda Petery
Constaino Castellano, Matt Smoak, Becky Fadden, Kyle Marshal, Christopher Hyland, Anne Metrailler, and Seth Pariser
Danielle Lerner with Co-Chairs Robin Roberts, Lori and Zach Pomerantz, and Brad Roberts
David Carpenter
Margaret Fisher and Pam Pagnani
Jean Doyen de Montaillou, Michael Kovner, and Jean and Richard Bergstresser
Robert Stilin and Pamela Eldridge
Aerin Lauder, Jennifer Mabley, and Austin Handler
Diana and Josiah Bunting (National Chairman of the ESU) , and Natalie Pray (President of the ESU, Greenwich)
Edward Hurst, Ruth Kennedy, and Evgeny Lebedy
Steering Committee member Alessia Menegon with Katia and Ariella Menegon
Collector with Elle Shushan
Michael Shara discusses stellar explosions
Robert Young and Ellie Cullman
Philip Hewat Jaboor and Harry van der Horn
Lynne Scalo and Michael Florio
Lady Weatherstone with Michael and Emily Lyons
Barber Osgerby outside the front of Masterpiece London
Poolside at the inaugural Holiday House Hamptons
Eric Vincent
Brigid Barry (Chairman of Education) and 3 teachers receiving ESU scholarships to British universities in 2013
Alex and Valerie Twerdahl

Jane Pontarelli, Andrea Warshaw, and Wendy Federman
John Michael Schert, Ilter Ibrahimof, Alejandro Cerrudo, and Daniel Cappello
Vincent Warren, MIchael Ratner, and Vanessa Redgrave
Pillow supporters Lynne Leavitt and Aaron Leavitt with their son Mark Leavitt, Pillow Board Member and Gala Co-Chair
Judy Gilbert, Hedy Park, and Suzan Kremer
Bonnie Comley
Monica Granillo
Marilyn Sokol and Joe Franklin
Jordan Matter and Dance Theatre of Harlem principal dancer Michaela DePrince
Girl Be Heard
Katelyn Platz, Julieanne Alonzo, and Laura Arayata
Alfonso Montiel, Jade Natanya, Gita Drury, and Ibrahim AlHusseini
Martin Monas and wife, former New York City Ballet Dancer Teresa Reyes
Jane Pontarelli, Steven Dann, and Debbie Polk
Albert Guditis
Stewart Lane and Bonnie Comley
Honey Brennan, Susan Rubell, Lola Pearl, and Darin Rubell
James Comley and Virginia Comley
Arlene Mark, Amy Milch, Romana Grant, and Kay Ziplow
Ron Hutchinson
Jacob's Pillow Board Chair Joan Hunter and Wendy Whelan
Raffle winner John Fewell
Tim Eustis and Sarah Eustis
Matt Flynn, Marcus Cammack, Carolyn Gitomer, James Grant, Robert Ballard, and Robert Frederick
Leah Lane
Carol Visconti and Sandy Teitelbaum
Allan Buchman
Joe Pizza and Joe Benincasa
Joe Benincasa
Filmmaker and video installation artist Liz Richards
Jen Kwok and Ricky Milburn
Graham Bannon and Angela Chen
Guests enjoying the clay bar
Melia Bensussen and Bonnie Comley
George Small
Lauren Embrey, Josh Mailman, and Monica Winsor
Arlene and Alan Lazare
First Lady Diane Patrick and Governor of Massachusetts Deval Patrick backstage with Jacob's Pillow Executive and Artistic Director Ella Baff, New York City Ballet star Wendy Whelan, soloist with the Martha Graham Dance Company Lloyd Knight
Rebecca Milikowsky and husband Nathan Milikowsky
Alyssa Renzi
Marla Novick, Linda Florin, and Kelly Gerber
Trav S.D.
Rhea Isaacs, John Farr, and Jill Brooke
Over 250 attended The Culture Project Commemorative gala and naming ceremony for its newly christened Lynn Redgrave Theater in honor of the late Ms. Redgrave.
First Lady Diane Patrick and Governor of Massachusetts Deval Patrick backstage with 2013 Jacob's Pillow Dance Award Winner Michelle Dorrance
Todd Robbins
Susan Rubell and Samanthe Lobosco
Marilyn Sokol
Joe Pizza, Ariela Pizza, and Lauren Pizza
Benjamin Juarez, Stephanie Trodello, and Stewart Lane
Stewart Lane and Joe Benincasa
Wendy Whelan and Lloyd Knight in Martha Graham's Canticle for Innocent Comedians (1952)
Franklin Bruno and Poor Baby Bree
Bill Hastings, Jacob's Pillow Director of Education J.R. Glover, The School at Jacob's Pillow Jazz/Musical Theatre Program Director and choreographer of PIPPIN Chet Walker, Jacob's Pillow Board member Wendy McCain, and Jacob's Pillow Director of Preservation Norton Owen
Clara Kukes and Olga Balaeskul
Frankie Lane and Lenny Lane
Stefano Brancato and Michael Goldfried
Jackie Glago and Isabella Katz
Daughter of Board Member Sylvia Pope, Rosamond Pope-Meyer, and husband Jake Meyer with Laura Sinott and son of Sylvia Pope, Albert Pope
Asya Gribov and Priya Pappu
Missy Lubliner and Andrea Warshaw
Guests screenprinting tote bags
Rod Kimball and Andy Sapora
Photographs by Rob Rich (Play for Pink, The Drama League Theater); Tina Lane (Jacob's Pillow); Yun Cee Ng (Art'venture).
Melia Bensussen
Kyra Sedgwick
Amber Ju, Dustin Mauldin, and Anisa Keith
Alyssi Renzi
Chris McDaniel
Raffle winner Erin Bond
Sheryl Schwartz
Chairperson Jane Pontarelli and Joe Pontarelli
Auctioneer Jay Mandarino
Claudia Perles with her son Joshua Perles
Ariela Pizza
Stanley Pine, Jane Pontarelli, and Jack McGowan
Alton Murray and Habiba Koroma
Phyllis Berman, Andrea Schlossberg, and Paula Modell
Vanessa Redgrave, Kyra Sedgwick, Kevin Bacon, and Trudie Styler
Brenda Axelrod, Patty Greenberg, Lisa Konsker, and Carol Visconti
Stewart Lane
Michelle Dorrance
Diana Ziv, Cindy Brahms, and Ann Haselkorn
Joe Benincasa, Stewart Lane, and James J. Heinze
Lori Feren, Li Jun Xian, and Jessica French
James J. Heinze, Albert Guditis, and Stewart Lane
James Martindale and Diane Martindale
Lauren and Joe Pizza
Lauren Embrey, Loreen Arbus, and Monica WInsor
Marianna Gunther
Allan Buchman, Christine Ponz, Bill Robinson, and Amanda Quaid
Vanessa Redgrave
Perri Petricca, Gala Committee Member, and fiancée Michelle Thorpe
Gala Chairs Alfred Kahn and Jillian Crane
Nicole Reeber, John Farr, and Jill Brooke
Back row: Asya Gribov, Grace Johnstone, Julieanne Alonzo, Li Jun Xian, Jessica French, Cassandra Kohilakis, John Murphy, and Emily Tella. Front row: Megan O'Brien and Lori Feren
Jade Ullmann, Hugh Evans, Tanyella Evans, Jodie Evans, Nadia Malik, Ibrahim AlHusseini, Gita Drury, Matt Palevski, Molly Sonsteng, Chelsea Brown, Sam Utne, and Jamie Abelson
Jacob's Pillow Board member and Gala Co-Chair Christopher Jones with Jacob's Pillow Board Chair Joan Hunter
Eva Haller with Steve and Ruth Hendel
Andrea Schlossberg

Deborah Roberts and Gillian Miniter
HSS Trustee and Dinner Co Chair Alan MacDonald with Patti Roberts
Alex Egan, Celene Menschel, Ronay Menschel, and Chairman Emeritus, HSS Board of Trustees, Richard Menschel
Mayor Michael Bloomberg, Kathleen O’Hare, Dinner Chair Nelson Peltz, and Co Chair, HSS Board of Trustees, Dean O’Hare
Sylvia Vogelman, Michael Sennott, Joan Garry, Lisa Sherman, Terrence Meck, Breton Alberti, and Scott Bruckner
Amb. Ido Aharoni
Tish Certo, Susan Cullman, and John Kirby
Ona Wang and Dr. Steve K. Lee
Vince Camuto and Louise Camuto
Gillian and Serena Miniter
Michael Sennett, Karen Pearl, Scott Bruckner, Laura Michalchyshyn, and Chris Poore
Gail Perl, Co-President of WIZO USA, Mireille Manocherian, Fortune Dushey, Victoria Sakhai, and Evelyn Sommer, Founding President of WIZO USA
Gillian and Sylvester Miniter
Jeff Pfeifle, Sue Chalom, Dennis Basso, Scott Bruckner, and Geoffrey Bradfield
Dr. Oheneba Boachie Adjei, chief of the Scoliosis Service, Hospital for Special Surgery, Dr. Miles Vern, and Barry and Lila Bloom
Scott Bruckner and T.R. Pescod
Stefanie Offit, Dan Offit, Ned Offit, Nancy Offit, and Morris Offit
Jody Geist, Bill Geist, Willie Geist, Bonnie Strauss, and Paula Stein
John DeLuci, Stephanie Smith, and Mark Amadei
Alan Rogers, Charlotte Moss and John Yunis
Jon and Rebecca Bond
Marci Waterman, Chair of WIZO NY, and Gail Perl, Co-President of WIZO USA
Bob Joyce, Seth Goldman, Ron Hersh, Paul Bruce, and Dan London
Celene Menschel and Alex Egan
Janet and Dr. David Levine with Marina Kellen French
Photographs by Don Pollard (HSS); Patrick McMullan (God's Love); BIlly Farrell (CPC)
Jamie Mitchell and Lauren Schor Geller
Brad Learmonth, Jon Gilman, Haim Hassin and Jean Fleischhacker
Ann Jackson and Kendrick Wilson, III, co chair Board of Trustees Hospital for Special Surgery and Vice Chairman BlackRock with Cynthia and Dr. Thomas Sculco, surgeon in chief, Hospital for Special Surgery
Dan Wright, Laura Michalchyshyn, and Chris Poore
Louis Shapiro, CEO, Hospital for Special Surgery, Mayor Michael Bloomberg, Ann Jackson, and Kendrick Wilson, III, co chair Board of Trustees Hospital for Special Surgery and Vice Chairman BlackRock
Randy Kempner, Tony Ingrao, Louise Camuto, and Vince Camuto
Co Chair, HSS Board of Trustees, Dean O’Hare and Greg Georgieff
Sandra Ripert and Angela Stulley
John DeLucie
Ned Allie, Lester Weingarten, Richard Haney Jardine, and Maurice Mann
Kendrick Wilson, III, co chair Board of Trustees Hospital for Special Surgery and Vice Chairman BlackRock and HSS Trustee Robert K. Steel
Dr. Oheneba Boachie Adjei, chief of the Scoliosis Service, Hospital for Special Surgery, and Brian Williams, NBC Nightly News anchor
Pablo Alfaro, Anne Dexeter Jones, and Mark Amadei
Perry Eisman, Karen Pearl, andPeter Lichtenthal
Jon Gilman and Brad Learmonth
David Ludwigson, Doron Sabag, Jim Hoffman Faris and Karen Naber
Allison London and Katie Loeb
Grace and Chris Meigher with Peter and Martha Webster
Richard, Jane and Jeffrey Novick
Candy Bonder, Mark Lehrer, Gaby Lehrer and Karen Pearl
HSS Trustee and Dinner Co Chair Kathryn Chenault with Chairman Emeritus, HSS Board of Trustees, Aldo Papone
Haley Binn and Jason Binn
Michael Librett, Shana Librett, Stephen Cavello, Peter Panagiotopoulos, and Nick Kavallieratos
Nancy Chetrit, Gail Perl, and Jill Martin
Dr. Oheneba Boachie Adjei addresses guests after receiving the Lifetime Achievement Award
Jeff Feingold, Nancy Rackoff, Paula Stein, Amy Leeds, Nancy Wolk, and Harold Strauss
Fortune Dushey and Tanya Zuckerbrot
Dr. Philip Wilson Jr., surgeon in chief emeritus, Hospital for Special Surgery, Hilda Boachie Adjei , Dr. Oheneba Boachie Adjei, chief of the Scoliosis Service, Hospital for Special Surgery, Mayor Michael Bloomberg, HSS Trustee Patsy Warner, Louis Schapiro, CEO, Hospital for Special Surgery, Dr. Thomas Sculco, surgeon in chief, Hospital for Special Surgery, and Cynthia Sculco
Suzanne and Bob Cochran
Marcelle Serure, Vivian Dayan, and Fortune Dushey
Louise Camuto, Vince Camuto and God's Love We Deliver Board member Margaret Russell
Matthew Smyth and Christopher Idone
Cory Ingram and Louise Camuto
Mark Lanspa, Rebecca Bond and William Wright
HSS Trustee Patricia Warner, and Mayor Michael Bloomberg
Jane and Dr. Michael Lockshin
Dr. Peggy Crow with Steve and Laura Robbins and Craig Ivey
Dr. Douglas E. Padgett, and Debra and Dr. Bernard A. Rawlins
Michael Sennott, Karen Pearl and Terry Meehan
Trevor Gibbons, Cynthia Sculco, Sarah Jane Gibbons, and Dr. Thomas Sculco, surgeon in chief, Hospital for Special Surgery
Veronica Henkel and Em Findley
Dr. Oheneba Boachie Adjei, chief of the Scoliosis Service, Hospital for Special Surgery, Hilda Boachie Adjei, Dr. Thomas Sculco, surgeon in chief, Hospital for Special Surgery, Cynthia Sculco, and Mayor Michael Bloomberg
Fran Klingenstein, Fran Ehrlich, and Karen Cohen
Norman Selby and Eran Broshy
Jeffrey Toobin and Amy Mcintosh
Dr. David Altchek, Sports Medicine and Shoulder Service co chief, Hospital for Special Surgery, with his wife Anne Altchek
Penny Zuckerwise and Barbra Locker
Mayor Michael Bloomberg and HSS Trustee William Salomon
Boathouse Crabcakes
Margarette Dweck, Celia Cayre, and Ronni Chera
Guests listen to Nelson Peltz, Dean O’Hare, Dr. Oheneba Boachie Adjei, chief of the Scoliosis Service, Hospital for Special Surgery, Dr. Thomas Sculco, surgeon in chief, Hospital for Special Surgery, Mayor Michael Bloomberg, and Brian Williams speak throughout the evening at Hospital for Special Surgery's 30th Annual Tribute Dinner.
Barbara Cirkva and Bob Schumacher
Brian Cleek (PGA), Justin Maher (Giants), Leogh Weiss (Giants), and Dara Cattani
Jerry Madigan and Jamie Zimmerman
Alan Rogers and David Ludwigson
Michael Reed, Joan and Barrie Damson, HSS trustee, HSS Trustee Craig Ivey, and Chelsea Reed
Julie Lichtstein, Michelle Francis, Lisa Sherman, and Vivian Pollack
Dr. Edward Craig, HSS Trustee and Dinner Co Chair Patricia Warner, and Brian Williams
Gods Love Staff
Karen Pearl, Vicente Wolf, and Margaret Russell
LaMont Craig, David Ludwigson, Jon Gilman and Barbra Locker
HSS Trustee Herbert Black and Louis Shapiro, CEO, Hospital for Special Surgery
David Wine, Robby Browne and friends
Commissioner Ray Kelly and Veronica Kelly
Mayor Michael Bloomberg, Emme Deland, Veronica St. Pierre, HSS Trustee Herbert Black, and Dr. Jonathan Deland
Alexandra Richards
Hunt Slonem and Liliana Cavendish
Edgar Cullman and Ellie Cullman
Kinue Fowler
Valerie Steele, Nancy Shaw, Yaz Hernandez, Michael Kors, Liz Peek, Carole Divet Harting, Jean Shafiroff, Chiu-ti Jansen, Michele Gerber Klein, Jieun Wax, Kamie Lightburn, Eleanora Kennedy, and Stephanie Loeffler at  a private event at Michael Kors Madison Avenue store (790 Madison Avenue) for members of the Couture Council of The Museum at FIT.
Claire Cloud and James Burke
Julie Macklowe, Liz Peek, and Carole Divet Harting
Nassau Community College 'flappers' welcome guests Jed Morey and Eden White
Clair Glover
Zachary Quinto and Lily Rabe
Dr. Stephen and Sharon Cuchel (Board Secretary) with Barbara and Timothy Schmidt
Finale with founders and designers, Marion de Vogel and Rowena Gill
Kevin Kline, Jonathan Groff, Martin Short, Anika Noni Rose, Glenn Close, Eric Idle, and the company of The Pirates of Penzance
Colleen Hartling
Celia Hegyi, Michael Kors, and Alexandra Lebenthal
Ken Auletta and friend
Laura Lofaro Freeman, Yaz Hernandez, and Diane Herdling
Dede Rosenfeld and Gloria Callen
Francesca Palombo
Marion de Vogel
Deborah Chatman and Valerie Steele
David Barse, Michael Dorf, John Pizzarelli, and Joan Osborne
Nancy Shaw and Jacqueline Togut
Anju Gupta, Anita Chester, Tony Roselle, and Deepak Gupta
David Moore, Bruce Ratner, Brett Yormark, Alison Tocci, and David Barse
Museum supporters Jacob and Esther Ambalu with Board Member Corky Paston and George Kittredge
Jon Mechanic and Elaina Scotto
Ball Committee Member Connie Carr, with Board Member Dr. Harvey Manes
Ball Committee Member Cora Michalis, Museum Director Dr. Karl Willers, Museum Founding President Hon. Arnold A. Saltzman, Board Member Dr. Todd Cohen, and Joan Saltzman
Members of the Ball Committee: Kimberly Bancroft, Irina Shushko, Connie Carr, Thalia Elie, Angela Susan Anton, Natalia Good, Esther Ambalu, Sara Ambalu, Gayle Finkelman-Cohen, Karen Loeffler, and Eve Califano.
Chiu-ti Jansen
Bruce Ratner
Everett Cook, Libby Mavroleon, and Nina Griscom
Public Theater Chairman of the Board Warren Spector and friend
Landy Erlick, Jim Erlick, and Nikki Erlick
Eleanora Kennedy, Jacqueline Togut, and Nancy Shaw
Public Theater Gala Co-Chair Renée Beaumont and husband Michael Corcoran
Mike Silverman and Emily Whipple
Barbara and Donald Tober
Eugenia Revson, Dotty Smith, and Lionel Goldfrank
Julie Macklowe, William Macklowe, and Eleanora Kennedy
Lance LePere, Catherine Gund, Tanzin, and Michael Kors
Mimi Lieber and Daniel Sullivan
John and Patricia Forelle
Paul Shaffer, Steve Martin, and Peter Asher
Museum supporters George Machin and Nancy DeMatteis with Arlene Levine and Board Vice President Arthur Levine
Crowd watching the Millbrook Hunt approaching Wethersfield
Susan Werman and Rhonda Ran
Lizanne Rosenstein (right) and friend
Members of the Ball Committee: Judie Chessin, Kandice Seitz, and Linda Ugenti
Members of the Millbrook Hunt
John Legend
Sting and Oskar Eustis
Rob Murphy and Ling Kwan serenade
Roseanne Morrison, Yaz Hernandez, and Jean Shafiroff
Jason Kidd and Porschla Coleman
Debra Wasser and Mary Turano
Jieun Wax and Kamie Lightburn
Lary Wolf, Susan Freedman, Jon Mechanic, and Bruce Ratner
Lexi Novak
Quinn Babcock, Emily Hottensen, and friend
Laurie Eustis and David Rockwell
Olivia Flatto and Dina DeLuca Chartouni
Rowena Gill and Marion de Vogel moments before the show
Helen Blodgett and her daughter, Natasha
Museum Director Dr. Karl Willers with Susan Isaksen and 2012 Ball Honoree Bob Isaksen
Public Theater Artistic Director Oskar Eustis and Meryl Streep
Photographs by Simon Luethi (Public Theater); Mary Hilliard (La Chasse); Sylvester Zawadzki & Merissa Blitz (City Parks); Tab Hauser & Scott Levy (Nassau County Museum)
Carola Lott and Susie Clarke
Caroline Geerlings, Lorna Graev, Fernanda Kellogg, and Podie Lynch
Oskar Eustis, NYC Commissioner of the Department of Cultural Affairs Kate Levin, and Jacob Bernstein
Parker Gentry Thorne
Liz Peek, Valerie Steele, and Yaz Hernandez
Guests congregate on the Wethersfield Estate in Millbrook, NY
Deborah Montgomery and Marc McLean
Rebecca Creavin and M. Patricia Janco-Tupper, co-chairs of the Ball's Journal Committee; Nassau County Comptroller George Maragos; Museum Director Dr. Karl Willers, and Ball Chairman Angela Susan Anton show off a congratulatory proclamation from the county
Michael Dorf, Alison Tocci, Lisa Barse, John Pizzarelli, Joan Osborne, and David Barse
Nicole Mancini and Kay Facatselis
Kevin Kline, Jonathan Groff, Martin Short, Anika Noni Rose, and Eric Idle during the curtain call of The Pirates of Penzance
John Klopp, Colleen Howland, Karen Klopp, and Kevin Smith
Chris McInerney and Liz Peek
Deban Flexner and Pam Taylor Yates
Cindy Rinfret, Aundrea Amine, Nancy Shaw, Elizabeth Galt, Nicole Reynolds, Jieun Wax, Emma Pennington, and Shelly Lynch
Wilbur Ross and Hilary Ross
Jean Shafiroff, Cindy Rinfret, Michael Kors, Jieun Wax, Shelly Lynch, and Patricia Shiah
Stephanie Loeffler, Valerie Steele, and Kamie Lightburn
Emma Pennington, Elizabeth Galt, and Nicole Reynolds
Kirk Henckels

Nonplussed.
Rick Erickson, Diana Langer holding Stanley Sweetheart, Jenny Finn, Dr. Morleen Rouse and behind her Sandrina Parker, John Roberts and Barbara Kraisman with Sadie.
Sara Gore, Beth Stern, and Jacque Reid with Hailey and Mama, two furry sisters who are in need of a loving home.
Andrew Le Pera and Fashion designer Maggie Norris.
Caroline and Catherine Loevner with Beau.
William Green and Kim Valentini with Charlie, Gabriella Rosetta, and Sofia Pietra.
Stacy McCosky with Sadie.
Cutting loose on the dance floor.
Georgina Bloomberg at the podium invoking Bideawee’s 110-year history and multiple programs and services.
The scene at Gotham Hall.
A good time was had by all dancing to the sounds of the Alex Donner Orchestra.
Maura Rose with Alfie.
The photographers in action getting their furry subjects’ attention with a squeaky rubber chicken.
Karen Biehl with Eli and Jorge Bendersky.
Everyone has a place at the table.
Dr. Michael Waltz and Cookie holding on to Wolfie.
Tom Murro, Georgina Bloomberg, and Kaitlin Monte.
Adrian Jones and Kristen Martinez Jones with their lovable pooch.
Beth Stern, Georgina Bloomberg and Georgina’s faithful companion, Mona.
Larry Goldfarb with Biggie.
Dr. Keith Manning, Enid Manning, and Charlie.
Mary Luria, Chairman of Bideawee’s Board of Directors and Nancy Taylor, President and CEO.
Todd Richter with Henry. Henry’s days were numbered in a shelter when Bideawee got hold of him. He now leads an enviably posh life and couldn’t be more loved.
Leslie and Stuart Campbell.
Remmel Dickinson, Pamela Laudenslager, and Lucy.
Leslie Granger and Henry.
Elysa Goldman, Kristina Belon, and Laura Kirschbaum
Marc Rosen and Coco Kopelman
Richard Mortimer, Dennis McAvena, and Elizabeth Hagins
Sutton Stracke and Shawna Hamilton
Janet Mavic, David Butters, Kim Bepler, and Charlotte Moss
Michael Samuelian, Susannah Drake, Susan Freedman, Shaun Donovan, Liza Gilbert, and James Capalino
Scott Griffin, Samantha Fischer, Tanya Baskin, and Ronnie Aroesty
Angela Hopen and Amy Gallen
Peter Kovacs and Zoli Kovacs
Ric Barbatelli, Stephanie Barbatelli, and Barbara Ostrom
Paul Needham and Eugenie L. Birch
Ronnie Aroesty, Gary Nusser, Sara Panag, Ailene Mitchell, Sanjay Bhatnagar, and Dennis Merens
Zia Khan
Bob Hallman, Patti Bressman, and Katie Ginsberg
Greg Pasquarelli, Amanda Garrett, Chris Sharples, and Michael Stern
Dr. Ottavio Arancio and Cetie Ames
Jennifer Rapp, Julio Peterson, and Simone Levinson
Joe Versace, Ashton Hawkins, Julie Gilhart, Toby Usnik, and John Moore
Thomas Woltz and Claire Bonham Carter
Photographs by Patrick McMullan (MAS); David Dupuy/www.AnnieWatt.com (CELF)
Annemarie diSalvo and Gregory Giannotti
Peter and Katie Ginsberg, Maya Browne, and Laurence Pels
Reagan Gamon, Linda Gelz, Camilla Rockefeller, and Nannie Brown
Tina Flaherty, Peter Karadimas, and Madeline Wils
Lisa Evans
David Patrick Columbia and Arlene Dahl
Bob Waggoner, Mary Ellen Waggoner, and David Bartsch
Matthew Sturtevant, Tracey Thomas, and Michael Woodside
Arianna Rockefeller and Charles Rockefeller
Barbara Page, Steven Bernstein, and Libby Langdon
Bradley Stephens and Elizabeth Hagins
Stephen Lash and Celine McDonald
Jonathan Rose, Nina Friedman, Michael Rosenbaum, and Laurie Beckelman
Lynette Smith, Gordon Davis, Michelle Fizer-Peterson, Julio Peterson, Diane Coffey, John Ray, Ali Lebow, Eric Smith, and Nina Freedman
Patti Bressman, Mikkel Vestergaard Frandsen,  Katie Ginsberg, and Ernie Anastos
Vin Cipolla
Chris Nenno and Xanthe Ranger
Sherrill Canet and Jonathan Kutzin
Frank Mahan, Carson Griffith, Colin Koop, and Daniel Cashin
Brenda Levin, Louise Kerz Cullman, Lewis Cullman, Hazel Shore, and Elizabeth Strong-Cuevas
Ben Rodriguez, Greg Morey, Rosalie Lowe, Scott James, and Billy Wright
Brad Shar, Lisa Wyer, and Michael Arbini
Ari Goldstein, Katherine Kelman, Elysa Goldman, Laura Kirshcbaum, Kristina Balon, and Joaquin Stearns
Scott James and Catherine Sabino
Keith Baltimore, Kim Hendrickson-Radovich, and Ken Gemes
Brian del Toro, Lynne Scalo, and Michael H. Florio
Mario Buatta and Jamie Drake
Hailey Gates
Diana Chasik and Mary Bleiberg
Tom Baione and EJ Lee
Mario Buatta and Jim Druckman
Norman Foster, Elena Foster, Peter Eisenmann, Cynthia Davidson, Vishaan Chakrabarti, and Maria Alataris
Rick Heinemann and Barbara Peabody
Toby Usnik, Lisa Evans, Vin Cipolla, Simone Levinson, and David Levinson
Jay Kreiger, Michelle Pfeizer Peterson, Leslie Koch, Julio Peterson, Elizabeth Belfer, and Vin Cipolla
Tony Manning and Jamie Drake
John Bricker, Julia Simet, and Tom Vecchione
Frances Cashin, Dick Cashin, Liza Cashin, David Patrick Columbia, Alexandra Stoddard, and Philip Howard
Patricia Fisher and Michael Herold
David Rockefeller Jr.
Janice Langrall and Bryant Keller
Paul Washington and Dan Sagner
Arie Kopelman
Sharon Davis, William M King, Barbara Peabody, Mark Rockefeller, and Donna Dean
Beth McDonough, Irene Diaz-Palomo, and Sara Rossi
Jay Kreiger, Louise Kerz Cullman, Hazel Shore, and Lewis Cullman
Elaine Postley, John Postley, and Helen Tucker
Judith Rodin
Chris Roth, Keith Douglas, Tom Madden, and JW Victor
Sam Peabody and Lisa Meyer
Bill Schroeder and Lisa Nagle
Joel Sanders, William M King, and Paul Gunther
Chris Roth and Alexia MacIntosh
Janet Ross, Adrian Ross, and Emilie Bombardier
Ashton Hawkins and Moira Moynihan
Matt Tyrnauer
Bunty Armstrong, Ernie Anastos, and Amory Armstrong
CELF Tribeca Rooftop Gala
Shari Patrick, Abbe Heller, and Donna Dean
Alexandra Stoddard and David Patrick Columbia
Susan Freedman, Mark Lebow, Patti Harris, David Rockefeller Jr., Susan Rockefeller, and Toby Usnik at The Municipal Art Society's annual benefit gala.
James McGuire and Michelle Coppedge

Lily Tom, Jodi Silver, Giselle Stolper, and Lloyd Sederer
East Harlem Dreamers with Nancy Restrepo Wilson (East Harlem Program Director) and Thierry Cazeau ("I Have A Dream" New York Executive Director)
Cheryl Wills
Brooklyn Borough President Marty Markowitz (honoree), WABC-TV Anchor Lori Stokes (emcee), National Grid President for New York Ken Daly (honoree), Executive Director of the Weeksville Heritage Center Pamela Green, Vice President, Associate General Counsel for JetBlue Airways Brandon Nelson (honoree)
WABC-TV Anchor Lori Stokes with daughter Alex who performed at the awards benefit
Ingrid Saunders-Jones
Kenneth Fisher and Eric K. Shinseki
Diana Gaines and Guests
Eric Shinseki and Kenneth Fisher
Dennis and Susan Schneider
Elisha Rhodes, Local YWCA Association Leader
Kevin Danehy, Lawrence Calcano, and Scott Cutler
The ballroom at 583 Park
Steven and Roger Golub
Kevin and Sheri Danehy
Dara Richardson-Heron, M.D., Patty Stonesifer, Zoe Dunning, Eva Longoria, Sharon Love, and Victoria Dinges
Kenneth Fisher and Family
The 2012-2013 YWCA USA Board, with Eva Longoria and Dara Richardson-Heron, M.D.
Joseph D'Amelio, Dana D'Amelio, Alexa D'Amelio, Rose D'Amelio, Cam D'Amelio, and Frank D'Amelio
Fares and Mirna Noujaim
Honorary Chair Keija Minor, editor-in-chief of Brides Magazine, and Trevor Scotland
Commander Zoe Dunning, S.C. USNR (Ret.)
Carl Banks, Sue Herera and Carlos Watson
Howard Cross, Tamsen Fadal, and Rich “Big Daddy” Salgado
Frank Branchini
National Grid President for New York Ken Daly receives award from Executive Director of the Weeksville Heritage Center Pamela Green
Giselle Stolper
Weeksville Heritage Center’s new Certified LEED Gold Sustainable Education and Cultural Arts Building.
Michael Amante
Scott Cutler
Rebecca Hall
Photographs by Julie Skarratt (Weeksville); Patrick McMullan & John Vecchiolla (Calvary)
Carlos and Claire Hernandez
East Harlem Dreamers with Thierry Cazeau ("I Have A Dream" New York Executive Director)
Howard Cross, Joseph Peyronnin III, and Kevin Danehy
Guests attend the 12th Annual “Save The Memories of Self” Awards Benefit in Weeksville’s new Education and Cultural Arts Building
Cynthia Zirinsky and Roz Nester
Bruce Mosler
Cynné Hall
John Draper, Giselle Stolper, Kenneth Fisher, Eric Shinseki, Kevin Danehy, and Howard Cross
Rosemary DiVito, Matt McKenna, Nancy McKenna, and Larry Bradley
Weeksville Heritage Center’s new Certified LEED Gold Sustainable Education and Cultural Arts Building
Executive Director Pamela Green addresses guests in Weeksville’s new Education and Cultural Arts Building
Diahn and Tom McGrath
Dwight Hollier, Eric Shinseki, and John Draper
Ingrid Saunders-Jones and Eva Longoria
Brooklyn Borough President Marty Markowitz with Executive Director of the Weeksville Heritage Center Pamela Green
Carlos Watson and DeHostos-Wise Dreamers
Richard McKeon, Jan Kemp, Eric Shinseki, and John Draper
Local YWCA Association Leaders
Patty Stonesifer and Francie Pepper
East Harlem Dreamers
Dr. John Connolly and Ingrid Connolly
Eugene Lang with DeHostos-Wise Dreamers and Original Dreamer, Alma Ceballos
Frank Calamari and Manfred Altstadt
Guests attend the 12th Annual “Save The Memories of Self” Awards Benefit
Loreen Arbus and Eva Longoria
Chancellor Merryl Tisch and Samir Talati (Principal of P.S. 7)
John Decina, Barbara Decina, and Dr. Christopher Comfort
Eva Longoria
Dr. Thomas Fahey, Jr. and Eleanor Fahey
Phil Binaso, Tuhina De O'Connor, and Robert Chang
Tamsen Fadal and Giselle Stolper
Denise Shearer and Colleague
Guests in front of the three remaining historic Weeksville houses
Dr. Michael Brescia and Dr. Robert Brescia
Commissioner John B. King Jr.
Eva Longoria and Dr. Dara Richardson-Heron
Steven Golub, Dr. Thomas Fahey, Jr., Frank D'Amelio, Frank Calamari, and John Gambling

Bill Rudin, Deputy Mayor Bob Steel, Honoree Frank Bisignano, Warrie Price, and emcee Melissa Francis
Jay Cantor and Douglas Thomas
Allison Carter Thomas
Bill Rudin, Sabrina Leichter, and Michael Rudin
Stanford and Sandra Warshawsky
Tiki Barber and Traci Lynn Johnson
Table decor by Van Vliet and Trap.
Lenay Dunn
The table centerpieces
Deborah Krulewitch, Warrie Price, and Paul Wagner
Alina Cho, Executive Director Matthew VanBesien, and Alec Baldwin
Elizabeth Right, Andrew and Zibby Right, Jessica Cosmus, and Jonathan Right
Museum Trustee Christine Varney, Councilman Domenic Recchia, and Museum President Ellen V. Futter
Renata and Gunther Greiner
Harold Mitchell
Joanna Steinberg, Matt Makovsky, Leandra Medine, and Danielle Segal
Ursula Striker, Didi Schafer, Roseanne Jowitt, and Daisy Soros
Ted Sperling and Philharmonic Violinist Na Sun
A. Eugene Kohn and Honey Kurtz
Didi Schafer and Alec Baldwin
Adam Friedman and Sarah Golden
Photographs by  Linsley Lindekins (Philharmonic); D. Finnin (AMNH); Cutty McGill (Battery).
Alex Reese and Alison Spear
Karen LeFrak and Chairman Gary W. Parr
Joan K. Davidson and Tom Phifer
Daria Foster and Paulo Szot
Deputy Mayor Bob Steel, Parks Commissioner Veronica White, and The Battery Conservancy Chairman Bill Rudin
Museum President Ellen V. Futter and Honoree Michael Corbat
Eric Wallach and Daria Foster
Museum Trustee Roger Altman, Michael and Donna Corbat, Douglas Brinkley
Charles and Anne Niemeth
Harry Connick, Jr., Adrienne Arsht, Jessica Molaskey, John Pizzarelli, and Alec Baldwin at the New York Philharmonic's Spring Gala benefit.
Liz Atwood and Honoree Stephen Doyle
William Ivey Long, Karen Akers, Elizabeth Scott, Adrienne Arsht, Harry Connick, Jr., and Chairman Gary W. Parr
Cocktails in the Theodore Roosevelt Rotunda
Ellen and Howard Katz
Samantha Whiting and Benner Ulrich
Karen Akers and Marin Mazzie
Kimberly Strauss
Sharon Carpenter
Tracy Bisignano, Honoree Frank Bisignano, Morgan Bisignano, and Sam Lituchy
Taryn Clary
Philharmonic Violinist Hae-Young Ham and Mickey Ateyeh
Peter and Barbara Georgescu
Dinner in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
Jessica Molaskey and John Pizzarelli
Marin Mazzie and Paulo Szot
Barbara and Donald Tober
Mary Wallach
Warrie and Jim Price
Event Chair Joanna Steinberg, Host Leandra Medine, and Event Chair Danielle Segal
Susan Rose and John Corigliano
Kenneth and Noreen Buckfire
Carol Schaefer, Peg Knight, Elaine Petschek, and Anne Niemeth
Actor Chaske Spencer
Alli, Michael, and Donna Corbat
Gurnee and Marjorie Hart
Rich Clary and Genie Birch
Fernanda Kellogg and Kirk Henckels
Deeda Blair,Deborah Needleman, Bill Rudin, and Sabrina Leichter
Alexandra Leighton and Alexander Benet
Honoree Michael Corbat; Museum President Ellen V. Futter; Citi Chairman Michael O'Neill; Museum Trustee, former Citi Chairman, and current Senior Advisor of Providence Equity LLC Richard Parsons
Jane Gregory Rubin
Warrie Price and Reed Rubin
Robert Gorrie
Executive Director Matthew VanBesien and Harry Connick, Jr.
Andrew and Zibby Right with Elizabeth Right
Hara Schwartz and Chris Buck
Douglas Thomas, Suzanne Clary, and Carl Pforzheimer
George and Wendy David, Anais Touton, Donna Corbat, and James Perriam
Executive Director Matthew VanBesien and Rosanne Jowitt
Alli and Donna Corbat, Wendy David, and Anais Touton
Roseanne Jowitt, Paulo Szot, and Alina Cho
Ambassador Donald and Vera Blinken

Greening Our Children Chairs: Wendy Mindel Rubenstein, Rachel Weiss, Amy Moss Clark, Jeanine Behr Getz, David B. Murphy, Anne Ogilvy, Jill Brack, Maura Mandell, Lisa Ryan Boyle, and Annalise Stack
Director of H.S. Placement and Alumni Affairs Teneka Hardy and Assistant to the Head of School Leah Lescouflair
Vivian Panou, Tony Polyviou, and Christine Kostantakis
Jill Coyle and Eunice Burnett
Alexandra Bergstein, Jiyuen Lee, and Hyunja Kenner
Jill Coyle, Carol Henderson, and Wendy Henderson
Trustee Michael Stubbs with Franz Skryanz, Honoree Kathleen McCarthy-Skryanz, and Storefront Artist in Residence Matthias Leutrum
Chris Mack and Sandi Farkas
AIS Board Chair Nolan Russo Jr. Eve Tannery, Linda Russo, and Nolan Russo, Sr.
Black and White Extravaganza at Riverside Church
Dean of Students Mel Chan with Storefront Faculty Joe Brenner and James Amodeo
Susie Schnall, Rachel Weiss, and Judith Martin
Jenny Morgenthau, William Lauder, and Carla Hall
Jane Power and Nobu Aozaki
Rachel Khanna, Kathy Cohen, Amy Kalafa, and Audrey Chan
Storefront parent Al Gumbs, Head of School Wendy Reynoso, and Storefront parent Shareen Gumbs
Joelle Abi-Habib and Ashley Margraf
Honorees from the Morgan Stanley Black Employees Networking Group Bianca Smith and Dana Hariton
Carol Goldberg and Michael Cohn
Nan Johnson, Allyson Cowan, and Cynthia Chang-Scanlan
Sander and Mechele Flaum
Honoree Jessica Alba
Garrett Brignoli, Megan Przywara, Stephanie Koscielski, and Joy Salazar
Bruce Willis and Chris Madden
Nancy Fazzinga and Ashley Allan
Jennifer Boyd, Gil Kernan, and Brittany Chamberlin
Storefront Development Associates Charles Sanchez and Paulette Clark
Kathy Lozier, Jeanine Behr Getz, and Crashy Brown
Debbie Miron and Carrie Heffernan
Storefront Parent April Bobyn, Cheryl Goodwin-Pittman, Jim Anderson and Assistant Head of School Michael Williams
Katherine Ransdell and Misfit Dior
Elaina Watley and Victor Cruz
Muhammad Wilkerson
Honoree Magnolia Jones with Trustee Christine LaSala
Ellen Lautenberg
Abigail Hendel Levy, Catherine Tompkins, and Meg McAuley Kaicher
Jane Power, and Kathy and Doug Landy
Margot Weinstein, Kim Sands, Debbie Needle, and Francessca Dunn
Emma and Bruce Willis, Emily Blunt, Sam Jackson, Arthur Blank, and John Krasinski at The American Institute for Stuttering (AIS) Gala.
Lisa Lawrence, Tanya Lapinski Murphy, and Patricia Toogood
Tatiana Pages and Alex Nunez
Debbie Conolly, Jill Brack, and Toby Cone
Casey Benjamin, Michael Shuman, and George Motz
Barbara Tober
Susan Saunders, Lisa Ryan Boyle, Rhonda Sherwood, and Kathy Arrix
Ruth Lande Shuman and Eddie Sacasa
DJ Keili Hamilton
Brittany Chamberlin, Jennifer Boyd, and Mizar Turdiu
Sander Flaum and Tony Hooper
Kayla Jones and Ram Bhavsar
Arthur Blank with Angie Macuga
Kathy Landy, Penny Aaron, and Nobu Aozaki
Carl and Courtnie Zuckerberg
Marc Stein and Lexie Komisar
The Russo Family
Heather T. Jervis, Jennifer Brooks Clark, and Debi Flower
Wendy Mindel Rubinstein, Rachel Weiss, Amy Moss Clark, Jeanine Behr Getz, Dr. Philip J. Landrigan, Dr. Robert Wright, Anne Ogilvy, Jill Brack, Maura Mandell, Lisa Ryan Boyle, and Annalise Stack
Carrie Emery, Crissy Foster, Dana Getz, Lisa Fry, and Lindsay Durfee
Megan Przywara, Stephanie Koscielski, and Joy Salazar
Marie Roy, George Motz, and Keili Hamilton
Carol Goldberg and Nobu Aozaki
Citi Joan Haffenreffer and friend
Photographs by  Patrick McMullan, Kate Hess, Jerry Speier (Fresh Air Fund)
Susan Jensen, David Rechardt, and friends
Fresh Air Fund's annual "Salute to American Heroes" at Pier Sixty, Chelsea Piers
Storefront Teacher Candace Cardwell, Roberta Cardwell, Storefront Teacher Joanna Horwitz
Carol Goldberg, Barbara Tober, and Barbara Schwartz
Joshwin Hall and Andre Grun
Max Weintraub and Sarah Watson
Storefront Alum Oneshia Shade-Portlette, Trustee Elsie Aidinoff, Kathleen McKelvy and Trustee Michael Stubbs
Victor Cruz
Bottom Row: Dr. Joel Forman, Robert H. Getz, David F. Ogilvy, Reginald Brack, and David Sherwood. Top Row: George Getz, John Hannon, Carl Zuckerberg, and Lloyd Mandell
Betsy Evans and Natalie Tallis
David Townsend, Lily Gunn, and Rachel Barnett
Joe Moglia and  Katrina Becker
Storefront Alumni
Susan Sleeper, Meredith Feurtado, Tia Mahaffy, and Ashley Allan
Emily Blunt, Samuel L. Jackson, and Bruce Willis
Aniko Berman and Alex Nunez with friends
Caryn Zucker, Steve Wolf, and William Lauder
Emily Blunt and AIS Clinical Director Heather Grossman with AIS client speakers
Susan Crile listens to audio coming out of backpack
Margo Crespin, Nicolas Rubinstein, and Wendy Mindel Rubinstein
Penny Aaron with Carol and Arthur Goldberg
Christina Ricci
Ruth Lande Shuman and Michael Shuman
Penny Aaron, Jenny Jaskey, and Michael Cohn
Pamela Frame
Michael and Riki Sheehan
Ellie Lipschitz, Corporations and Foundations Director Mary Quinlan, Faculty member James Amodeo and Trustee Dorian Brown
Tyson and Kimberly Chandler
Mount Sinai Greening Our Children Benefit Luncheon Men's Committee: Carl Zuckerberg, David Sherwood, Robert H. Getz, Reginald Brack, David F. Ogilvy, and Lloyd Mandell
Victoria Lunt and Anne Ogilvy
AIS Board Members Barry Blaustein and John Stoessel
Bruce Willis, Emily Blunt, and Samuel L. Jackson
Sydney Siegel and Kevin Walker
Mireya Rios
John Krasinski, Emily Blunt, Tina Brown, and Sir Harold Evans
Thakoon
Trustee Michael Stubbs, Honoree Kathleen McCarthy-Skryanz, Chief Operations Officer Alex Castro, Caroline Castro
Vevlyn Wright, Elizabeth Jacoby, and Vicki Winters
Susie Schnall, Nancy Weiser, Jennifer Mann, and Elisabeth Wolfe
Reiner Leist and Nobu Aozaki
Susan Khanna, Sharlene Cameron, and Anne Noel Dawson
Dr. Philip J. Landrigan, Honoree: Jessica Alba, and Rhonda Sherwood
Linda Johnson, Leonard Lauder, and Dr. A. Joseph Rudick
Mikayla Nissan, Ilan Nissan, and Ruth Lande Shuman

Martha Baker and Arthur Frasier
Martha Hyatt and Cynthia Reich
Hartley and Amy Rogers
Under the tent for the Wildlife Conservation Society's annual gala at the Central Park Zoo.
Barbara Zucker and Daniel Brodsky
Chele Chiavacci
Gary Simpson and Sandi Simpson
Annie Warren and Harriet Manice
Richard Rabinowitz (Gala Honoree) and Roberta Brandes Gratz (Eldridge Street Founder)
Christiana Bromberg and Madeleine Casella
Greg Kelly
Sasha Cohen and Tom Murro
Brett Penner and Jason Chapman
Jeff Breithaupt and Consul General John F. Prato
Brittany Dawson and Maggie Taplett
Amelia Hemphill, Chaitanya Mahra, and Beijia Naa
Allison Stern and Rikki Klieman Bratton
Craig Reicher (CBRE), Jonathan Mechanic (Fried Frank), and Tim Dempsey (CBRE)
Taryn Talmadge, GFrace Kelly, and Holly Donaldson
Bonady Chhim
Kim Coleman and Muffie Potter Aston
Trevor Kempner and Meghan Murphy
Richard and Amy Ruben, Lorinda Ash, William Rubenstein, and Melissa Warshaw
Marissa Troiano and Lydia Leinstorf
Alessandra Emanuel and Maria Oliveira
Alexandra Guest, Nicholas Mellamphy, and Shelley McPherson
Dr. Karyn Gordon
Anne Marie Mediwake and Melinda Estabrooks
Madeline Haddon, Arielle Patrick, and Chantelle Fernandez
Daniel and Robert Taylor
Roman Martinez and Helena Martinez
Sarah Pullman and Carter Boardman
Zach and Aubrey Crowley
Barbara Zucker and Steven Sanderson
Jonathan and Wendy Mechanic with Morris Bailey (JEMB)
Wendy and Jonathan Mechanic, Arlene Goldfarb,  Todd Kahn, and Ann Marie Kahn
Mary and Sean Meehan
Nina Kempner, Meggie Kempner, and Jackie Rohrbach
Photographs by  Patrick McMullan
(Wildlife Conservation Society).
Jennifer Caldarella, Robert Caldarella, and Hilary North
Joy Ingham and David Schiff
Paul Zofnass and Renee Ring
Dance-Mosphere
Tony James and Jodi Hilty
Kristen Kenny and Kyle Veatch
Gilbert Butler and Dailey Pattee
Maureen Reidy, Muffie Potter Aston, and Caroline Hirsch
Annique Leman, Alex McCord, and Sarit Chamamise
Chelsea Leyland
Melissa Berkelhammer and Natasha Das
Susannah Masur, Andrea Sioris, Alexis Benson, and Melissa de Roquebrune
Ana Guimaraes, Beatrix Carroll, and Laura Salibello
Katie Thomson
Alice George and Elena Hawila
Mayor Michael Bloomberg, Valerie Jacob (Fried Frank), and Jonathan Mechanic (Fried Frank)
Kristina Nugent, Heather Sutherland, and Jessica Curley
Amy van Lou, Jade Whiteland, Danielle Palmer, Vicki Jessep, and Katrina Wong
Linda Fraser and Randall Gianopulos
Lynden Volpe and Harrison Waterstreet
Aya Devin and James Andrew
Emily Mendez-Penate, Georgina Schaeffer and friend
Tim Rooney and John Hopkins
Gordon Pattee and Helena Martinez
Michael Kowalski, and Ramiro and Patricia Ortiz
Kate Tobuda and Taylo Sinclair
Katie Couric and John Molner
Deni Tseretotoulos, Peter Holowesko, and Alixe Laughlin
Preston Bailey
Liane Chapman and Shelley Saxton
Leslie Harwood and Richard Ruben
Robin Dubin Avram
Gordon Pattee and Missy Taylor
Dr. Sherrell Aston, Jim Breheny, and Muffie Potter Aston
Gilbert Butler, Gordon Pattee, and Roman Martinez
William Luers, Steve McPherson, Ward Woods, and Bill Miller
Jacqueline Scott Douglas and Joy Foo
Kelly van Ingen and Jenni Tseretopoulous
Robert Zimmerman and Andrew Fox
Sandy Bender, Gary Bender, and Linda Hoffman
Leigh McCoy and Taylor Simmons
Sydney Shuman, and Scott and Dana Schiff
Dr. Karyn Gordon and Pamela Falk
Matias Molina, Deline Crosa Di Vergagani, Devon Butler, and Nicolo Foscari
Alexis Benson, Laurie Gelman, Carla Wood, and Michael Gelman
Jean Shafiroff and Gregory D'Elia
Bebe Brook and Paul Zofnass
Janis Dixon, Dr. Karyn Gordon, and Grant Gordon
Amy Rogers, Hartley Rogers, Terry Lindsay, and Bob Lindsay
Rodney Berens, Liz Berens, Kim Coleman, and Payson Coleman
Maytinee Pramawat
Sue Ann Weinberg, Nick Homma, and Allison Morrow
Kate Erickson, Micaela English, and Aimee Ruby
Sasha Cohen, Natasha Das, Lily Hoagland, and Elizabeth Brown
Sean Bruns and Sharon Kerr
Michael Weinstein, Millen Magese, and Funmi Alaiyemola
James Tang, Victoria Harman, Connor O'Brien, Christine O'Brien,and Liz Tang
Allison Hodge and Dina Davalle
Helene Walsey, Romy Silverstein, Steven Walsey (Gala Honoree), Craig Walsey, Lisa Africk, and David Walsey
Padget Crossman and Eliza Whetzel
Rick Leland (Fried Frank), Jonathan Mechanic (Fried Frank), and Brian Baker (JP Morgan)
George Wambold, Melanie Wambold, and John Wambold Jr.
Lisa Schiff and Stan Shuman
Daniel Taylor and Paige Rattner
Virginia Schwerin and Paul Schwarzbaum
Serena and Peter Tufo
Payson Coleman, Rose Harvey, Tina Sloan McPherson, and friend
Fletcher Hall, Caroline Cannon, and Schuyler Friedland
Amanda Watts, Julie Crandell, Beau Allen, Margaret Hathaway, and Allison Cheek
Eugenia Zobel and Andrew Duplessie
Jennifer Gould Keil and John Wambold
Scott Buccheit and Amanda Tambling

Carmelo Anthony, Kasseem "Swizz Beatz" Dean, and Peter Beard
Joe and Tricia Solari
Sophie Hood, Jordana Decil, and Carrie Wallack
Peter and Eaddo Kiernan
Carmelo Anthony and Debra Beard
Robert Rufino and Susan Kelly
Jean and Martin Shafiroff
Matthew Kowles and Jessica Balboni
Jonathan and Marjorie Pastel
Adrienne and Ghighi Vittadini
Paige and Don Knox, and Leslie Stevens
Whitney and Robert Douglas Jr.
Donald and Muffy Miller, Julie Weindling, and Phil Geier
Michael and Courtney Szwajkowski
Janet Ross and Lionel Larner
Jackie Weld Drake, Adrienne and GhiGhi Vittadini, and Rodman Drake
Meredith Bourne and Caroline Kelso
Nicholas Gennis and Ellen Walker
Diane Tierney and Julie Graham
Brendan and Katarina Nacol
Joan Goodwin, Grace Meigher, and Patti Fast
Alez Wheaz and Meredith Bourne
Kyle Groff, Christine Groff, Dylan McGee, and Mark Weigel
David Rogath and Joanie Reznik
Michelle and Tyler Wolfrem
Lawrence and Marilyn Trainor
Mats and Lydia Carlsdon
Anne and Bill Harrison
Sharon Jacobs and Leslie Weiss
Gillian and Sylvester Miniter
Robert and Marianne Engle, Andrea Fahnestock, and George Hambrecht
Tonne and Wendy Goodman
Joan Goodwin and Liz Peek
Ruben and Isabel Toledo
Michael Beddard and Susan Sterling
Photographs by  Patrick McMullan
Dylan McGee and Ann Fulenwider
Bill Mayer, Rod Drake, and Chris Meigher
Tom Murro and Rachel Heller
Morgen Schick Demann
Henry and Susan Johnson
David and Jeanne Daniel
Ken Mifflin and Marsha Mifflin
John and Connie Vandenberg, Chris and Sally Sonnie
Alex Soros, Dana Taylor, and Evan Speiser
Memrie Lewis and Tom Savage
Di Mondo
Under the tent at The Conservatory Ball's "An Evening in the Italian Renaissance Garden of Padua" at the New York Botanical Garden.
Phil Jacob, Sharon Jacob, and Alfred Tobia
Melinda and Tom Hassen
Eaddo Kiernan and Ann Croll
Julie Macklowe
Chuck and Deborah Royce
Mango Chin and Tara Weezsalz
Mocisola Zulu and Grady Spivey
Leslie Rogath and Suzy Kunhardt
Harold Ford Jr. and Emily Ford
Andy and Kristin Kramer
Jerry Ann and Victor Costa
Charles and Diana Revson
Monica Sifkind and Ronald Riqueros
Agnes and Oscar Tang
Mariuca, Cosimo, and Luia Corsini
Clare Berner, Libby Berner, and Morgan Davis
Sheree and Jerry Friedman
Frederica Biggs and Andrew Senchak
Natasha Das
Alina Sayer
Ted Gushue and Lauren Powell
Liza and John Olympitis
Phyllis Toohey, Howard Brenner, Barbara Brenner, and John Blundin
Eugene and Sue Sekulow
Donna Karan and Chuck Close
Jon Salvesen and Marnie Yorke
Carrie Mae Weems and Hank Willis Thomas
James Mellon and Peter Kunhardt Jr.
Tom and Karen Glover
Suzanne Donaldson, Alexandra White, and Susan White
Fe Fendi
Guy and Sarah Peyrelongue
Victoria Sasonkina and Alex Julian
Sarah Irby
Robert Chen, Fort Parker, Eliza Gleissner, and Andrew Ward
Carlos de la Prado, Zara Beard, Peter Beard, and Nejima Beard
Wendy Nolan, William Nolan, and Lee Wareham
Patrick Toussaint, Keino Benjamin, and Donald Semerville
Damiela and Dhanos Kamiliotis
Gabrielle Corcos and Debi Mazar
Tracey Huff and Diane Chachas
Howard Horowitz and Katie Krause
Somers and Jonathan Farkas
Anne and Clay Rohrvach
Sarah and Richard Chilton
Ken and Noreen Buckfire
Andy Oshrin and Michele Smith
Elyse Newhouse, Gillian Miniter, and Carol Bell
Diane Jennings and Trisha Solari
Robert Garrett and Heather Stein
Peter and Diane Chapman, Melissa Millay, and John Robert Massie
Michael Bebdard and Susan Sterling
Kathleen and Rainer Kirchgaessner
Gene Young, Peter Kunhardt Jr., and Diana Revson
Karlie Kloss
Sara Arison and Joey Lico
Nicholas de Kwiatkowski and Sims Lansing
Marree Tomlinson and Caroline Williamson
Breonne Rittinger, Victoria Sasonkina, and Dana Taylor
Gene and Gretchen Grisanti
Hayden Hofford and Dr. Herbert Gould
Debbie Bancroft
Landon and Kiwi Hilliard
Henry Louis Gates, Jr. and Dyllan McGee
Valerie de Boni and Graziano de Boni
Alexander Galan and Annelise Peterson
Hugh Hildesly
Nick Loeb and Sofia Vergara
Gutavo Corea and Marcela Ganly
Sarah Arison, Kamal Hotchandani, Carmen Trigueros, and Thomas John Lee
Claudia and Nick Moore
Eddie, Edwin, and Nick Stern
Theodore Stebbins and Lauren Hutton
Edward and Patricia Falkenberg
Elliott Skinner and guest
Roy and Haley Sebag
Virginia Warner, Paul Stephaich, and Livinia Courier
Leslie Foley, Ambassador Tom Foley, and Chris Zimmerman
Ronni Ginott
Anson Beard, Veronica Miele Beard, Tiger Williams, and Caroline Williams
Estelle and Roe Williams
Matt Rubinger and Jacqueline Kulp
Roman Shukman, Rita Shukman, Jennifer James, Donae Chramosta, and Robert James
Bernadette Peters and Peter Speliopoulos
Mai Hallingby Harrison and Donald Smith
William Uhrig and Annastasia Vournas
Emily Smith and Di Petroff
Olivier Theyskens and Constance Jablonski
Stuart Clifford, Lee Wareham, Ellen Roman, and Ken Roman
Patricia Fernandez and Ricardo Fernandez
Tim and Debbie Connors, and Diane Tierney
Kim Chanin, Jennifer Diamond, and Rosemarie Serrer
Sam and Gus Dangremond, Kick Kennedy, and Guest
Adelina Wong Ettelson
Randy van Essen, Wayne Peterkin, and Josh Flanklin
Coco and Ari Kopelman
Tommy Hilfiger and Bernadette Peters
Veronica Miele Beard, Marita Stavrou, and Christina Evans
Peter and Elbrun Kimmelmann, Melinda and Tom Hassen
Jonathan and Candice Wainwright, Michael and Avery Clark
Tom and Page Knox
Cameron Silver, Carrie Creca, and Radha Mitchell
Dr. Susan Krysiewicz
Evan Speiser and Tara Dhingra
Gillian Miniter, Patti Fast, Gregory Long, Cosby George, and Ann Johnson
Stanton Green and Dorothy Mitchel
Maureen Chilton, Gillian Miniter, Cosby George, Gregory Long, Ann Johnson, and Patti Fast
Jennifer, Bob, and Nell Diamond
Ralph Williams, Ashley Williams, Brennan Nacol, and Katarina Nacol
Jay Diamond and Alexandra Lebenthal

Design and Decoraion Co-Chair Christl Meszkat
Melanie Seymour Holland, Amy Hoadley, and Roxane West
Daniella Nikolova, Dr. Lewis Feder, and Mark Schwartz
Mark Sanchez and Jamie Cygielman, Senior Vice President Marketing, The Jones Group
Louis Renzo and Lauren Grushkin
Alexander F. Gershner, Member of Junior Committee of Board of Directors of Benefit Fund, and Lauren Profeta, Vice Chair for Kick Off to Summer Benefit
Photographs by Julie Stapen (NYPL); Cutty McGill (Doubles); Patrick McMullan (Gracious Home).
Kristen and Stephen Fealy
Mark Gilbertson, Whitney Topping, Sarah Briton, and Henry Topping
Design and Decoration Chairman Ann R. Grimm
Gloria and Joseph Stolman
Teresa and Bruce Colley
Gary Lawrance and Zita Davisson
Donna Montrose and Leslie Feldman
Keith Carroll and Pamela Fiori
Richard and Lisa Plepler
Jack Pearson, C. Scott Brown, and Dr. Matt Kaufman
Doug Worman and John Q. Doyle, member of Executive Committee and Board of Directors of Benefit Fund
Edward Callaghan and Carolann Sandoval
Wendy Carduner, Doug Steinbercht, Martha Glass, and Jamie Creel
Chris and Lisa Ruth with Bryan Colwell
Stan Ponte, Kami Lightburn, and Randall Gianopulos
Sheila O’Malley Fuchs and Joe Fuchs
Louis Renzo, Chris Meigher, and Joel Kier
Randy and Margot Takian
Gary Crain, Janice Langrall, and James Alan Smith
Philip Gorrivan, Chad Conway, Blanca Prouve, Dennis Basso, and Robert Beradchia
Anne and Joel Kier
Melanie Wambold, Ann R. Grimm, and Kirsten Solsvig Galef
Joanna Davidson and Caroline Lieberman
Thorne and Tatiana Perkin
Maryann Horwath and Michael Shaheen
Janice Langrall, Jason Oliver Nixon, and Louise Traficanti
Mark Sanchez; Larry Ehrlich, Vice President of Special Events for Benefit Fund; Stephen Dannhauser, Chairman of Benefit Fund; Arielle Lenza Di Ciollo, Director of Development of Benefit Fund; John Neary, Treasurer of Benefit Fund
Raya Knight and Tom Naro
FDNY Commissioner Salvatore Cassano and Stephen Dannhauser, Chairman of the Board of Directors of the Benefit Fund
William Dawson, Jr., Member of Board of Directors of Benefit Fund, and Mark Basao, Palantir
Linda Muse
Bram Majtlis, Nick Gold, and Rich Wilkie
Tony Marx addresses guests at NYPL's Spring Dinner for Education.
Carolann Sandoval and Aida Turturro
Amy Hoadley and Walter Deane
Bob Dowling and Deborah Gleeson
Lucy Puig and Gary Lawrance
Judy Hadlock and Steven Stolman
Bennett and Spanier
Board Vice President Kirsten Solsvig Galef and Annabelle Galef
Richard and Donna Soloway
Charlie and Kristen Krusen
Brian Williams
A. Andrew Shapiro, Member of Board of Directors of Benefit Fund, and Arielle Lenza Di Ciollo, Director of Development at Benefit Fund
Abby and Howard Milstein
Vincent Piazza with Co-Chairs for Kick Off to Summer Benefit Fund, Courtney Riley, Shannon Riley, and Kerry-Lynn Riley
Katie and Fred Ryser
Dr. John Hubbell and Ali Hubbell
Jean and Martin Shafiroff in one of the designer showrooms
Chef Eric Ripert and wife Sondra
Matthew Swift, Member of Junior Committee of Board of Directors of Benefit Fund, and James Devary
Steven Stolman and Kirk Henckels
Mark Sanchez
Arielle Lenza Di Ciollo, Director of Development at Benefit Fund, and Vincent Piazza
Jeannie Johnston, Alex Volmer, and Lucy Puig
Michael and Elyse Newhouse
Beth Remington, Nancyjane Loewy, and Sharon Kerr
Ward, Cohen, and Tony Marx
Douglas and Susan Munin
Oksana and Zach Crawford
Adam and Mahnaz Ispahani Bartos, and Andreas and Katerina Dracopoulos
Marjorie Grubelmann and Jamie Creel
Melanie Seymour Holland and Laura Lofaro Freeman
Ann Liguori and Scott Vallary
Sheri and Sandy Severino, Stuart and Valerie Mogel
Diana Krall
Vice Chairs for Kick Off to Summer Benefit Michael Lawler, Michael Hurley, and Alexander F. Gershner
Franceca and Chris Beale
NYPD First Deputy Commissioner Rafael Pineiro and Alexander F. Gershner, Member of Junior Committee of Board of Directors of Benefit Fund
Barbara Fleischman, Henry Louis Gates Jr., and Joan Hardy Clark
Kate Peck, Marissa Brown, Pamela Ludwick, and Helene Comfort

Darcy Stacom
Judith Selkowitz, Carolyn Brooks, Susie Magee, and Wendy Moonan
Catherine Ingraham, Carole Ann Fabian, Barry Bergdoll, and Kate Levin
John Molner, Zeze Calvo, Katie Couric, Peggy O'Dea, and Brian Mullaney
Faye Cone and SJSMFdn President Tom Kligerman
Paul Cavaco, Stephanie Winston Wolkoff, and Gerry Pasciucco
CO-CHAIR Newell Turner, Carolyn Englefield, and David Murphy
Birch Coffey, Barbara Pine, Celeste Adams, and Mike Nicholson
Jeanne Lawrence, and Stanley and Betty Scott
While dining (roasted halibut and a divine molten chocolate cake), the 260 guests were treated to a pictorial projection on the stage curtain of more than 100 architectural vistas that represented the spectrum of the Soane's lifework.
Angela Westwater and David Meitus
Barry Bergdoll, Carole Ann Fabian, and Milan Hughston
Elizabeth Peabody and Tim Gunn
Lady Foster, David Metius, and Simone Levinson
Paul Goldberger, Susie Magee, Lady Foster, and Lord Foster
Jamee Gregory and Peter Gregory
MillionTreesNYC Lead Sponsors Meredith Hahn, Chris Giamo, Bette, Mary Desjardin, Juliet Williams, Hilary Ayala, Mayor Bloomberg, Amy Freitag, and Dave Barger
John Molner and Katie Couric
Photographs by  Mia McDonald (NYRP); Cutty McGill and Matt Gillis (Soane).
Steve Weinstein, Mary Louise Napier Zuzunaga, and Nick and Courtney Stern
Adrian Benepe and Bernadette Peters
Thomas Jayne and friends
David Levinson and Norman Foster
Liz Smith and Elizabeth Peabody
Kathy and Ben Needell
Katie Couric and Liz Smith
Peter Gregory and Marjorie Gubelmann
Robert and Julia Van Nutt
Eric Kornfeld, Rosanne Cash, and Judy Gold
Guys
Bette Midler and Chris Giamo
Bette Midler and Kendal Ascher
Katy McKegney, Kate Levin, Chas Miller, and Karen Sendler
Dana Sandberg and Chip Brian
The scene of Soane's Museum Foundation Gala, 583 Park.
Christine Pittel, Alexander Gorlin, and Andrea Monfried
Peggy O'De and Zeze Calvo
Gillian and Serena Miniter
Todd Thomas and Parker Posey
Anthony W. Marx and Norman Foster
Margo MacNabb Nederlander, Jimmy Nederlander, and Bette Midler
Mica Ertegun
Bette Midler and Michael Kors
Marylyn Malkin, David Malkin, and Margo McNabb Nederlander
Lord Foster of Thames Bank OM
Valentina Branchini
Wendy Evans Joseph and David Hanks
Rosanne Cash and Teal Kraus with friends
Liz Smith and Margo MacNabb Nederlander
Brian Mullaney and Claude Wasserstein
Rosanne Cash and Eric Kornfeld
Mike Nicholson, Catherine Ingraham, and Thomas A Kligerman
Cindy Smith, Suri Kasirer, Amy Freitag, and Adrian Benepe
Mayor Michael Bloomberg and Diana Taylor
Stephanie Winston Wolkoff
Guy Elliott, and Lucy and Nat Day
Suzanne Santry and Sam Roche
Mary Stewart Hammond and Arthur Allen
Carol Sullivan, Steve and Liz Weinstein, and Nick and Courtney Stern
Crowd during sing-along, Ellen Levine and Darcy Stacom at far right
Amy Goldman-Fowler, Amy Freitag, and Cary Fowler
Edward Snyder and Beth Miller
The table settings
Gals
The dinner scene at New York Restoration Project's 12th Annual Spring Picnic.
Amanda Nesbet, Robert Rufino, and Becky Birdwell
Mayor Michael Bloomberg and Hugh Hildesley
Peter Manning, Clifford Harvard, Ann Lydecker, Roy Zelluck, and Kelly Rourke
Liz Smith and Bette Midler
Martin von Haselberg  (right)
Jimmy Nederlander, Richard Levine, and Bernadette Peters
Todd Thomas, Parker Posey, and James L. Nedelander
Jamie and Lisa Dworkin, Charlie Warner, Julia Bradford, and Durston Saylor
Celeste Adams, Helen Dorey, and Chippy Irvine
Chris Pollack, John Flower, and Nick Stern
Ann Ziff and Brian Mullaney
Ellen and Richard Levine
Todd DeGarmo and Patti Harris
Amy Goldman Fowler and Jane Goldman
Meg Morton, Malcolm Rogers, and Cyndy Spurdle

Anne de Louvigny Stone and René-Pierre Azria
Chiu Yin Hempel and Anne Older
John Sare, Anne Van Ingen, Gregory Long, and Jay DiLorenzo
Ann Madonia, Diane Burm, Sandra McConnell, and Susan Madonia
Singer/songwriter Regina Spektor, Avital and Natan Sharansky, and Jack Dishel
Marie‐Claude and Robert Myers, Joan Rosasco, and friend
Ellen Stern, Avital Sharansky, Jerome Stern, and Natan Sharansky
Avital and Natan Sharansky
Polly Brockman, Pat Kyle, and Lisa McCarthy
Kathy Wilk (ARF Director of Special Events) and Gigi Mahon (Event Co-Chair)
Wendy Reynoso, Nicholas Lowry and friend, and Ray Cameron
Dr. Scott Rodeo and Dr. Christine Frissora
Sara Davison and Jamie Berger
Robert Rufino, Gordon Hoppe, and Gerard Manfredonia
Mort Zuckerman
Sara Davison and Sandra McConnell
Dr. and Mrs. Mehmet Oz
Samantha Kleinfield and Susan Saiter Sullivan
Tom Blanchard, Roberta Gratz, and Kent Bartwick
Jan C.K. Anderson and Karen Arrison
Barbara Ostrom with Elizabeth Dow
Céline Wislin and Rodney Lester
Bradley Geist with "Gigot"
Wes Haynes and Ruth Pierpont
Elie Wiesel, honoree Avital Sharansky, AJHS President Paul Warhit, and Sid Lapidus
Jean Shafiroff
Odile de Schiétère Longchampt and Elizabeth Stribling
The Somnolet and Volbrechthausen families
Award winners
The Chater family
Jessica Boo, Craig Fredericks, and Beth Parks
Gordon Hoppe and Gerard Manfredonia
Gerry Holbrook, Jay DiLorenzo, and Scott Duenow
Liane McAllister and Sigourney B. Romaine
Richard Clary, Arete Warren, and Suzanne Clary
John Ruskay and AJHS Executive Director Jonathan Karp
Lady and Lord Weidenfeld, Elie and Marion Wiesel, and Mort Zuckerman
Penelope Moore and Frances DeLabarre
Rickie James, Scott Duenow, and Edward Davis
Mercedes Platz, Maggie Copeland, and Challen Hodson
Escorts
Shaune Arp, Adrien Deseglise, and Carlos Lambarri
The Creteur and de Narp families
Jim Tisch
Patricia Sands, Matthew Bender IV, Elisabeth Bakker-Johnson, and Richard Johnson
Rita and Joseph Cohen
Mariam Azarm
Hon. Bertrand Lortholary (Consul General of France in New York), Michel Berty, and Imssy Klebe
Lora Nelson and Pamela Eldridge
The post-ceremony reception
Kendell Cronstrom, James Huniford, and Barbara Ostrom
Barbara Ostrom with "Webster" and Barbara Washkowitz with "Boschie"
Lucila and Alejandro Volbrechthausen
Annie M. Napoliello
Alexis Azria and Michael Kaye
Jacqueline von Rohr-Scheidt, Barbara Ostrom, and Noelle Marcantonio
Francette Armenteros, Ernesto Armenteros, Caroline Zaleski, and Michael Zaleski
Marguerite Mangin Antoine Treuille, and Countess Caroline de Ravel d'Esclapon
Elisabeth Cros and Richard Ortoli
Designer Barbara Ostrom in her room themed "Dan Rattiner's Reading Room"
Jerome Stern, Mort Zuckerman, Gordon Zacks, Malcolm Hoenlein, Connie Smukler, Richard Perle, Rabbi Avi Weiss, and Rabbi Haskel Lookstein
Melissa Tiska, Michele Forrester, and Jamie Forrester
Baron Bruno Bich and guest
Designer Preston T. Phillips
Jim and Dana Rosenfield
George Howell and Norman Mintz
AJHS Chairman Emeritus Kenneth J. Bialkin
The debutantes at the 72nd Annual Bal des Berceaux (Back row, l. to r.): Alexandra Giessen, Sarah Rodeo, Stefania Menella, Gabrielle	Cohen, Francesca Quintero, and Louise Bonnel. Front row: Emeline de Narp, Zoe Oz, and Marie Creteur.
Susan and Ann Madonia
Gregory Long and Robert Kafin
Gordon Zacks, Rabbi Avi Weiss, and Seymour Lachman
Photographs by  Cutty McGill (Preservation League); Richard Lewin (ARF).
Julia Turner and Federico Mennella

Jill Kargman, Kate Allen, Chris Allen, and Harry Kargman
Delight Dodyk, Maya Nussbaum, Susan Wissler, and Jennifer Egan
Jean Shafiroff, Chuck Scarborough, and Audrey Gruss
Laura Harris and Jaclene Ginnel
There were 262 guests in attendance
Sting, Georgia Hannock, Trudie Styler, and Stephen Hannock
Josefina Massot, Sara Hunter Hudson, and Carlton Hobbs
Ashley Phipps, Ogden Phipps, Carter Simonds, and Eleanor DeJoux
Francis de Marneffe, Barbara de Marneffe, Carlton Hobbs, Kate Wharton, and Alfred Kohnle
Leslie Harwood, SH Mayor Mark Epley, and Roxanne Donovan
Jeff Bewkes, Stephen Hannock and William Lauder
Donald and Dawn Levy
Shannon Froehlich and Kristin Mirsepahi
Linda O'Connell, Michael Simon, and Deborah Donovan
Jason and Bonnie Spodek, Executive Director Erika Markowitz, and Joshua P. Katz
Madeline Reynolds
Christo and Elizabeth Broun
Susan Wissler
A landscape by Stephen Hannock
Margaret Kennedy, Thomas Jayne, and William Cullum
Sean Rowland flies a kite with his Dad
UALC Volunteers Mary, Gabe, and Kat
Sara Hunter Hudson and Jay Sherwood
Rohit Desai and Sara Hunter Hudson
Lori Tritsch and William Lauder
John Loeffler, Jackie Williams, and Charles and Sara Ayres
Aaron Tighe, William Tighe, and Dr. David Hidalgo
Lilly D’Italia
Lucy Lanphere, Jackie Williams, and Betsey Ruprecht
Photographs by Patrick McMullan;  Annie Watt (The Mount).
Janna Bullock and Liliana Cavendish
Sean and Patrick Rowland decorate their kites
Cassandra Seidenfeld and Debra Halpert
Dr. Annette Rickel, Amanda Taylor, and Kamie Lightburn
Steven R. Black, Dr. Mark Urken, and Jack Ophir
Michele Gerber Klein and Christine Schott
Kristen Allen, Elizabeth Bonner, and Amanda Waldren
Sam White
Vaughn Dorrian, Catherine Shepard, Lisa Errico, and Celeste Boele
Andrea Greeven Douzet, Victoria Wyman, Rolf Heitmeyer, and Katlean de Monchy
Kurt Henckels and Fernanda Kellog
Allison Aston, Eugenie Niven Goodman, Deborah DeCotis, and Kirk Henckels
Katherine Hull, Elizabeth White, and Kate Wharton
Ann Colley and Gabrielle Bacon
Lucia Hwong Gordon and R. Couri Hay
James Dicke II and Richard Brodie
Richard Neel and Sunny Hayward
David Redden
Ann Jurdem and Christine Smith Gray
Thomas Woltz and Tantivy Gubelmann
Pauline Metcalf, Mario Buatta, and Margaret Kennedy
Liv Rockefeller and Ken Shure
Fernanda Niven, Eugenie Niven Goodman, and Jamie Niven
Mary Ellen McCabe and Debralee Nelson
Simon Lewis, Christian Charapata, Paul Dominguez, and Brian Nessing
Melanie Wambold and Sandra McConnell
Trudie Styler and Sting
Karen Sobel, Laura Urken
Gail Donovan, COO Continuum Health Partners, with Donald Levy, President of The Levy Group and Chairman of the THANC Foundation
Lindsay Church, Alycia Randise, Ann Mary Rajanayagam, and Brian Uyeda
Danny and Audrey Meyer
Fabi Khanlari, Elliott Bernerd, Susan Bernerd, and Richard LeFrak
Alfred Kohnle and Kate Wharton
Sharon Kerr, Marjorie Harris, and Kim Dryer
Edward Lee Cave
Theresa Behrendt
Nathalie Leeds Leventhal
Mandy Patinkin, Dr. Mark Urken, and Harry Smith
Gigi Wilmers, Morrison Heckscher, and Pauline Metcalf
Stephen Petronio and Suzanne Vega
Kathy Riley
Hugh Hildesley and Jamie Niven
Patricia Shiah and Audrey Gruss
Carlton Hobbs, Georgia Shreve, and Peter Lang
Hugh Hildesley and Jamie Niven at The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center Special Projects Committee's Annual Dinner.
Christo
Lucy Waletzky and Richard McCarthy
Marcie Pantzer and Shoshanna Gruss
Eaddo Kiernan, Peter Kiernan, Mark Gilbertson, and Debbie Bancroft
Marcia and Jack Levy
Michael McTwigan and Linda Wenger
Viggo Rambusch and James Nicoll Cooper
Richard Sharp, Sara Griffen, Elizabeth Broun, and Stephen Hannock
Anthony Hohmann, Robert Hohmann, and Kim Benanti
Robert S. Chaloner, Sharon DiSunno, Dr. Darin Wiggins, and Helga Loring
Fernanda Niven and Eugenie Niven Goodman
Deborah DeCotis, Jamie Niven, Eugenie Niven Goodman, Allison Aston, and Kurt Henckels
Pauline Metcalf and Gigi Wilmers
Volunteers from Grace Presbyterian Church
Lee Zeldin, Gregg Rechler, and Mary Ann Tighe
Deborah DeCotis, Kurt Henckels, and Dr. Annette Rickel
Marc Hiatrides, Krista Hiatrides, Tonia Gotsis, Gina Hiatrides, and James Hiatrides
Douglas Semmes and Vanya Desai
Gladys Thomas and Elena Patterson
Regina Greeven and Anne Sitrick
Linda O'Connell, Sunny Hayward, and Deborah Donovan
David Z. Hirsch
John Clark, David Edwards, and Christine Edwards
Jay Sherwood, Judith Villard, and Robert Chen
Ryan McCarthy, Richard Dragisic, and Carol Browne

Shoshanna Gruss
Courtney Coleman
Gillian Miniter and Selena Miniter
Suzanne Santry and Rick Lapham
Nancy and Edward Madden, Will and Carol Browne
Isaac Shapiro and Cristina Gonta
Jonathan Nelson and Peter Pennoyer
Ambassador John O'Keefe and Marguerite and Gerry Lenfest
Photographs by  Mia McDonald (Arthur Ross); Patrick McMullan & Billy Farrell Agency (Playground Partners); Billy Farrell Agency (NewYork-Presbyterian); Annie Watt (Hartley House).
Sofia Sanchez
Michael Mesko and Katie Casanta
Christine and Alex Evans
Dave Sheehan and Nicole Cicogna
Pamela Gross and Barbara Walters
Ca Mie De Souza and Rupal Sankalia
Anne Fairfax
Kyle Parks and Hon. David N. Dinkins
Anya Ziourova
Terri Cook
Mary Wallach
Ashley McDermott
Susan Carmel Lehrman and Alfdaniels Mabingo
Robert A.M. Stern
Lauren Santo Domingo, Bettina Prentice, and Ingrid Rockefeller
Kate Babb Shone, Dr. Laura Forese, Dr. Frank Chervenak, Dr. Amy Wechsler, and Dr. Gail Saltz
Peter Pennoyer
Vanessa Traina and Julia Von Boehm
Susan Ferriere, Beatrice Leon, and Deirdre Riou
Jill Ross, Yesim Philip, Brooke Shields, Adelina Wong Ettelson, Sarah Kurita, and Nyssa Kourakos at Playground Partners Annual Family Party.
Richard Fuchs, Noelle Silberbauer, and Joseph Rizzo
Natalie and Alexander Potemkin
Nyssa Kourakos
Clare McKeon
Jonathan and Judy Nelson
Brooke Shields and Arthur Wayne
Kamie Lightburn and Yesim Philip
Linda Mugleston and Alessa Neeck
Peter Starr, Monique and Robert Schweich, Dr. Sherry Mueller, and Jeff Lee
Maureen Footer and Gil Schafer III
Chloe Malle
Adelina Wong Ettelson
John and Elizabeth LaBombard; Suzanne and Fred Rheinstein
Tim Deal and Ed Siegel
Harriet Mayor Fulbright and Elmir Gurbanov
Nicole Cicogna and Chris Kenny
Janet Ross and Reva Wurtzberger
Nancy Paduano, Sharon Teles, Sarah Kurita, Nyssa Kourakos, Anne Harrison, Adelina Wong Ettelson, and Jill Ross
Jemilah Afshar and Jennifer Harris
Kathy Rayner and George Gillespie
Terry and Sue McGraw
Karen LeFrak
Sue McGraw, Terry McGraw, Yesenia Zuniga, Hon. David N. Dinkins, and Nicole Cicogna
Emilia Petrucci and Jeanne Petrucci
Karen Bechtel, Egan Seward, and Gil Schafer III
Florence Sicard, Gianluigi Esposito, Elizabeth McColm, and Heike Vogel
Brooke Shields and Anne Harrison
Lt Col Timothy Adams and Gerry Dolezar
Will Strasser and Lucinda Ballard
Ranika Cohen, Begum Taft, Paige Boller Malik, and Kate Krieger
Barbara Walters
Gary Brewer, Buff Chase, Liz Plater-Zyberk and Rick Lapham
Barbara Roggemann, Joan Steinberg, Dr. Peter Roggemann, and Wenke Thoman Sterns
Louise Raymond and Terri Austin
Paul Gunther and Miriam Ellner
Pavlos Papageorgiou and Sarah Newbery
Aileen Bruner
Leslie-Jon Vickory and Khalil Hamady
Anne Kriken Mann and Andy Taylor
Sandra Nunnerly and Angela Thompson
Bill Cunnigham and Hon. David N. Dinkins
Jacob Dunn and Jessica Brody
Christiane Fischer and Jenny Dixon
Kaylan Tildsley, Nora Nagle, and Nicole Rhodes
Alexa Aron, John Cameron, Frances Cameron and Richard Cameron
Richard Sammons
Jane Lear and Katie Ridder
Jaquelin Robertson
Kimberley Heatherington, Daniel Zavala, and Marie Helene Zavala
Carol Bellidora Westfall and Christine Biddle
Timothy Richards
Francoise Skurman
Grant Marani and Nick Stern
Judge Leslie Crocker Snyder and Dr. Fred Synder
Alexis Waller, Hartley du Pont, Diane Downs, Judith Baldwin, and Jen Kelly
Suzanne Santry
Pamela Gross, Judy Taubman, Serena Boardman, and Tiffany Dubin
Paul and Olga D'Alto
Hartley duPont, Hon. David N. Dinkins, and August and Paul duPont
August duPont, Ashley Platt, and Lauren Remington Platt
Marina Killery
Judith Baldwin and Lonnie Quinn
Dr. Dario Cortes and Dr. Sue Henderson
Jake, Nancy Paduano, Oscar, and Daniel Paduano
Natalie, Debra, and Larry Boerder
Soheir Khashoggi and Lauren Lawrence
Dr. Amy Wechsler, Juju Chang, Dr. Gail Saltz, and Dr. Laura Forese
Kelly Price and Tim O'Brien
Jean Karoubi and Jessica Pliska
Dr. David Steinberg and Deborah Clifford
Laura Guerra
Dr. Laura Forese
Jodi and Marc Ganz
Ray and Barbara Simon
Lonnie Quinn
Eleanor Alger and Bagley Reid
Diane Downs, Susan Lovell, and Gregory Downs
Thomas Jayne, Barbara Eberlein and Barbara Sallick
Zac Russell, Peter Wolf, Claudette Mayer, and Kevin Carpenter
Liz Plater-Zyberk and Buff Chase
Roy Kean, Ryan Nessing, Kathy Clingan, and Tom Clingan
Hon. David N. Dinkins and Susan Henshaw Jones
Paul Gunther and Gail Lloyd
Laurie Diamond, Christine Barkus, Natalie Barkus, and Dodie Gumaer
Briana Miller
Marie-Rose Andriadi and Bill Brockschmidt
Jason McManus, Tom Kurland, Josh Goldberg, and Glenn Goldberg
Emily Bedard and Adrian Taylor
Dr. Ruth Westheimer and Dr. Frank Chervenak
Deborah McManus, Jason McManus, and Susan Ferriere
George Leeds and Christine Schott
Hon. David N. Dinkins and Alice Truax

Elisabeth Desvignes and Robin Elliott
Former Betsey Johnson CEO Chantal Bacon, Survivor Award honoree fashion designer Betsey Johnson, Komen Greater NYC CEO Linda Tantawi
Sheila Johnson and Donna Karan
Faisal Hassan and Bana Hassan, and Ronya and Sami Idliby
Greg and Barbara Romero
Donna Karan and Rory Tahari
Komen Greater NYC CEO Linda Tantawi and her daughter Alessandra wearing Betsey Johnson with Survivor Award honoree fashion designer Betsey Johnson
Howard Milstein, Karen Barkey, Abby Milstein and Tanenbaum Founder and President Georgette Bennett
Mary Jane Brock and guests
Former Betsey Johnson CEO Chantal Bacon, Survivor Award honoree fashion designer Betsey Johnson, Susan G. Komen founder Amb. Nancy G. Brinker
Nigel and Cristen Barker
Carole and Al Goldberg
Gala attendees bidding during Tanenbaum’s Balloon Drive
Scott Kennedy, Nigel Barker and John London
Jonathan Bing, Meredith Ballew, Dolly Bross, and Jack Geary
Ivan Rutherford, Jackie Burns, Joyce S. Dubensky, Kevin Kern, Deb Lew, and Barrett Foa
Cynthia Sculco and Renee Flug
Hospital for Special Surgery Trustee Susan Rose; with Elihu Rose; and Connie Anne Phillips
Joe Levine, Jenny Levine, Jerome Levine, Arlene Levine, Dr. Emily Slate, and Ben Slate
Award presenters Theresa Lana and Eric Brinker flank Compassionate Care Award honoree Patrick I. Borgen, MD
Dr. Craig Foster and Isobel Konecky
Photographs by Brad Hess Photography (HSS); Patrick McMullan (PDF) Billy Farrell Agency (Solving Kids' cancer); Bob Johnson, Jack Miller, & Joshua Plant (Tanenbaum); Sean Friedman Photography (Komen)
Fatima Shama and Ziad Mansouri
Former Betsey Johnson CEO Chantal Bacon presented the Survivor Award to longtime business partner Betsey Johnson
Donna Karan and Nigel Barker
Robin Elliott, Dr. Sheila Gordon, and Jon Gurkoff
Vinay Bansal with Dr. Manjula Bansal
Greg Todora, Chasen Mintz, Penn Egbert, and Virginia Powell
Luncheon co-chairs Nikki Tippins, Ayala Deutsch, Cheryl Horowitz-Levy and Cindy Pinter
Dr. David Altchek, Sports Medicine and Shoulder Service co-chief, Hospital for Special Surgery; with Christina and Alan MacDonald
Peter Dorn and Nancy Ozelli
Resa Aslan and Joyce S. Dubensky, Tanenbaum CEO
Komen Greater NYC CEO Linda Tantawi, Komen founder Amb. Nancy G. Brinker, presenter and breast cancer survivor Theresa Lana, Compassionate Care honoree Patrick I. Borgen, MD, and guest Bo Dietl
Dr. John and Kim Callaghan; with Antonella and Dr. Eduardo Salvati
Dr. Harlan Amstutz with Paula Root and Dr. Leon Root, pediatric orthopedics chief emeritus, Hospital for Special Surgery
Pepi Kochhar, and Sally and John Bassler
Karen Burke
Dr. Richard Mayeux, Dr. Nancy Green, Dr. Harvey Kerrich, and Dr. Laura Lennihan
Betsey Johnson landed in a split after her signature cartwheel while accepting her award
Louis A. Shapiro, President and CEO, Hospital for Special Surgery; Timothy Wright, Ph.D, Kirby Chair of Orthopedic Biomechanics at Hospital for Special Surgery; Dr. Claudio Mella, Santiago, Chile; Marcia Mella; Dr. Patrick Sussmann, Zurich, Switzerland; Dr. Fabio Catani, Modena Italy; and Dr. Thomas Sculco, surgeon-in-chief, Hospital for Special Surgery
Dr. Peter Sculco and his fiancé Dr. Elizabeth Morris, with Cynthia and Dr. Thomas Sculco, surgeon-in-chief, Hospital for Special Surgery; and Sarah Jane Sculco and her husband Trevor Gibbons
Dr. Philip Wilson Jr., surgeon-in-chief emeritus, Hospital for Special Surgery; with Ellen and Joseph Wright
Angie Carrasco and David Simon
Hospital for Special Surgery, the number one hospital for orthopedics in the nation, celebrated its 150-year legacy of excellence on Thursday, May 2, with a landmark anniversary event at The Metropolitan Museum of Art. This social event was one of a series of activities marking the 150th anniversary of the founding of the Hospital
Sam Delgado; Seymour Flug; Dr. Thomas Sculco, surgeon-in-chief, Hospital for Special Surgery; Kendrick Wilson, III, co-chair Board of Trustees Hospital for Special Surgery and Vice Chairman BlackRock; Diane Delgado and Renee Flug
Cristen and Nigel Barker
Scott Kennedy, Liliana Cavendish, and Josh Lucas
Phil Segal
Patrick Grace and Tanenbaum Peacemaker in Action Dr. Ephraim Isaac
Leonard Polonsky, recipient of a special Tanenbaum award, and Maz Zouhairi
Back: David Farber, Kate Drury, Chris Drury, Jack Drury, and Willie Geist  Front: Gene Gurkoff, Genna Farber, Stevi Gurkoff, Jill Drury, Carol Taub, and Jon Gurkoff
DJ Fulano
Bonnie Young and Gabby Karan De Felice
Rachel McPherson
Lydie Fenet and Celia Babini
Nigel Barker and Josh Lucas
Dr. John and Carol Lyden
Dr. Stanley Fahn and Charlotte Fahn
Ivan Rutherford, Jackie Burns, Kevin Kern, Deb Lew, and Barrett Foa
Mark Fowler, Tanenbaum’s managing director of programs, and Leonard Glickman, accepting the Philanthropic Bridge-Builder Award on behalf of FJC
Komen Greater NYC CEO Linda Tantawi, Susan G. Komen founder Amb. Nancy G. Brinker, and Komen Greater NYC Board member Sandra L. Kozlowski
Tanenbaum Peacemaker in Action Yehezkel Landau and Joyce Schriebman
Barrett, Justin, Tiffany, Linda, and Conrad Foa
Nick Manifold and Kelly Klein
Gabby Karan De Felice, Donna Karan, and Bonnie Young
Suffering from laryngitis, Betsey Johnson thanks Komen Greater NYC for her Survivor Award with the help of a handmade sign
Cynthia and Dr. Thomas Sculco, surgeon-in-chief, Hospital for Special Surgery; with Joseph and Ellen Wright; Kristen Steele; and Dr. Stephen Fealy
Dr. Thomas Sculco, surgeon-in-chief, Hospital for Special Surgery addresses guests
Jim Markowski, Dale Dreps, Thora Eidsdottir, and Dr. John Connolly
Komen Greater NYC Board member Amy Tsui Luke and Board Chair Laila Worrell surround Survivor Award honoree fashion designer Betsey Johnson
Christina and Willie Geist
Los Angeles series regular Barrett Foa and Chad Hodge
Komen Greater NYC's Grants, Policy & Education Chair Ivy Gamble Cobb presents the Grantee of the Year Award to Marissa Mais, Program Director of the YWCA White Plains & Central Westchester's Encore Plus
The Adam Solomon Award for Excellence recipient Yvonne Brathwaite
Margo Catsimatidis and Tania Marnier
Stacey Weiss, Deborah Kerner, Stephanie Goldman-Pittel, Wendy Hammer, and Judy Gold
Dr. Kenneth Cohen
Tanenbaum Peacemaker in Action Hind Kabawat
Front: Maz Zouhairi, Joyce S. Dubensky, Reza Aslan  Back: Georgette Bennett and Leonard Polonsky
Komen Greater NYC's 2013-14 grantees
Dr. Philip Wilson Jr., surgeon-in-chief emeritus, Hospital for Special Surgery; with Kim Callaghan (left) and Dr. John Callaghan (right)
Kathryn and John Hart
Komen Greater NYC Board Chair Laila Worrell, Compassionate Care honoree Dr. Patrick I. Borgen, Survivor honoree Betsey Johnson, and Komen Greater NYC CEO Linda Tantawi
Sheila Johnson
Komen Greater NYC CEO Linda Tantawi, former Betsey Johnson CEO Chantal Bacon, Survivor Award honoree fashion designer Betsey Johnson, Susan G. Komen founder Amb. Nancy G. Brinker
Keith Bloomfield and Mark Mullett

Tony Bechara, Mayor Michael Bloomberg, Chus Martinez, and Ricardo Villela Marino
David Hyde Pierce and Sigourney Weaver
Clelia Peters and Hugh Molane
Rockettes Beth Nicely and Cynthia Link
Rob McClure
Courtney B.Vance
Back row: Erwin Newell, Ken Marx, Brenda Newell, Mila Kammett, Front row: Enid Silver, Mame Burkett, Gladys Condron, and Helene Zebrowski
Cristiana Andrade
Carlos Rohm and Claudia Laviada
Lauren McKee, Noelle Pierre, and Jamila Justine Willis
Joyce Brown and Alexandra Lebenthal
Drake Irish Dancers, Sidney and Dorothy Kohl, and Caitlin Kelly
Alanna Heiss, Christo, and Patricia Harris
Dana Schutz
Stewart Lane and Bonnie Comley
Michael Urie
Dotty Wilson and Audrey Rauterkus
Wendy Joseph and Joseph Ravetch
Berry Gordy with the cast of Motown
Tommy Tune
Amy Fine Collins
Lilla Crawford
Monika Parekh and Blair Costello
Agatha Ruiz de la Prada and Tony Bechara
Kammy Moalemzadeh and Blair Costello
Daniel Cappello and Amanda Beck
Daisy Olarte de Kanavos and Daniel Olarte
Barbara Tober
Phillipa Soo
Brandon Victor Dixon
Laura Osnes
Emmeli Kuhn, Paige Gambel, Christopher de Haydu, and Sabrina Wirth
Valentin Hernández, Yaz Hernandez, Raúl Esparza, and Michele Esparza
Harvey Fierstein and Cyndi Lauper
Bertie Carvel
Tabitha Bartley and Ali Rehm
Annaleigh Ashford
Donna Murphy
Dianne Krause, Susan and Bill Maynard, and Beth Estes
Judith Ivey
Yaz Hernandez and Estrellita Brodsky
Roger T. Danforth, Jano Herbosch, and Gabriel Shanks
Chus Martinez
Carolina Alvarez Mathies and Renato Delleside
Photographs by Patrick McMullan & Billy Farrell Agency (El Museo); Rob Rich (Drama League); Billy Farrell Agency (NAF); Corby Kaye's Studio (Kravis Center).
Valisia LeKae
Bebe Neuwirth
Alexandra Lebenthal and Gillian Miniter
Bobby Cannavale
Alan Cumming
Ramiro Ortíz Mayorga, Yaz Hernandez, Ricardo Villela Marino, Valentin Hernández, and Raúl Esparza
Alixe Laughlin
The dance floor at El Museo del Barrio's annual Gala.
Cicely Tyson
Berry Gordy
Bill and Denise Meyer
Narciso Rodriguez and Yaz Hernandez
Chris Worth, Paola Fendi, and Kate and Evan List
Billy Porter
Alixe Laughlin, Zachary Zimmerman, Sarah Coleman, and Emilie Ghilaga
Colby Jordan, Amanda Gamg, Cori Duff, and Meredith Baughman
Valentin Hernández, Yaz Hernandez, Patricia Ortiz, and Ramiro Ortíz Mayorga
Jerry Mitchell
Joe and Lauren Pizza
Jean Christophe Napoleon and Brad Corbin
Margo Langenberg
Judy Mitchell and Barbara Gehrkin
Dancing along with the Drake Irish Dancers
Drake Irish Dancers
Sarah Coleman and Olivia Zimmerman
Arielle Elwes and Harriet Guadagnuolo
David Diao and Pat Steir
Debra Messing
Joel Shapiro and Amy Fine Collins
Pauline Eveillard, Phyllis Lally, Samantha Lynch, and Leonard Seevers
Andrew Martin Weber and Keeley Smith Cabot
Carmine Branagan, Patricia Harris, Christo, and Alanna Heiss
Camilla Rachmanis, Carolina Alvarez Mathies, and Rebecca Fuente
Vanessa Williams
Bernadette Peters
Ali Rehm, Tabitha Bartley, Judy Mitchell, Barbara Gehrkin, Sharon Leibovitz, Paul Kaufman, Ruth Sanders ,Dejeanne Jules, and Bill Meyer
Evan and Kate List
Lucia Hwong Gordon, Jean Shafiroff, and Fe Fendi
Alexandra Lebenthal
Alex Dreyfoos, Judy Mitchell, Diane Bergner, and Jim Mitchell
Christo, Maria Bechily, and Scott Hodes
Dejeanne Jules and Ruth Sanders
Paul Rudd
Sharon Leibovitz and Paul Kaufman
Dorothy and Sidney Kohl
Patina Miller, Diane Paulus, and Andrea Martin
Judith Light
Izabelle and Vladimir Yavachev
Tom Hanks
Nathan Lane
Marie Unanue and Fe Fendi
Constantine Maroulis
Marco Antonio Regil, Jaime Mayol, and Marlon Moreno
Anthony Warlow
Bennett Leifer, Cori Lee Seaberg, and Jeffrey Berman
2013 Drama League Directing Fellows
Helene Jaffe, Marshall Price, and Deven Parekh
Carolina Alvarez Mathies and Gabriel Rivera Barraza
Sunny and Bernie Levinson

Elizabeth and William Morris
John Royall and Bill Ingram
Angelo Garcia III (Board Member) and family
JD Hoye, President of the National Academy Foundation, with Lowell McAdam, Chairman and CEO of Verizon Communications
New York City Schools Chancellor Dennis Walcott chats with students
Donald Capaccio, Rafael Cestero, and Tommy Pegues
Linda and Jesse Silver (Board Member)
Michael Darling and Cathy Ingram
Michael J. Hirschhorn
Ted Scherff, Lisa Ott (President of North Shore Land Alliance), and Gill Ott
Maud Robertson, Joseph Barry, Richard Weir III, and Sybil Carton
Maya Browne, Laurence Pels (Executive Director Theodore Roosevelt Association), and Georgia Bush
Michael Gleicher, Penelope Lawson, Denise Rollandi, and Jake Indyk
Members of Damayan Migrant Workers Association
DJ Cassidy, Dennis Basso, and Michael Cominotto
Cassandra Seidenfeld
Linda and David Carey (Board Members), Constance Cincotta (patron), and Zach Nudo
Ambassador Brenda Johnson and Jim Blair
Ashia Sheikh (Audubon NY Director of Development) and Erin Crotty (Master of Ceremonies and Executive Director of Audubon NY)
NAF board members Jim Robinson, General Partner and Co-Founder, RRE Ventures and Ken Chenault, CEO of American Express, with students
Alex and Meriel Lari
Linda Vilaikeo, Laura Weil, Christine Munnelly, David Witkewicz, Greg Scott, Brenda Posey Simon, Jody Gietl, and John Howard
Martin and Peri Wenz
Keiko Aoki, Horst Schneider, and Susan Schneider
Bill de Blasio, Lorna Brett Howard, and Hugh Hogan
Ben Stapleton, Hugh Carey, Kate Gibson, Maureen Stapleton, and Rolly Morris
Kate Spade, John Howard, Lorna Brett Howard, Stuart Mogul, and Hugh Hogan
Ted Scherff (Director of Theodore Roosevelt Sanctuary), Mona Scherff, Susan Peterson, Edward Mohlenhoff, and Lillian Soricillo
Jodi Johnson and Asa Johnson
Brendan Regan, Susie Griffin, and Roland Morris
Thomas and Patricia Werblin
Lorna Brett Howard and John Howard
Cary Neer and Amanda Fialk
Virginia Stowe and Margot Ernst
Elizabeth Roosevelt
Amy Hoadley and Polly Onet
Sammy Pederson, Craig Gibson Jr, and Paige Pederson
Katrina Schaffer
Jim and Susan Blair with Michael Kennedy
DJ Cassidy, Jaime Gleicher, and Johnny Podell
Mark and Kim Standish (pictured here with JD Hoye, President of the National Academy Foundation), honored along with RBC Capital Markets
Ann Miller, Jack and Rosie Heffernan, and Michael Menillo
Jacquelyn Sherry Coombe and Stella Keitel
Theresa Skvarla and Marian Minkin
Sanjiv Yajnik, President of Financial Services for Capital One, chats with a student from the A.J. Moore High School's Academy of Finance
Peter Duchin
Rachel Heller, Jacquie Sherry Coomb, and Samantha Zimmerman
The scene at Doubles at its 37th anniversary celebration.
Simon Roosevelt (Legacy Gala Co-Chair)
Byron Silva and Gonzalo Mercado
Andrew and Danielle Earls with Kristen and David La Valle
Edward Mohlenhoff (Legacy Gala Co-Chair and Board Member), Margaret and Tom Stacey, and James Tiberg
Bernadette Castro, Bernard Austin (Board Member), and Alexandria Austin
Lisa Woodward, Anka Palitz, Craig Dix, Larry Kaiser, and guests
Photographs by Patrick McMullan (Silver Hill);  Annie Watt (Doubles); Jill Johnson (Oyster Bay)
Eleanora Kennedy and Kamie Lightburn
Hugh Hogan and Anne Hess
Chip and Sarah Page
Arva Rice, Lynda Rodolitz, Martha Baker, and Jessica Mates
Susan Peterson and Nicole Menchise
Descending the stairs to Doubles
Phillip and Jacqueline Blocklyn (Oyster Bay Historical Society)
Denyse Duval Pugsley, Marianne Nash, Suzanne Dillenbeck, James Tiberg, and Margaret Stacey
Julie Dermer, Penelope Lawson, and Denise Rollandi
Susan and Jon Nagel
Lucy Cutting and June Fisher
Sandy Weill with student speaker Josuel Placencia
Mark Standish and Ursula Burns
Trez Thoma, Elyce Arons, and Meredith Homet
Abigail Disney, Sarah Kovner, Rachel Fine, and Martin Dunn
Philip Schlussel and Barbara Spector, Carol and Philip Mehler
Maureen Bannon, Kevin Costa, Jerry Anne Costa, and Victor Costa
Bill and Jane Told
Logan Goodman, Barbara Winslow, and David Strathairn
Larry Kaiser and Lisa Woodward
Dr. James Watson (Chancellor Emeritus of Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory) and Liz Watson
Mallika Dutt
Bernie Milano, President of the KPMG Foundation chats with students
Bonnie Potter, Ariel Mortiz, Ruth Messinger, and Martha Baker
Joseph Plumeri, CEO and Chairman of Willis Group Holdings chats with NAF Board Member, Bob Dughi, Executive Chairman, U.S. Retirement Partners
Doug Steinbrech, Mary Darling, and Mark Gilbertson
Annunziata Francesca Sahid and Francesca Campbell
Joseph Barry, Ingrid Chung, and Michael Obuchowski
Stanley and Roberta Bogen with Rene and Richard Steinberg
Andre and Lois Nasser, Ted and Barbara Terry
Zita Davisson
Ursula Burns, Chairman and CEO of Xerox Corporation with Kim Standish at the NAF Benefit. Kim and her husband Mark Standish were honored at the event.
Jennifer Zaso
Sarah Buchanan, Jocelyn Levy, Gregg Bard, and Nicole Pinto
Wendy Carduner, Cynthia and Dan Lufkin, Eleanora and Michael Kennedy
Jerry and Loni Casey
Linette and Matt Semino
Louis Norris (aka "Diamond Jim Brady")
Matt Semino, Katie McNamara, and Russell Grant
Ted Scherff, honorees Willis De La Cour and John Venditto (Supervisor of the Town of Oyster Bay), and Edward von Briesen (President of TR Sanctuary and Legacy Gala Co-Chair)
Peter Casparian (Reverend of Christ Church, Oyster Bay)
Chris McInerney, Jason Franklin, and Wayne Franklin
Tom Ross (Superintendent of Sagamore Hill National Historic Site)
Mary Van Pelt and Guy Van Pelt
Zakiya Johnson-Lord and Kenneth B. Morris, Jr.
Wendy and Richard Cooke
Barbara Benioff Friedman, Trustee Emerita, Cornell University and Vice-Chair of Overseers of Weill-Cornell Medical College, chats with a student
Denyse Duval Pugsley (Board Member)
Jaime Gleicher and Janet Fitzgerald
Guy Van Pelt, Polly Onet, Mary Darling, and Doug Steinbrech
Kerwelyn Craig, Caroline Kelso, and Paige Pedersen

Courtney B. Vance
Tina Lang and Stephen Lang
Adrienne Arsht
Alice and Thomas Tisch
Ashley McDermott
Lloyd Goldman, Joel Picket, Leonard Wilf, Burton Resnick, Jonathan Mechanic, Jeffrey Feil, and Leonard Boxer
Rachel Roy and Tallulah
Di Mondo
Andrew Singer, Burton Resnick, and Richard Lane
Maysoon Zayid and Lauren Bush Lauren
Ray Troubh, Tony Mann, Jerold D Jacobson, Jean Shafiroff, Mayor Michael Bloomberg, Paul Levine, David Rivel, and Melissa Russo
Joy Marks
Mario Buatta and Dr. Penny Grant
Melissa Russo
Sharon Greenberger and Alan Alda
Larry Silverstein and Marty Burger
Deborah Norville and Lynn Tilton
Robyn Lawley
Jonathan Resnick, Scott Resnick, Peter Resnick, Burton Resnick, and Lloyd Goldman
Nancy McCormick
Lisa Maria Falcone
Wendy Reynoso and Co-chair Bob Rylee
Bebe Neuwirth and Chris Calkins
Allen Kolkowitz, Amy Beckman, Eli Hoisington, Carl Galioto, Ken Drucker, Anthony Spagnolo, and Christopher R. Laul
Katlean De Monchy
Uma Thurman
Nigel Barker and Cristen Barker
Luc-Stephon Dorsinville, Aieyla Santaella, Byron Pitts, Cory Booker, Adah Hill, and D'onte Reid
Columbus Clubhouse and Madison Square Boys & Girls Club Youth of the Year Adah Hill
Co-Chair Jeff Muti, Dr. Ruth, Head of School Wendy Reynoso, and Board Chair Ray Cameron
Ines Rosales, Loreen Arbus, and Mike Woods
Alek Wek
Aaron Lown, Robin Givens, and John Roscoe Swartz
Daniel Cappello and Amanda Beck
Adam Arnow, Samuel Rosenblatt, and Steven Marvin
Ashlee Simpson
Dr. Laura Tagliareni, Marilyn Ostrow, Lisa Bergofin, and Andrea Rachman
Cyndi Lauper, Robin Roberts, and Ellen Levine
Michael Album and Jerold Jacobson
Susan Lucci, Robin Givens, Robin Roberts, and Paula Zahn
Michaela DePrince
Frank A. Bennack Jr.
Charl Brown and Star Jones
Coco Rocha
Jamee Gregory
Angélica Fuentes Téllez, Loreen Arbus, Kathy Calvin, and Maria Leticia Ossa Daza
Sharon Bush and Christine Biddle
Keynote Speaker Mayor Booker meets Madison's four Youth of the Year
Tamsen Fadal, Loreen Arbus, Big Daddy, and Wendy Diamond
Trustees Steve Logan, John Forbes, and Ray Cameron
Dr. Vincent Siasoco, Susan Lucci, and Kathy Kelly
Donna Hanover and Nicole Miller
Camilla Barungi, Isiah Whitlock, Jr., and Margot Bingham
Lynn Tilton, Lauren Bush Lauren, Maysoon Zayid, Robin Roberts, Susan Lucci, Paula Zahn, Loreen Arbus, Ali Stroker, Robin Givens, Donna Hanover, and Sharon Greenberger at the 12th Annual Women Who Care Luncheon benefitting United Cerebral Palsy of New York City.
Tony Mann and Paul Levine
Gail Shields Miller, Michele Rella, Brenda von Schweickhardt, and Bonnie Pfeifer Evens
Linda Jacobs and Stacey Lane
Lisa and Lenny Rodriguez
Lee Deutsch, William Friedland, and Alfonso Kimche
Fe Fendi
Christine Schwarzman
Keynote Speaker, Newark, NJ Mayor Cory Booker
John Herrmann, Tony Mann, and Fred Yerman
Jules Kroll, Lynn Kroll, David Edelson, and Ira Schuman
Gabriel Mora
Seymour Askin and Jean Troubh
David Brause, David Picket, Earle Kazis, Louis Brause, and Richard Mazella
Audrey Carlin
Jon Smith and Jonathan Estreich
Dean of Students Mel Chan with Storefront Faculty Candace Cardwell, James Armodeo, and Wendy Reynoso
Winsome and Schevon Williams
Sasha Cohen
Ann Rapp and Roy Kean
Jean Shafiroff
Governor Andrew Cuomo speaking
Charles Bendit, Jay Anderson, and Lloyd Goldman
Caren Brooks
Steve Simon and Blaine Trump
Prince Amukamara
Margo Langenberg
Joyce Cowin
Liza Huber and Barbara Lazaroff
Stewart Lane and Bonnie Conley
Jessica Stam
Lynn Tilton, Wendy Diamond, Caroline Lieberman, and Randy Jones
Columbus Clubhouse and Madison Square Boys & Girls Club Youth of the Year Aieyla Santaella
Lauren Rae Levy and Constantine Maroulis
Amy Astley
Photographs by Rob Rich (UCP); Patrick McMullan (ABT); Michael Priest (UJA); Patrick McMullan & Annie Watt (JBFCS)
Ali Stroker
Stephanie Szostak
Robert Ryan and Rachel Moore
Charlie Short, Royal Bank of Canada and co-workers
Champion of Youth Howard Muser, Aieyla Santaella, Adah Hill, D'onte Reid, Luc-Stephon Dorsinville, and Steve Guttenberg.
Mitchell Moinian, Joseph Moinian, and Matthew Moinian
Misty Copeland
Lucy Liu
Nina Rennert Davidson
Gillian Miniter and Sylvester Miniter
Lauren Post
Julie Macklowe and Zang Toi
Terri Conn
Robin Roberts and Cyndi Lauper
Sarah Arison
William Mack and Richard Mack
Jonathan Mechanic, Rob Speyer, and William Rudin
Sigourney Weaver
Shannon Hales, Joy Marks, Kathleen Giordano, Dr Penny Grant, and Dawne Marie Grannum
Boys & Girls Club of America President Jim Clark, Luc-Stephon Dorsinville, Aieyla Santaella, Adah Hill, D'onte Reid, and Executive Director Joseph Patuleia
Muffie Potter Aston and Dr. Sherill Aston
Mayor Michael Bloomberg
Noella Coursaris Musunka, Loreen Arbus, James Masters, and Christine Ponz
Bridget Kelly
Senator Charles Schumer
Victoria Phillips
O.J. Anderson and friends
Maysoon Zayid

Karen Reynolds Sharkey, Taina Bien-Aime, and Abigail Disney
Co Chair Howard Solomon and Honoree Susan Graham
Diana Taylor, Tina Brown, Leymah Gbowee, Rachel Lloyd, and Ana Oliveira
Curt Curtis and Courtney Booth
Nancy Kissinger and guest
Dionne Warwick Honoree
Marylouise Sacconaghi and Gabrielle Bacon
OSL Board Member Josie Natori, Stacey Bendet, Jana Klauer, and Deanna Berkeley
Constance Jablonski
Tom Raibaldi with Living Legends' Honoree Pauli, working Guide Dog and Dr. Nicole Leibman, Head of Oncology
Judy Zankel and OSL Chairman Norman Benzaquen
Ana Oliveira, Diana Taylor, and Sid Bass
Michele Penzer
Jennifer Giacobbe
Fang Zheng, Joseph Weilgus, and Justin Rockefeller
Miss New York USA Joanne Nosuchinsky
Co Chairs David Bury and OSL Co Founder Marianne Lockwood, Co Chair and Board Member Robert Appel, and Carol and Honoree Don Randel
Venket Varadarajan, Shaquille Riley, and Raniel Perez
Emme Deland, Phyllis Levin, and Jonathan Deland
Khaliah Ali, Cheyenne Elliot, and Abby Z
Taina Bien-Aimé, Rachel Lloyd, Susan Fulwiler, Anita Channapati, Jean Shafiroff, Kwanza Butler, and Jennifer Giacobbe
Damaris Lewis and David Diehl
Lisa Rinehart and Joe DiMenna
Tom Curley, Christine Bosco, Jim Attwood, and Nancy and Morris Offit
Cat Greenleaf
AMC Trustee Kathy Rayner and William Rayner and Kate Coyne, CEO
Allie Hanley, Ed Rappa, Jackie Williams, Dean Poll, Elaine Langone, and Doug Band
Honorees Don Randel and Susan Graham, OSL President Katy Clark, and Co Chair Bob Appel
Gerry and Vicky Cameron, Lloyd Ross, OSL Board Member Janet Seidler, Charles Seidler, and Susan Ross
Jennifer Buffett and Rachel Lloyd
Maureen Klinsky, Gabrielle Bacon, and Sara Ayres
Curt Curtis
Jackie Williams and Gene Williams
Photographs  by Joe-Schildhorn/BFA (Project Sunshine)
Board Member Robert Ashton and Jean Ashton
AMC Trustee Ed Hershey and Sean McCarthy, President-Westminster Kennel Club
AMC Trustee, Mal Schwartz and Laura Tryon
Dr. Maria Camps, and Libby Monaco McCarthy
Richard and Kristen Beckman, and Co Chair Ron Frasch
Sarah Ann Macklin
Clive Davis
Jacquelyn Jablonski
Ginny Day and Yvonne Moore
Sharon Koplin, AMC Trustee and Dr. Susan Zucotti
Nana Meriwether, Olivia Culpo, and Logan West
Tamsen Fadal and Mr G
Peter Martinez and OSL Board Member Kristin Barbato
Taina Bien-Aime
Clay Brakeley, Pablo Heras Casado, Katy Clark, and Susan Graham
Susan R. Cullman
CEO Kate Coyne, and AMC Trustee Donna Acquavella
Elaine Langone and Ken Langone
Kate Coyne, CEO, Dr. Mark Macina, Dermatologist, Isabella the Dachushund - Living Legends' Honoree, and Pattie Berman
OSL Board Members David Monn and Josie Natori with Principal Conductor Pablo Heras Casado and Robert DeGaetano
Dr. Mark Macina, Dermatologist, Dr. Nicole Leibman, Head of Oncology, Matt and Michel with Magik the Cat - Living Legends' Honoree, Kate Coyne, CEO, Dr. Wiles, Oncology Resident
OSL Board Members Marianne Lockwood, Barbara Feldon, Peter Gottsegen, and Carol Grossman
Jennifer Buffett
Professor Iris Love, AMC Trustee and Dr. Ann Hohenhaus
Co Chair and OSL Board Member Georgia Frasch, Alexander and Diana Vreeland, Mark Badgley, Cornelia Guest, and James Mischka
The Grand Ballroom at The Plaza
Luncheon Co-Chairs, Barbara Hoffman, Helene Stein, Kane Nussbaum, Eva Usdan, Marilyn Sorenson, Janet York
Adrienne Arsht and OSL Principal Conductor Pablo Heras Casado
AMC Trustee Cass Adelman and guest
Betty Terrell-Cruz and Ginny Day
Ana Oliveira
BCNY Musicians performing
Diana DiMenna, Pablo Heras Casado, and Board Member Joe DiMenna
Ying Fang and Paul Appleby perform with OSL and Pablo Heras Casado
Bill Torrey and Elaine Langone
Elaine Langone, Jackie Williams, Jeanne Jones, Friederike Biggs, and Nancy Phelan
Katy Clark, Adrienne Arsht, and Georgia Frasch
Ruth Moore, Samantha Moore, and Butch Moore
Dionne Warwick and Cheyenne Elliot
Terry Lundgren and Tina Lundgren
Mariachi Flor de Toloache—New York City’s “only all-female mariachi band”
Jamee and Peter Gregory
Mindy Prugnaud, Elie Tahari, JoAnne Blessinger, and Co Chair Ron Frasch
Leymah Gbowee addresses the crowd
The Grand Ballroom at The Plaza designed by David Monn at Orchestra of St. Luke’s annual Gift of Music gala.
Mirte Maas
BCNY Musicians
Master of Ceremonies David Hyde Pierce, Charlie Hamlen, Principal Conductor Pablo Heras Casado, and Jeremy Geffen
Leymah Gbowee and Abigail Disney

Ann Levine, Honey Cook, and Lisa Fuld
Sandra and Edward Meyer
Linda Gosden Robinson, Catherine Manno, and Mary Pat Christie
Debra LaMorte, Ken Langone, and Helen Kimmel
Jen Zweibel, Vanessa Martin, Samantha Manheimer, Linda Sondik, and Tanya Boulton
Maureen Nash, Alexandra Papanicolaou, Matt Semino, Chani Churchill, Lauren Matina, and Samantha Strockis
Kimberly Pauley and Dr. Georgia Hope Witkin
LaShonda Reese and Gedeon Luke
Molly Sebastian and Brian Kennedy
Kelly King with Mike Herman Band
Gwen Salakaia and Gwen Chelidze
Emily Keown and Tyler Horvath
Ariun Sanjaajamts, Jeffrey Falt, Oyungerel Tsedevdamba, Sheldon Root Severinghaus, and Pauline Willis
Mrs Govindr.ajan, Sujata Yellavlli, Radhika Athreya, and Mr Govindrajan
Toby Dela Rosa, Tempa Berish, Mark Scott, and Eric Robbins
Ken Langone and NJ Governor Chris Christie
Jeffery Caldwell, Alexandra Papanicolaou, Benner Ulrich, and Samantha Whiting
Gary Cohn and Lisa Pevaroff
Matt and Linette Semino
Jason Liebman with Mike Herman Band
Robert I. Grossman, John Sexton, Marica Vilcek, and Jan Vilcek
Lydia Tower, Aleksandra Cragg, and Barbara Regna
Trudy Elbaum Gottesman and Robert Gottesman
Norm Lewis
Elizabeth Rockman and Lauren Perry
Bradley Wechsler and Patty Newburger
Shirin von Wulffen and Olivia Chantecaille
Allison and Roberto Mignone
David Reed and David Gavazzi
Neal Friske, Emily Summers, and Capera Ryan
Amy Chanos
Denise Wohl and Elenor Wohl
Ashleigh Fernandez and Jerry Caldari
Connie and Marty Silver
Brian Anderson and Gregory Todd
BJ Topol, Kay Childs, and Adrienne Conzelman
Ramona Singer, Marla Helene, Podi Constantiner, Colleen Rein, Nurit Haase, Pamela Morgan, and Andrea Wernick
Arun Barua and Jen King
Karl Wellner, Tatiana and Thorne Perkin
Joe Romano, Bri-Ann Ladowski, Lauren Matina, and Bruce Eckfeldt
John Sexton, Billie Tisch, and Ken and Elaine Langone
Dr. Georgia Hope Witkin, Carmen Marc Valvo, and Lisa Fuld
Amanda Tapiero
Clare McKeon and Ruth Appelhof
Peter Daverington and Catherine Corman
Charles Renfro and Capera Ryan
Lara Spencer and Carmen Marc Valvo
Steve Earle and Allison Earle
David Gavazzi, Audi Martel, Eric Vukmirovich, Elise James-DeCruise, and David Reed
Allison Mignone, Ken Langone, and Mary Pat Christie
Renee Belfer and Elizabeth Belfer
Nancy Jane Loewy
Laura Linney and Marc Schauer
Jordyn Kopin, Dr. Cece McCarton, and Lily Khaykina
Paula Zahn and Kay Unger
Melissa Epperly and Mauren Nash
Elisabeth Karpidas, Capera Ryan, Sheryl Mass, Deborah Scott, and Anna-Sophia van Zweden
Fiona Druckenmiller
Stephanie Clark, Scott Manning, and Adolfo Zaralegui
Abigail Baratta and Amanda Waldron
Pauline Willis, Capera Ryan, Kianga Ellis, and Jacqueline Didier
Andreas and Katie Hildebrand
Larry and Lori Fink
Daisy Chaplin, Laura Linney, and David Brymer
Nichole Galicia, Kerri Mandelbaum, Dr. Georgia Hope Witkin, and Karen Mandelbaum
Stephanie La Nasa, Elizabeth Belfer, Chris Cirgenski, Capera Ryan, Clare McKeon, and Stephanie Clark
Laura Linney and Dr. Cece McCarton
Daniel Fink, Lori and Larry Fink, Tamara Goldman, and Josh Fink
Mary Pat Christie and NJ Governor Chris Christie
Mike Tadross and Dr. Georgia Hope Witkin
Bill Kelly, Kim Grad, Christina Maloney, and Lindsey Kelly
Katia Graytok, Jason Herrick, and Kristen von Summer Waldorf
NYU Langone Medical Center's 2013 Violet Ball honoring Lori and Larry Fink.
Jackie Didier, Amy Connor, Miller Gaffne, and Elizabeth Belfer
Allison Walmark, Ethan Walmark, and Michael Walmark
Larry and Lori Fink, Elisabeth Cohen, and Robert I. Grossman
Regina Noroutite, Sabrina Martin, and Susanne Schalin
Christian Johnson, Sonia Sparolini, and Page Leidy
Marcy Warren and Amy Zaitz
Photographs  by PatrickMcMullan.com; Jenny Gorman (NYSPCC); Rob Rich (City of Hope); Annie Watt (McCarton); Jay Brady and David Dupuy / Annie Watt (Violet Ball)
Hilaria Baldwin and Carmen Marc Valvo
Elisabeth Karpidas and Deborah Scott
Ward Eagan, Kerry O'Day, and Sarah Leif
Ron Grant and Dr. Cece McCarton
John Sexton, Larry Fink, Robert I. Grossman, Lori Fink, Martin Lipton, Ken Langone, Larry Silverstein, and Phil Moskowitz
Steve Guttenberg and Mike Tadross
Suzie Ganjei and Dov Marmor
Christine Harmon, Alexandra Drucker, and Marisa Noel Brown
Connie Silver and Phyllis Putter Barasch
Robert Mofenson and June Pintchik
Martin and Susan Lipton, Robert I. Grossman, and Elisabeth Cohen
Michele Herbert and Dr. Georgia Hope Witkin
Carol Seligson,Ellie Wohl, Karen Berger, Judy Spiegel, Susan Allen, and Michele Wolkoff
Carmen Marc Valvo fashion
Bay Bryan with Mike Herman Band
John Churchill and Gregory Todd
Elena Caggiano, Sarah Turpin, Toby Usnik, and Alice Hunsberger
Joe Pierce and Sandy Chaplin
Chris Cirgenski and Pauline Willis
Clare McKeon, Capera Ryan, Elizabeth Belfer, Pauline Willis, Stephanie La Nasa, and Stephanie Clark
LaShonda Reese with Mike Herman Band
Andrea Stark and Adrien Arpel
Susan Allen, Michele Wolkoff, and Arlene Reed

Stacey and Eric Mindich
Sujeet Indap, Lizzie Paton, Dan McCrum, and Emily Steel
Victoria Herbert, Susan Kremer, Jerry Kremer, and Lisa Winter
Emiliya Mychasuk, Adam Waller, Arash Massoudi, Stephen Foley, and Cardiff Garcia
Mario Buatta, Ellie Cullman, Geoffrey Bradfield, Susan Gutfreund, Audrey Gruss, and Jamie Drake
Philip Hewat-Jaboor, Nazy Vassegh, Nicola Winwood, and Thomas Woodham-Smith
Alan Rappeport, Peter Smith, Gary Silverman, and Tom Braithwaite
Leandra Medine, Charlotte Ronson, Bonnie Fuller, and Elana Drell-Szyfer
Timothy Van Dam and Ron Wagner
Moshe Bronstein and Linda Schildkaraut
Donny Deutsch with Elana Drell-Szyfer, Bonnie Fuller, Leandra Medine, and Charlotte Ronson
David Gelles and Rodgin Cohen
Bianna Golodryga, Jennifer Gross, Lyss Stern, and Patricia Miller
Bruce Bierman, William Secord, and Audrey Gruss
Michele and Dr. Lawrence Herbert
Michel Witmer and Wendy Moonan
Lynne Westcott and Geoffrey Bradfield
Amy Powell, Darcy Keller, and Poppy Harlow
Ronald Mayne and Debare Saunders
Julia Noran and Joshua Burcham
Missy and Rich Faul
Stephen Siderow, Saskia Scholtes, and Michael MacKenzie
Christina Murphy and Nina Carbone
Sir Martin Sorrell and Ng Ser Miang
Pam Mirels and JoBeth Tananbaum
Walter Williamson, MD, JD and Karen Zier, PhD
Mitchell Owens, Ellie Cullman, Ilene Wetson, Cub Barrett, and Alison Levasseur
Henry Neville
Rod Keenan
Beth and Dan Catanzaro
Taranjeet Ahuja
Dennis Rolland
Ellie Cullman, Tom Britt, Ilene Wetson, and Ronald Bricke
Dr. Louis DePalo and Lauren DePalo
Philip Hewat-Jaboor and Sandra Nunnerley
Dr. Dennis S. Charney and Andrea Charney
Thomas Woodham-Smith, Bennett Weinstock, and Michael Simon
Nicola Winwood, Philip Hewat-Jaboor, Margaret Russell, Ellie Cullman, Thomas Woodham-Smith, and Nazy Vassegh
Dr. Lawrence Herbert
Charlotte Ronson, Leandra Medine, Bonnie Fuller, Donny Deutsch, Bianna Golodryga, and Elana Drell-Szyfer
Nancy and Stuart Rabinowitz (President of Hofstra University)
Alex Shuman and Jeffery Bilhuber
Mindy Cohen, Leandra Medine, and Joseph Cohen
Fabiana Faria and Helena Barquet
Deborah Kelly and Lionel Barber
Daisy Sanders and Fred Hill
Photographs  by PatrickMcMullan.com (Hofstra); www.Anniewatt.com (Masterpiece London); Roey Yohai (Mount Sinai); Chloe Apple Seldman/Michael Priest Photography (UJA)
Nazy Vassegh, Thomas Woodham-Smith, and Koichi Hara
Mark Thompson
Mark Gilbertson and Cub Barrett
Corey Bezerman and Richard Herbert
Charlie Rose, Gillian Tett, Camille Douglas, and Mort Zuckerman
Lauren DePalo and Dr. Louis DePalo
lyssa Urban, John Murray, and Lee Cavanaugh
Violante Nessi and Rodrigo Bazan
Kristin and John Miller
John Ridding, Richard Wolffe, and Nick Denton
Jennifer Gross, Barbara Ginsburg Shapiro, Maxine Forman, Alisa F. Levin, Marcie Imberman, Sandra F. Cahn, Gail Magaliff, and Stephanie Joseph
The tent in the Conservatory Garden of Central Park
Jason Subotky and Anne Akiko Meyers
Arthur Sulzberger Jr. and Gabrielle Greene
Erez Sabag, Elana Drell-Szyfer, and Yigal Azrouël
Mayor Bloomberg, Lionel Barber, and John Ridding
Diane and Marc Spilker
Donny Deutsch
Charlie Rose and Lionel Barber
Thomas Jayne and Tom Britt
Charl Porter, Rob Grimshaw, and Alex Kelleher
Kyle Gibson and Gillian Tett
Jeff Lincoln
Rob Grimshaw and Michael Golden
Jennifer Ceasar
Andrew Sollinger and Myron Kandel
Karen S.W. Friedman and Cindy Golub
Ragnhild Melzi, John Moncure, Will Landers, and Armando Senra
Greg Kwiat and Dana Kiyomura
Barbara Friedlander and Jill Rabin
Sir Howard Stringer, Ken Auletta, and Garrick Utley
Camille Massey, Dr. Richard Haass, and Henny Sender
Maggie Gallant, Patricia Miller, and Lyss Stern
Allison Slater Ray and Liz Morina
Alan and Jen Goldfarb with David Richman
Ryann Gastwirth, Rona Fairhead, and Darcy Keller
Michele Herbert, Paul Lane, and Brenda Lane
Alan and Susan Kelly
Jessie Rudin, Claire Distenfeld, Jacqueline Bloom, Stella Binkevich, Pam Mirels, Alexandra Stromer, Dani Stahl, Alison Brod, and Samantha Elfland
Ellen and Howard C. Katz
William Secord, Bruce Bierman, Juan Montoya, and Urban Karlsson
Lizzie and Dr. Jim Watson
American Patrons co-chairs and Masterpiece London organizers at the New York kick-off reception for Masterpiece London.
Michael Elliot, Sir Howard Stringer, and Jolie Hunt Potter
Vanessa Friedman and Amanda Urban
Dr. Mindy Fried and Dr. Arno Fried
Maxine Forman and Sandra F. Cahn
Joseph Piombino and Chris Licht
Barbara Murphy, MD and Peter Fogarty
Amy Palmer and Lyss Stern
Dani Stahl, Charlotte Ronson, and Shoshanna Gruss
Robin Dolch and Lyss Stern
Georgette Mosbacher
Laurie Girsky, Cindy Golub, and Joy Zellin
Vicki Feldman Portman, Staci Barber, and Patty Silverstein
Christian Hemmerle, Sylvie Hemmerle, Stefan Hemmerle, Sandra Nunnerley, andEllie Cullman
Sheila Camera Kotur, Mario Buatta, and Andrea Robinson
Jean and Jim Crystal
Margaret Russell
Richard Dragisic, William Brockschmidt, and Tom Scheerer
Jane Friedman and Lionel Barber
Carl Icahn and Dr. Kenneth L. Davis, MD
Constantino Castellano, Christopher Hyland, Geoffrey Bradfield, and Kyle Marshall
Ricardo Winter, Loren Herbert, Michele Herbert, Dr. Lawrence Herbert, Lisa Winter, Victoria Herbert, and Richard Herbert
Dr. Eva Andersson-Dubin and Glenn Dubin
Jill and Peter Kraus
Alan and Jen Goldfarb with Sarah and Eric Lane
Emiliya Mychasuk, Edmund Lee, and Rob Grimshaw
Eric and Sarah Lane
Edgar Cullman and Ellie Cullman
Patti Fuchs and Dr. Wayne Fuchs
Eric Lane, Dr. Kenneth L. Davis, Dr. Bonnie M. Davis, Sarah Lane, Leni May, Peter W. May
Leandra Medine, Claire Distenfeld, and Carolyn Angel
Maureen Footer and Daniel Hamparsumyan

Mark Newhouse and Jesse Newhouse
Constance Jablonski
Anna Wood and Dane DeHaan
Ruby Aldridge
Oliver Theyskens
Mort Zuckerman
Cuba Gooding, Jr.
Sharon Bush
Dennis Basso, Michael Cominotto, Marco Scarani, and Jamie Creel
Mark Ackermann, Julie Wainwright, Rober Verdi, Lorry Newhouse, and Alex Hitz
Megan Hilty
Barry Levinson
Maiken Baird (filmmaker), Anna Wintour, and Michelle Major (filmmaker)
Kelly Rutherford
Jean Shafiroff and Martin Shafiroff
Fran Lebowitz
Kenneth Jay Lane and Amy Fine Collins
Billie Jean King, Maiken Baird, John McEnroe, and Patty Smyth
Valentino Garavani
Sandra Bernhard
Alex Gibney, Eliot Spitzer, and George J. Mitchell
Lorry Newhouse
Carol Mack, Charles Atkins, Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia, Marina Rust Conner, and Michael Cominotto
Julia Stegner
Brad Goreski
Aubrey Plaza
Emel Zilek, Lorie Broser, and Jessica Abraham
Alexandra Lebenthal, Ann Windblad, Julie Wainwright, and Kay Koplovitz
Mark and June Ackermann
Quintessentially Lifestyle Team
Photographs  by PatrickMcMullan.com; Startraks Photo (Venus and Serena).
Zoe Buckman and David Schwimmer
Shanina Shaik
Jeffrey Bowyer-Chapman
John Leguizamo
Virginia Smith and Tabitha Simmons
Laura Lofaro Freeman, Marlyne Sexton, and Felicia Taylor
Michael Shannon
Derek Blasberg
Bruce Addison, Jamie Creel, Lisa Fine, and James Andrew
Rachel Roy
Nanette Lepore
Di Mondo
Baz Luhrmann and Catherine Martin
Mario Buatta and Yanna Avis
Tom Murro
Somers Farkas and Robert Verdi
Alan Patricof and Susan Patricof
B Michael and Catherine Chenaut
Mia Moretti and Katy Perry
Prabal Gurung
Lauren Bush and David Lauren
Hamish Bowles, Milly de Cabrol, Tom Quick, Becca Cason Thrash, Michael Cominotto, Sara Dodd-Spickelmier, and James Andrew at Lighthouse International's "POSH Affair."
James Lowther, Lauren Schneider, and Jeremy Lewis
John Catsimatidis and Margo Catsimatidis
Anja Rubik
Yigal Azrouel
Barbara Tober and Boo Grace
Richard Farley and Chele Chiavacci
Young Hee Kim
Mike Faherty and Serena Tufo
Chris Nirschel
Alyssa Miller
Steven Stolman and Rich Wilkie
Eve
Nin Cooper, Sandra Parks, and Mark Anthony
Linda Gaunt, Yolanda Wardowski, Ann Winzlad, Julie Wainwright, Amy Fine Collins, and Kay Koplovitz
Wyclef Jean
Dr. Karen Burke, Tom Murro, and Jean Shafiroff
Russell Simmons
Ezra Koenig
Michael Shannon and Cuba Gooding, Jr.
Mark Sanchez
Oliver Stone
Graydon Carter and Anna Scott Carter
Bryan Greenberg
Leonardo DiCaprio, Baz Luhrmann, and Carey Mulligan
Dan Stevens
Emma Roberts
Gwen Stefani and Katy Perry
Vera Wang
Darren Henault and Margo MacNabb Nederlander
Liliane Montevecchi
Piper Perabo
Alex Hitz, Annette Tapert, and Dennis Basso
Reeve Carney
Solange Knowles
Rati Sahi Levesque, Hamish Bowles, and Julie Wainwright
Julie Yannuzzi and Dr. Lawrence Yannuzzi
Ezra Miller
Alexander Skarsgard
Gigi Mortimer, Cristina Cuomo, and Renee Rockefeller
Arlene Dahl and Marc Rosen
Rachael Taylor
Harley Viera Newton
Kylie Minogue
Agatha Mordacq and Robert Couturier
Angela Ho, Jonathan Farkas, Somers Farkas, Bayo Ogunlesi, Emilia Ogunlesi, and Amsala Aberra

Missy Goldberg, Kelly Kannen, and Zach Deegan
Alberto Mugrabi and Vito Schnabel
Donna Dorian and Wendy Moonan
Inger Elliott
Bill Noble, Sofia Blanchard, Colin Cabot, and Marco Polo Stufano
Dr. Annette Rickel, Hillary Dick, Madeline Weinrib, and Kim Flaster
Susan Johnson
Paige Morrissey, Erin Lynch, and Madeline Hemingway
Jeff R Bridgman Antiques
Joseph Mizzi, Marla Bienvenida, Bernard James, and Nchimunya Wulf
Taylor Brown, Sophia Gangei, Katie Fong, and Owen Biglin
Kim Seibert and Madeline Weinrib
Bård E. Bunaes and Barbara Bunaes
Carlton Hobbs and Stefanie Rinza
Stephanie Loeffler and Nina Reeves
Gus Wenner
Peter Blanchard
Storefront Students greeting Trustee Amanda Low and guests
Mikel Witte, George Nelson, and Bettina Nelson
Tiffany Niem, Pauline Eveillard, and Julie Mcaskin
Aiza Keesey, Lydia Melaed Johnson, and Doreen Ho
Elena Kornbluth, Christopher Heydon, and Amy Raitter Dwek
Susan Johnson, Sofia Blanchard, and Louise Moos
The evening’s Master of Ceremonies, Margaret Juntwait with ASF Executive Vice President Lynn Carter
Shabnam Henry
Arthur Zeckendorf with Anne Detwiler
Heather Emelander, Gene Schaefer, and Diane Genco
Vito Schnabel, Joseph Mizzi, Haley Mellin, and Stavros Niarchos
Alan Hedrick, Tyler Cornelius, and Stephanie Marie Pallock
John Frawley, Rob Kuhbach, Candace Frawley, and Veronica Stubbs
Leslie Jones, Dr. Annette Rickel, Minou Pirasteh, and Gail Hilson
Louis Bauer, John Zweig, Marcia Zweig, and Betse Gump
Aby Rosen and Samantha Boardman
Mario, Nchimunya Wulf, Joseph Mizzi, and Jeff Zalaznick
Clinton Howell
The Grand Ballroom of The Pierre
Head of School Wendy Reynoso and Honoree Christine LaSala
Mara Seibert, Lenore Rice, and Elaine Becker
Ellen de Vegh, Helen Clay Chace, and Pierre de Vegh
Irene Aitken and Clinton Howell
Her Majesty Queen Sonja entering the Grand Ballroom escorted by ASF President Edward Gallagher, with H.E. Consul General Sissel Breie, ASF Deputy Chair Bernt Reitan, and ASF Chairman Bente Svensen Frantz accompanying them
Yew Tree House Antiques
Tim Birnbaum and Peter Milligan
Tim Nagler and Nancy Coffey Nagler
Tiffany Frasier and Derek Brown
MoMA Director Glenn Lowry with ASF Trustee Richard E. Oldenburg and Mary Ellen Oldenburg
Baroness Sheri de Borchgrave, Ian Shapolsky, and Akiko Saito
Storefront students
Amb. John L. Loeb, Jr. and Sharon Handler Loeb
Trustee Maria Vecchiotti and Ilene Nadel
Eddie Milstein Lyor Cohen
Brittany Millman and Lainey Yang
Cocktails were served on an overlook terrace, between a pair of wooden pergolas,
Patrick Bavasi
Vanessa Cornell, Sandra Ripert, and Erica Karsch
Honoree Michael Stubbs, Kim Landrigan and Gala Co-Chairs Michael and Lise Evans
ASF President Edward Gallagher and Gala Co-Chair Lise Stolt-Nielsen
Peter and Anne-Marie Embiricos
Victor B. Borge with his wife, Paula Borge
Laureen and Ragnar Meyer-Knutsen, Vice Chairs of the event
Stefan Bondell
Melanie O'Donnell and Amra Pucarevic
Tim Hartman, Louise Moos, Lezette Proud, Elaine Becker, Peter Blanchard, Sofia Blanchard, Arthur Vanderbilt, and Susan Lowry
Gala Co-Chair Marcus Samuelsson and his wife, Maya Haile
Photographs  by Christine Butler (The American-Scandinavian Foundation); Elle Jota/BFAnyc.com (MSKCC Thrift Shop); Anniewatt.com (Arts’ Night Out).
Linda Carrington
Tara Seawright and Alexandra Rowley
Grace Kennan Warnecke, Sheila Johnson Robbins, and Karen Lerner
Louise Moos, Anina Rossen, and Pierre de Vegh
Honorees John Rosenquist and MoMA Director Glenn Lowry
Mark Helliar, Michael Franks, and Mark Lyman
Trustee George Weiksner, WABC Reporter and emcee Kemberly Richardson, Board Chair Ray Cameron
Lydia Melaed Johnson, Emily Collins, Abigail Starliper, and Maggie Moore
Robbie Gordy, Catherine Smith, and Adam Hurly
ASF President Edward Gallagher, ASF Gala Co-Chair Inger Ginsberg, ASF Chairman Bente Svensen Frantz, ASF Gala Vice Chair Arthur Zeckendorf, and ASF Gala Co-Chair Lise Stolt-Nielsen
Helen W. Marx, Lisa Resling Halpern, Gala Co-Chair Monika Heimbold, and Agnes Ahlander Turner
Board Chair Ray Cameron and Honoree Michael Stubbs
Coco Kopelman and Madeline Weinrib
Trustee John Forbes, Guests Dan Williams, Kristen Williams, Andrea Forbes and Eric Rivers
Arts’ Night Out, a festive celebration of the Spring Show NYC.
Jessica Weinberg (right)
Elaine Rosenberg
Robyn Joseph and Gretchen Gunlocke
Gala Co-Chair Monika Heimbold and her husband, Hon. Charles A. Heimbold
Lisa Resling Halpern with Malena Belafonte
Timothy Thompson, Maggie Moore, and Andrew Ogletree
Jonathan Rosen and Melanie Holland
Gabby Karan, Gala Co-Chair Lise Evans, and Gian Paolo DeFelice
The Storefront Choir
Bridget McDermott and Jim Walker
Rodney Johnson and Mark Alexander
Cadet and Tinuola Naija
Lisa Leffell, Debbie Edelman, and Amy Scharf
Kyle Calvert
Oscar Camargo and Jennifer Considine
Cat Jagger Pollon and DPC
Richard Farley and Dana Auslander
Her Serene Highness Princess Jeannette zu Fürstenberg and Kaleta Blaffer Johnson
Donald Tober with Monica and Ali Wambold
Tara McDonough and John McKay
Adelina Wong Ettelson, Dr. Lisa Airan, and Jamie Pallot
Gillian Spreckels Fuller, Foundation Director,  Her Royal Highness The Crown Princess Margarita of Romania, His Royal Highness Prince Radu of Romania, Barbara de Portago, Foundation President, Valley Forge Military Academy, and College Cadets at The Versailles/Claude Monet Giverny Foundation Black Tie Benefit Dinner.
Ellen Baker, Donald Putnam, and Suzanne Currie
John Howard
Melissa Morris
Jeff Bellantoni, Vivi Feng, and Kashsia Rahman
Gillian Spreckels Fuller, Foundation Director, Her Serene Highness Princess Jeannette zu Fürstenberg, His Serene Highness Prince Christian zu Fürstenburg, Her Royal Highness The Crown Princess Margarita of Romania, His Royal Highness Prince Radu of Romania, and Barbara de Portago, Foundation President
Cat Jagger Pollon and His Royal Highness, Prince Radu of Romania
Cadet, Heide Hüttl Canellopoulos, Foundation Committee Member, Tanya Roberts, and Cadet
Amy Rose Silverman and Tracey Pruzan
Nancy Novogrod, Darren Henault, and Brooke Cundiff
Alexandra Haime
Susan Krysiewicz and escort

Julie Bernstein and Meredith Verona
Geoffrey Bradfield
Bruce Gitlin, Thomas Schutte, Tess Schutte, and Kashsia Rahman
Hannah Griswold, Brooke Cundiff, and Yesim Philip
Lynn Halbfinger and Lynn Tobias
Lisa Klein and Debi Wisch
Vivien Gurfein and Mary Ridge
Marc Rosen, Juliana Curran Terrian, and Mark Ackerman
Tracey Langfitt Foundation Junior Director Camila Koenig, Foundation Director Rita Lenda, His Royal Highness Prince Radu of Romania, Her Royal Highness The Crown Princess Margarita of Romania, and Michael Katz, Foundation Secretary Treasurer
Jennifer Leyton and Sara Broderick
Andre Desmarais
Photographs  by PatrickMcMullan.com; Mary Hilliard and Jay Brady (THE VERSAILLES FOUNDATION)
Carol Berkman, Pam Berkman, and Ronit and Bill Berkman
Vivi Feng
Gaia and Federico Pratesi
Leucothée (1687) by Joseph Rayol (1655-1718)
DPC with Her Royal Highness, the Crown Princess Margarita of Romania
Dana Lowey Luttway and Lisa Fiorito Mackessy
Dame Donna and Chevalier Richard Soloway
Debbie Bancroft and Mark Gilbertson
Bridget McDermott, Robert Del Greco, and Ana Leibowitz
Lady Weatherstone and Jennifer Johnson
Her Royal Highness The Crown Princess Margarita of Romania, His Royal Highness Prince Radu of Romania, The Valley Forge Military Academy, and College Cadets
Darren Henault and Michael Hainey
Danny Lopez and Viscount Astor
Margie Weingarten, Buffy Sahlman, and Marjorie Loeb
James Reginato and Fern Mallis
Anthea Malone, Lily Rutt, and Russell Grant
Kaleta Blaffer Johnson and Gordon Bunker Huddleston
Valley Forge Military Academy and College Color Guard
Dr. Douglas Steinbrech and Melissa Berkelhammer
Thom Browne and Nate Berkus
Event Co-Chairs Ronit Berkman, Stacey Bronfman, and Debi Wisch
Erin Fogarty and Eli Mou
Nicolas Mirzayantz, Agathe Lerolle, Veronique Gabai-Pinsky, and Joe Pinsky
Nomi Ghez
Nina Ross, Shelly Kivell, and Linda Plattus
Theo Spilka and Carol Alt
Duncan Niederauer and Richard Cunningham
Colonel Ed Parker and Captain Guy Disney
Cadet, Carroll Petrie's granddaughter, and Russell Grant
Ino & Mélicerte, Marble Group by Pierre Gravier (1633-1715)
Scott Holman III and Camila Blaffer Royall
Arlene Dahl, Donald Stannard, and Annette Green
Charles Desegundo, Duncan Niederauer, and Alison Niederauer
Paola Rosenshein
Phillip MacGregor and Ron Wendt
Catherine Malandrino and Veronique Gabai-Pinsky
Veronique Gabai-Pinsky and Marc Rosen
Patricia Duff
Ben Brown and Danielle Brown
Carol and Philippe Delouvrier
Peter Charrington and Isabel Carden
Barbara Regna, Carolina Portago, Dahlia Heyman, and Tracey Langfitt
Marcia Dunn and Robin Lefcourt
Kathy and Keith Sachs and Ruth Beesch
Isabel Carden, Jamie Niven, and Jackie Scanlan
Marc Rosen and Jerry Vittorio
Juliana Curran Terian, Mike Pratt, Lesa Wang, and Lauren Giordano

Photographs  by DPC/NYSD.

Patricia Beard and Carolyn MacKenzie
Alexis Clarke, Andy Oshrin, and Michelle Smith
Jim Luce and Andrew Solomon
Marjorie Reed Gordon and Jill Blanchard
Kirk Henckels and Fernanda Kellogg
Margo Langenberg and Bunny Beekman
Paul Lerner and Dori Cooperman
Booth by JEFFREY HENKEL
Mark Gilbertson and ?
Guinevere Johnson and Camille Tibaldeo
Alec Call, Sharon Bush, and Bryan Johns
Lorna Hyde Graev, Elizabeth Fiore, and Laura Bohn
Ross Meltzer and Di Mondo
Nell and Dan Haughton, and Sacha MacNaughton
Amy Hoadley, Mario Buatta, and Stephanie Foster
Alexandra Lebenthal and John Beitel
Lorna Graev addresses the guests at Fountain House's 10th Annual Symposium and Luncheon.
Steven Stolman and Rich Wilkie
Kamie Lightburn, Angelina Chen, and Natasha Cornstein
Booth by BOB and DEBBIE WITHINGTON
Joseph Singer and Katie Ridder
Lee Black and Cece Black
Photographs  by PatrickMcMullan.com; Billy Farrell (CPC Taste)
Daisy Helman and Charles Johnson
R. Couri Hay and Friend
Dan Brickley and Ruthie Davis
Michael Kennedy and Elizabeth Atwood
Karen Cox and Mary Pedersen
Alexandra Herzan, Podie Lynch, Anne Mai, Mary Pedersen, Nancy Farrell, Kitty de Chazal, Carolyn MacKenzie, Lorna Hyde Graev, and Patricia Begley
John Roselli and Bunny Williams
Julie Skarratt, Howard Christian, and Cristina Masson
Carolyne Roehm and Mish Tworkowski
Geoffrey Bradfield, Emily Carey, and Roric Tobin
Deeda Blair
Jennifer Mitchell and Ira Wender
Barbara and Peter Regna with Frances Shelton
Flavia Masson, and Greg and Elisabeth Hersch
Barbara Cirkva Schumacher
Jackie Drexel, Kari Tiedemann, and Lorna Hyde Graev
Jessie Bard and Les Corwin
Mary Van Pelt, Missey Condie, and Kamie Lightburn
Judy Steinhardt, Gregory Long, and Susan Burke
CeCe and Lee Black
Steven Stolman and Connie Anne Phillips
Kamie Lightburn, Kathy Prounis, and Stephanie Foster
Leah Bourne and Margaret Livits
Mark Gilbertson, Jackie Williams, and John Ferguson
Michel Witmer
Ellen Marx
Fiona and Eric Rudin
Katie Kinsey and Ginny Knott
Kaitlin O'Brien, Nancy Farrell, and Jeremy Goldstein
Peter Davis, Logan Samuelson, Lisa Anastos, and Dori Cooperman
Ann Barish, Jane Murray, Claudia LaMere, and Tricia Lint
Wendy Breck
Becca Bull and Mollie Ruprecht
David Sherrill and Sunny Hayward
Frances Schultz Dittmer and Nina Griscom
Debbie Bancroft, Amy Hoadley, Gillian Miniter, and Elenora Kennedy
Mark Gilbertson and Missy Rennie
Dennis Hersch, Hunt Slonem, and Huguette Hersch
Amy Todd Middleton and Betsy Ruprecht
Fernanda Kellogg and Christopher Spitzmiller
Sculptures by Charles Johnson
Jackie Weld Drake and Katherine Bryan
Kitty McKnight and Diane van Amerongen
Martin and William Dessoffy
Podie Lynch and Frances Adler
Dottie Goldfrank and Lionel Goldfrank
Selmin Arat and Alix Strauss
Terri Coppersmith, John DeLucie, and Gillian Miniter
Dr. Holly Bannister, Martha Stewart, Memrie Lewis, and Barbara Cirkva Schumacher
Lee Robinson and Mario Buatta
Judith Bruce
Carol Prisant and Robert Ruffino
Clelia and Tom Zacharias
Patsy Tarr
Elizabeth Peabody and Diane van Amerongen
Joe Tursone and Mary Ingriselli
Ambassador Alan Blinken and Melinda Blinken
Andrew Solomon
Martha Stewart
Tom Gottsleben
Kristi Witker and Stephanie Stokes
Sheila Stephenson and CeCe Black
Kaileah Christie-Fogg and Michael Fogg
Sharon Handler Loeb
Fiona Rudin, Suzanne Cochran, Suzie, and Ainar Aijala
Oscar Plotkin and Sharon Bush
Frances Adler, Jackie Drexel, and Amanda Haynes-Dale
Scudder Smith and Catherine Sweeney Singer
Kenn Dudek and Andrew Solomon
Katie Tozer and Courtney Arnot
Robert Lindgren, Thomas Gibb, Emily Eerdmans, and Bruce Addison
Lee Auchincloss, Lea Cornell, and Alexandra Herzan
Cristina Masson, Geoffrey Bradfield, and Charles and Flavia Masson
Jennifer Oken
Jeremy and Friederike Biggs
Mario Buatta and Clare Potter
Charlotte Barnes and Bunny Williams
Larry Graev, Lorna Hyde Graev, Maria Spears, Linda Silverman, Patricia Beard, and David Braga
Michael Aram and Earl Montelibano
Dori Cooperman, Mark Amadei, and Gillian Miniter
Michel Witmer and Alison Minton
Charles Masson and Hunt Slonem
Scott Velezo, Stephen Mooney, Jack Bochonok, Steven Stolman, Rich Wilkie, and Christopher Ribera
Dr. Robert Hilt, Victoria Costello, Dr. David Reiss, Andrea Roy, and Consuelo Mack
Booth by TELESCOPES OF VERMONT
Jean Shafiroff and Ann Rapp
Podie Lynch and Kitty de Chazal
Booth by PAGODA RED
Andrew Solomon and Kenn Dudek
Ralph Aquila and Lorna Hyde Graev
Ann Rapp
Andrew Schonebaum and Anne Mai
Lorna Hyde Graev, Louise Ross, and Beatrice Van Roijen
Dee Hilfiger and Kelly Pasciucco
Diane van Amerongen, Charles Holmes, and Frances Schultz Dittmer
Charles and Cristina Masson
Lorna Hyde Graev and Larry Graev
Michelle Smith and Mark Gilbertson
Jack Staub
Dana Blanton and Christine Alyward
Alistair Hanna and Nancy Hanna
Rick Meyer, Karon Cullen Meyer, Sherri Stephenson, and Tom Dittmer
Bob and Suzanne Cochran, and Eric Rudin
Lisa Anastos
Linda Douglass and Robert Douglass
Bob and Suzanne Cochran, Lise Evans, and Sandra Ripert
Gigi Mortimer
Barbara Israel and Tom Israel
Bob Hardwick and Coleman Burke
Jean Shafiroff and Andrea Stark

Maria and Ken Fischel
Michael Tavano and Marie Stewart
Douglas Hannant, Michele Gerber Kieln, Frederick Anderson, and Valesca Guerrand Hermes
Susan Motamedy, Nader Motamedy, Suzanne Cochran, and Bob Cochran
Justin Gibbons and Johannes Worsoe
Sally Cummins and Robert Cummins
Dan Paduano and Nader Motamedy
JB Glass, Martha Glass, and John Glass
Nancy Paduano, Aditi Malhotra, Piyali Kothari, and Judith Paduano
On the terrace of the Scurry residence
Suzanne Cochran, Lauren Cochran, and Judi Churchill
Ursula Striker and Didi Schafer
Greg McCarthy, Sheila Mulrennan, Carol Staab, Steve Bensinger, and Neil Hochberg.
Barbara McLaughlin, Sadie Sink, Michael Scully, and Peter Van de Wetering
Didi Schafer, Oscar Schafer, and Daisy Soros
Shirley King
Jeff Peek, Heliane Stedan, and Andrew Sieg
Chris Nolan (from the Conservancy)
Diana Vagelos, Roy Vagelos, and Gillian Sorensen
R. Couri Hay and Christine Rappaport
Eileen and Robert Judell
Stephan Connery and Tania Connery
Bonnie Strauss and Dr. Roger Gould
Diane Guenther, Pipa Dichter, and Mary Wallach
Maggie Norris
Jose Mendez and Barbara Carvello
Tom Gibb and Robert Lindgren
Jeff Tarr, Patsy Tarr, and Andrew Tobias
Taking in the fireworks display at the Carson residence
Anne Ford, Missie Rennie, and Tina Sloan
Martha Glass, Nina Griscom, and Mark Gilbertson
Paula Caravelli
Natalia Nastaskin, Doug Blonsky, and Gillian Sorensen
Anki Leeds, Jamie Figg, and Anne Ford
Dan Garodnick, Deborah Foord, and Jo-Ann Polise
Amanda Brainard, Ursula Striker, and Charles Brainard
Richard Peterson, Pamela Scurry, Howard Stein, Jessica Palmer, and Bill Waller
Kathy Forgan and Konrad Keesee
Seton Melvin and Barbara McLaughlin
Chris Coyne, Alexandra Dean, and David Toby
Neil Hochberg, Carol Staab, and Phil Stern
Karen, Clay, and Susan Tompkins
Sadie Sink singing for the guests
Myrna Small
Suzie Aijala and Lexi Diamond
Charles Bergman, Stuart Levy, and Kerrie Buitrago
Photographs  by PatrickMcMullan.com(Central Park Conservancy); AnnieWatt.com(Scully)
Mario Buatta, Caroline Mehta, and Kathleen Lamborn
Richard Scully and Pam Scully
Grace Leo and Lois Massen
Kevin McLaughlin, Stephen Attoe, Robert Caravaggi, and Jay Jolly
Lucinda Ross, Ryan Ross, Ainar Aijala, and Suzie Aijala
Virgilia Klein and Erica Juneja
Alex Parsons and Jack Lynch
Michael Scully, Andrea Fahnestock, and George Hambrecht
Phil Stern, Kimberly Tanico, Neil Hochberg, and Paul Tanico
Annette Rickel, Alexis Mersentes, and Eleanora Kennedy
Evelyn Tompkins, Clay Tompkins, and Karen Tompkins
Jim Leary and Anne Shearman Betts
DeBare Saunders and Ronald Mayne
The fireworks display in Central Park was enjoyed by nearly 1,500 guests from their hosts' windows at "Central to Spring: Cocktails on the Park" to benefit the Central Park Conservancy.
Dr Annette Rickel
Pam Goldie-Morrison, Duncan Goldie-Morrison, Anne Louvel, and Alain Louvel
Sam Gordon, Judy Carson, and Russ Carson
Elizabeth Winsor, Constance C.R. White, Emary C. Aronson, and Andrew Sieg
Kate and Alex Donner
Erica Juneja, Betsy Schiff, Robert Juneja, and Pam Scurry
Oscar Plotkin and Sharon Bush
Karen Klopp and Cece Cord
Joan Jakobson, Kitty Berry, and Liz Peek
James Green Didi Schafer, and Freddie Sayers
Joyce Cowin
Steve Bensinger, Carol Staab, and John Paulson
Maggie Norris, Melanie Fraser Hart, and Tracy Stern
Veve Wheeler, Barbara McLaughlin, Susie Branch, and Ken Bijur
Sharon Bush and Jamie Figg
Suzie Aijala, Lucinda Ross, and Ryan Ross
Joycelyn Engle, Lauren Lawrence, and Julianne Michelle
Bill Fried and Wolter Korijn
Eleni's red tulip cookies
Eugenie Niven
Frances and Bill Bruder
Geoffrey Bradfield, Lisa Selby, and Vebjørn Sand
Stephanie Stokes
Gary Felsher and Michele Felsher
Jeff Rosen and Maryam Arjonmand
Mikel Witte and JB Glass
Taking in the fireworks display at the Schafer residence
Patricia and Stephen Attoe
Patsy Tarr and Roy Furman
Jennifer Bakker and Anna Schecter
Caroline and Jose Los Arcos
Derek and Nicole Limbocker with Tina Sloan
Stephanie Young, Lou Rosenfeld, Patti Cohen, and Harvey Cohen
Eleni and Randall Gianopoulos
Alexandra and Louis Rose
Nader Ahari, Kristin Olney, and Ali Granmayeh
Christina Roe, Allison Ross, David Ross, and Kevin Roe
